(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“That’s when I realized married or not married…I needed to love myself.””Ciara has not yet announced when her album will be released.”
“I was a single mom sitting at home, and then I realized that the perfect love I was looking for was how God loves me, how He wants me to be loved, and who He was calling me to be as a mom and a woman.”
“I found myself at my lowest moment.”
“'” Amid backlash, the twice-married singer explained, “I was once that girl wanting to be loved a certain way but was making the wrong choices.”
“In January she had reposted a video clip from John Gray’s “He Who Finds a Wife” sermon, in which the she states, “Too many women want to be married, but you’re walking in the spirit of ‘girlfriend.”
“The song’s title is very clearly directed at her controversial #LevelUp social media posts.”
“Level up!”.”
“Get up and dance.”
“Love yourself.”
“She begins the music video by stating, “OK, remember I told you: Be your own boss.”


"It was then that I realized whether I was married or not I need to love myself. " "Sheila hasn't announced when her album will be released."
"I was a single mother sitting at home, and then I realized that the perfect love I was looking for was how God loved me, how he wanted me to be loved, and how he called me to be a mother and woman."
"I found myself at the bottom."
Amid strong opposition, the twice married singer explained, "I was the girl who wanted to be loved, but I made the wrong choice."
In January, she re released a video from John Gray's "he who find a wife" sermon, in which she said: "too many women want to get married, but you're in the spirit of" girlfriend. "
"The name of the song is obviously aimed at her controversial social media post."
"Upgrade!" .”
"Get up and dance."
"Love yourself."
She said at the beginning of the music video, "well, remember I told you: be your own boss."



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pic.twitter.com/E77ur2KJnY —  (@squareups) December 26, 2017She must be behind that tree —  (@IviweVikki) December 26, 2017”
“...where is kylie and that bump?”
“Where’s Kylie?”
“That’s the question Kardashian fans were asking when the reality TV family finally unveiled their annual Christmas card Monday afternoon but a reportedly pregnant Kylie Jenner was noticeably absent.”
“In fact, fans were fuming on Twitter and elsewhere that they had fallen for what turned out to be a 25-day-long tease to the card’s release.”
“Each day, starting Dec. 1, Kim Kardashian and other members of the clan released a photo from the family’s Christmas card photo shoot, showing different group shots, including of Kim and Kanye West with their two kids, North and Saint.”
“Fans had expected that 20-year-old Kylie, reported to be well into her first pregnancy with her rapper boyfriend Travis Scott, would finally display her baby bump on the Dec. 25 card.”
“Instead, the card showed nearly all the Kardashian-Jenner women and grandchildren, including Kris Jenner and grandmother Mary Jo “M.J.” Houghton.”
“But there was no Kylie Jenner.”
“Khloe Kardashian was there, though with no baby bump yet visible, possibly because the photo shoot took place sometime in early November, E!”


“... pic.twitter.com/E77ur2KJnY -(@ squareups) December 26, 2017 she must be behind that tree - (@ iviwevikki) December 26, 2017 "
“… Where are Kelly and the lump? "
"And Kelly?"
"This is a question asked by fans of Kardashian when reality TV families finally released their annual Christmas cards on Monday afternoon, but pregnant Kelly Jenner was reported to be absent
"In fact, fans on Twitter and other websites have angrily said that they are in love with the 25 day card issue banter."
"From December 1, every day, Kim Kardashian and other tribal members will publish a picture of their family's Christmas card, showing different group photos, including Kim Kardashian and Kanye West with their two children, North and saint."
"Fans thought Kelly, 20, and rapper boyfriend Travis Scott, who were reported to be pregnant for the first time, would eventually show off her lump on a card on December 25."
Instead, the card shows almost all of Kardashian Jenner's women and grandchildren, including Chris Jenner and grandmother Mary Joe Horton
"But there's no Kelly Jenner."
"Kardashian was there at the time, but she didn't see the baby lump. Maybe it was taken in early November, Kardashian!"



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The former couple and their significant others reunited to celebrate the holiday with their kids — Apple, 14, and Moses, 12 — a source tells People.”
“"They’re a total modern family and had a great time celebrating together,” the insider shared.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“It seems like Johnson is becoming closer to Martin's family.”
“The Fifty Shades of Grey star, 29, and Coldplay frontman, 41, were spotted together for the first time over a year ago.”
“Just last month, rumors swirled that Johnson was pregnant when she celebrated her birthday at Martin's house with pink and blue balloons, which some people confused for gender reveal party props.”
“But Johnson was quick to shut down rumors that she and the musician were expecting a child together.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"The old couple reunited with their partner to celebrate the festival with their children, apple, 14, and Moses, 12," a source told people
"They are a completely modern family and have a good time celebrating together," said the person familiar with the matter
This content was imported from {embedded name}
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"It seems that Johnson and Martin's family are getting closer and closer."
"Grey star, 29, and Coldplay avant garde, 41, were first found together more than a year ago."
"Just last month, when Johnson was celebrating Martin's birthday with pink and blue balloons, there was a lot of rumors that he was pregnant. Some people confused the balloon and thought it was a prop for a gender disclosure party."
"But Johnson soon put an end to the rumor that she was pregnant with the musician."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So it will be interesting to see if Julep single-handedly just changed that category with its forthcoming launch.”
“Back in November of 2012, a cosmetics industry analyst told Cosmetic Design (a trade website) that a number of DD creams, called "Daily Defense" creams were poised to launch, but they aren't for your face--rather they are "heavy duty body and foot creams."”
“The alphabet formulations--like BB cream, CC cream, and soon DD creams--have joined tinted moisturizers and standard foundation on the shelves as potential skin-perfecting options.”
“But what do they all (supposedly) do?”
“What's the difference between them?”
“And most importantly: Which should you use?”
“We break it down for you.”
“Related Articles Korean Skincare The Difference Between Serums Essences Ampoules The Comprehensive List of Where You Can Return Opened Beauty Products How to Find the Most Flattering Nude Lipstick for Your Skin Tone Tinted Moisturizer The name is pretty self explanatory The product gives you a bit of color with...”
“...a moisturizing benefit the color is usually pretty sheer...”
“My sense is that they may be headed for extinction, or at least hibernation.”


"So it would be interesting if julep, on its own, changed that category in an upcoming product."
"As early as November 2012, a cosmetic industry analyst told cosmetics design (a trade website) that some Daily" Defense DD "cream was about to be launched, but they were not suitable for your face, but" heavy body and foot cream ".
"Alphabet formulations such as BB cream, CC cream and fast DD cream" have added coloring moisturizers and standard foundation on the shelves as potential skin perfect choices.
"But what do they do?"
"What's the difference between them?"
"The most important thing is: which one should you use?"
"Let's break it down for you."
"Related articles, South Korea skin care essence, the difference between ampoule flavor ampoule comprehensive list, you can return to open beauty products, how to find the most love nude lipstick for your skin color dyeing moisturizer name is quite self-evident product gives you a little color and..."
“… The benefits of moisturizing color is usually very transparent... "
"My feeling is that they may go extinct, or at least hibernate."



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The two split in January after five years of dating, and in a new piece for Vogue, the former Girls star gets candid about the moment they decided to go their separate ways, and recalls the "loneliness" she's felt since.”
“"We sat in our shared kitchen of nearly four years and quietly faced each other, acknowledging what nobody wanted to say," Dunham wrote.”
“"That obsessive connection had turned to blind devotion, and the blinders were coming off to reveal that we had evolved separately (the least shocking reason of all and perhaps the most common).”
“That anger wasn't sexy or sustainable.”
“That our hearts were still broken from trying so hard to fix it but no longer uncertain about whether or not we could.”
“The finality nearly killed me, and I remember muttering, ‘But what if we still went on dates?'”
“He laughed sadly.”
“‘Whatever you want.'"”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
They parted in January after five years of love. In a new article in fashion magazine, the former actress candidly described the moment when they decided to go their separate ways and recalled the "loneliness" she felt since then
"We sat in our shared kitchen for nearly four years, quietly across the floor, admitting that no one wanted to say anything," Dunham wrote
"This obsessive connection has turned into blind dedication, and the hoodwinkers are revealing that we evolved separately (which is the least shocking and perhaps the most common of all reasons)
"This anger is neither sexy nor sustainable."
"Our hearts are still broken because we're working so hard to fix it, but we're not sure we can."
"The end almost killed me, and I remember muttering," but what if we're still dating? "
"He laughed sadly."
"Whatever you want."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image By Alex Wong/Getty Images]”
“It should be noted that Melania Trump’s version of the dress seems to have been altered based on her personal preferences.”
“Whether she’s dressing up for Steven Mnuchin’s wedding or dressing down and being mindful of the severity of damage inflicted by Hurricane Harvey and Irma, people are usually extremely critical of what she’s wearing and, in many cases, how much it costs.”
“The constant criticism surrounding her personal style hasn’t deterred Melania Trump from expressing herself how she sees fit, however.”
“Tonight Melania Trump was quite the dazzling figure as she hosted the annual White House Historical Association dinner alongside Donald Trump, according to the NY Daily News.”
“In the photos, which you can see below, Melania Trump shines brightly in a sparkly floor-length gown, which the fashion finders at the White House Fash Twitter account have identified as a piece from Monique Lhuillier’s line.”
“FLOTUS is wearing a Pre Fall 2017 M_Lhuillier gown for the black tie dinner tonight available at 7995 https t co khhPZCgu6C pic twitter com SGoLxceaoP White House Fashion WhiteHouse_Fash September 15 2017 Per the website where it can be purchased the shiny number comes with a jewel neckline and...”
“...capelet back...”
“It’s also short-sleeved and comes in an A-line silhouette.”
“A black “contrast velvet tie” sits at the waist, acting as a belt.”


"[close up courtesy of Alex Wong / Getty Images]"
"It's important to note that the version of Melania Trump's dress seems to have changed according to her personal preferences."
"Whether she's dressing up for Steven munuchin's wedding, or she's dressing down, and noting the devastation caused by hurricanes Harvey and IRMA, people are usually very picky about what she's wearing and, in many cases, how much she spends."
"However, constant criticism around her personal style has not prevented Melania trump from expressing the way she thinks fit."
According to the New York Daily News, "tonight Melania trump, together with Donald Trump, presides over the annual dinner of the White House Historical Association, which is quite a dazzling figure."
"In the photo below, you can see that Melania trump is wearing a glittering floor to floor robe. The fashion discoverer of the White House fashion twitter account has confirmed that this is one of the Monique lulier series."
"Flotus wear m before fall 2017_ Lhuillier dress is available for tonight's black tie dinner at the price of 7995 HTTPS t Co khhpzcgu6c pic twitter com sgolxceaop white house fast on September 15, 2017, and can be purchased on the website with shining number, jewelry neckline and... "
“… The Cape came back... "
"It's also short sleeve, wearing a silhouette."
A black "contrast velvet tie" is worn around the waist to act as a belt



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s getting into it all.”The entrepreneur also revealed that Dream has started “walking and running.””
“And Dream is fascinated with Santa and loves all of the lights.”
“Wearing a short-sleeve white top, Dream was front-and-center in the day nine picture.”
“She looked adorable too, staring at the camera and sticking her tongue out.”
“Behind her, Kourtney’s oldest son Mason (who turns 8 this month), could be see seen running while dressed in a head-to-toe white look.”
“A bare green Christmas tree was also in the shot.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“The 2017 KarJenner Christmas card rollout began on Dec 1 with a panorama shot of Kim and husband Kanye West s 2 year old son Saint followed by snaps of his 4 year old sister North on days two four six and seven a few of those featuring her mama...”
“...too...”


"She's doing her best." The entrepreneur also revealed that the dream has begun to "walk around"
"I'm crazy about Santa Claus and all the lights."
"Wearing a short sleeve white coat, dream is in the front and middle of the picture on the ninth day."
"She's cute, too, staring at the camera and sticking out her tongue."
Behind her, Courtney's eldest son, Mason, 8, can be seen running in white from head to toe
"There is also a bare Green Christmas tree in the picture."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"The launch of the 2017 kajana Christmas card began on December 1, taking panoramic photos of Kim and her husband Kanye West's 2-year-old son saint, followed by photos of his 4-year-old sister North on the second, fourth, sixth and seventh day, some of which are photos of her mother..."
“… Also... "



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Their admissions have encouraged women across social media to share their own personal stories of sexual harassment and abuse, using the hashtag #MeToo.”
““I said something like, ‘Oh, come on, mate?!??”
“...wanted to give her a script in his hotel room...”
“I believed that he respected my boundary and maybe he wanted to talk about potential work Over breakfast the actress recalled talking about films film making When the producer asked about Headey s love life she shifted the conversation back to something less personal Later she continued Weinstein said he...”
““I had always carried the thought that he’d never try anything with me again, not after I’d laughed and said never in a million years,” she wrote.”
“Echoing stories from many other actresses in recent weeks, Headey recounted a second incident, in which the producer allegedly tried to lure her into his hotel room under the pretense of work.”
“!’”Headey suggested her rebuff might have cost her roles in other projects helmed by Weinstein, because she was never cast again.”
“It’d be like kissing my dad!”
“I remember thinking, it’s got to be a joke,” she continued.”
“Dozens of women have spoken out against the producer, who was fired from his company last week.”


"Their admissions encourage women to share their personal stories of sexual harassment and abuse through social media and use the label 'metoo'."
"I said something like, 'Oh, come on, man?!'???"
“… I want to give her a script in his hotel room... "
"I believe he respects my boundaries. Maybe he wants to talk about potential jobs at breakfast. The actress recalls that when talking about film production, when the producer asked Heidi about her love life, she turned to some less personal topics. Later, she continued, Winston said he was..."
"I always thought he would never try anything with me again, after I said with a smile, in a million years," she wrote
Echoing the stories of other actresses in recent weeks, Heidi tells of a second incident in which the producer is said to have tried to lure her into his hotel room on the pretext of work
"!" Heidi hinted that her refusal might make her lose her role in other projects that Weinstein was in charge of, because she never played again. "
"It's like kissing my dad!"
"I remember thinking, it must have been a joke," she continued
"Dozens of women openly opposed the producer, who was fired by the company last week."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here’s What to Know About Legal Sports tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“Here\u2019s what you should know the Are Betting Billions on Super Bowl LV.”
“...const FP = you make money from sports betting leading up to the Super Bowl?”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's some knowledge about legal sports, which can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. These skills are provided by some experts who are famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers. "
"Here's what you should know, they bet billions on Super Bowl Lv."
“… Const FP = did you make money from sports gambling before the super bowl? "



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"As far as self-promotion goes, I could bore your majesty and sing my own praises, but let's be honest, there are so many more interesting things I could do with my mouth," Cassandra insinuates.”
“She's there to show that she's fit to be the next queen, in more ways than one.”
“But Cassandra isn't there to talk up her pedigree.”
“You spend yours arguing with me and eating my food," Robert remarks.”
“"You know the other candidates spent most of their time extolling their own virtues and self-promoting.”
“In going through his long list of potential wives, King Robert (Max Brown) wasn't exactly impressed until meeting the feisty Cassandra (Emily Barber) in this exclusive sneak peak from Sunday's all-new The Royals.”
“The king may have just met his match.”


"As for self promotion, I can bore your majesty or sing praises for myself, but to be honest, I can do more interesting things with my mouth," Cassandra hinted
"She was there to show that she was fit to be the next queen, in more than one way."
"But Cassandra is not here to brag about her blood."
"You spend your money arguing with me and eating my food," Robert said
"You know other candidates spend most of their time glorifying their virtues and selling themselves."
"While browsing through a long list of potential wives, King Robert (max Brown) is not impressed until he meets lively Cassandra (Emily barber) in an exclusive interview with the new" royal family "on Sunday."
"The king may have just met his opponent."



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There s so much that s up in the air right now with Fox s sale to Disney and with Gillian s announcement which I respect and with more X Files stories to be told right now it s anyone...”
“I honestly don’t know right now.”
“There’s this title we posted instead of The Truth is Out There this time, which is “Salvator Mundi” [seemingly referring to a painting of Christ by Leonardo Da Vinci], and that had many edges to that sword.”
“You wonder as he was pushed off into that water if he may not be dead.”
“Scully’s visions of his showed him with some kind of special power of rejuvenation.”
“[Chuckles] You know, he rejuvenated somehow to come back last season.”
“Surely you’ll commit to him being dead at last … right?”
“Speaking of which: Cigarette Smoking Man.”
“He’s motionless, but a lot could be drawn from that as the Cigarette Smoking Man never checked if he was done.”
“If you pay close attention to that sequence, did he dive under that car or was he run down?”


"Now there are too many things pending, fox sold to Disney, Gillian announced that I respect, there are more x-file stories to tell, now it's anyone..."
"I really don't know now."
"We put up a title, not the truth. This time it's" salvat Mundi "(which seems to refer to a Christian painting by Leonardo da Vinci). This sword has many sides."
"When he's pushed into the water, you want to know if he's dead."
"Scully's hallucination showed him some special rejuvenating power."
"You know, he came back last season somehow."
"You will let him die Right? "
"Speaking of this: smokers."
"He didn't move, but there was a lot to learn from it, because the smoker never checked whether he did it or not."
"If you look at the scene carefully, did he jump from under that car or was he knocked down?"



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“During her recent appearance on The Ellen DeGeneres Show, Kim Kardashian West admitted that she had not spoken to her former stepparent in several weeks because she felt there were things written about her mother, Kris Jenner, in the memoir that are "so hurtful."”
“WATCH: Caitlyn Jenner 'Ticked Off' at Kris Jenner, Claims She Didn't Get Any Money From KUWTKOn Australia's Today show on Thursday, Caitlyn opened up about being estranged from Kim and other members of the Kardashian family over what was said in her book.”
“"I love Kimberly, I think she's a wonderful person, but, well, to be honest with you, I really haven't talked to her in a long time.”
“I've kind of let everything calm down," she said.”
“"I kind of stay, you know, I keep my distance."”
“"I'm out there trying to make a difference in the world," the 67-year-old reality star added.”
“"There's a lot of drama in the Kardashian family.”
“This is my book about my opinions on things that had happened with me and my family.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"In a recent appearance on Ellen DeGeneres, Kim Kardashian West admitted that she hadn't spoken to her former stepmother for weeks because she thought the memoir about her mother, Chris Jenner, was" too hurtful. "
"Watch: Caitlin Jenner is" critical "of Chris Jenner, claiming she didn't get any money on Thursday's Australian today show, and Caitlin has publicly said that she is alienated from Kim and other members of the Kardashian family because of what the book says."
"I love Kimberly and I think she's a good person, but to be honest, I haven't talked to her for a long time."
"I've calmed everything down," she said
"I'm a little bit stuck, you know, I keep my distance."
The 67 year old reality star added: "I'm trying to change the world."
"The kardashians have a lot of drama."
"This book is about my view of what happened to me and my family."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More on that in the video below.”
“At the time, Tarek allegedly had a handgun and the Sherriff's Department responded to a report of a "suicidal male" with a helicopter.”
“On Thursday, Tarek posted a photo to his Instagram story of himself posing in front of a sign at BJ's Cabana Bar in Lake Havasu City, Arizona.”
“The sign read, "No guns, weapons of any type."”
“Tarek added text to the snap, writing "or helicopters," tagging his estranged wife and topping it off with a middle finger emoji.”
“WATCH: 'Flip or Flop' Exes Tarek v. Christina El Moussa: It's a Battle of the Revenge Bods!”
“The reality star has since deleted the pic, but judging by what Christina posted to her Instagram on Friday, we imagine she wasn't too happy when she saw it.”
“The blond beauty shared a photo of the Empire State Building with the quote, "No time for bullshit when you're building an empire."”
“"True that," she captioned it.”
“Only surround yourself with the best ❤"But that's not all!”


"More about this in the video below."
"At that time, it was said that Tariq had a pistol, and Sharif's Department responded to the report that a 'suicidal man' was in a helicopter."
"On Thursday, Tariq posted a photo on instagram in front of the sign of BJ's cabana bar in Lake Havasu, Arizona."
The sign said, "no guns and weapons of any kind."
Tariq added text to the snapshot, saying "or helicopter," tagging his separated wife and ending with a middle finger emoticon
"Look:" flop or lose "former girlfriend Tariq v. Christina Moussa: it's a war of revenge
"The reality star later deleted the photo, but judging from what Christina posted on instagram on Friday, we don't think she was too happy to see it."
The blonde shared a photo of the Empire State Building, quoting: "when you're building an empire, there's no time for bullshit."
"That's true," she wrote in the title
"Only surround yourself with the best ❤ "But it's more than that!"



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even Michael Moore joked that it got awkward and ran long after Jim had left the stage.”For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
““For a pretty simple question it got really weird and deep, at times not making much sense.”
“While attending a New York Fashion Week event on Friday, September 8, Jim Carrey gave a very strange interview.”
“The 55-year-old actor began by circling around E!”
“News host Catt Sadler at Harper’s Bazaar’s party celebrating Icons by Carine Roitfeld at the Plaza in New York City, and it only got more awkward from there.”
““There’s no meaning to any of this,” Carrey explained of his attendance at the star-studded event.”
““So I wanted to find the most meaningless thing that I could come to and join and here I am.”
“You got to admit, it’s completely meaningless.”When Sadler added that the party was celebrating icons, Carrey replied, “Celebrating icons?”
“Boy, that’s just the absolute lowest aiming possibility that we could come up with … I don’t believe that you exist but there is a wonderful fragrance in the air.” The comedian then broke into a James Brown impression.”
““I don’t believe in personalities.”


Even Michael Moore joked that long after Jim left the stage, things became very embarrassing. "To learn about the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to us weekly's YouTube page."
"For a fairly simple problem, it becomes very strange and profound, sometimes meaningless."
"On Friday, September 8th, Jim Carrey gave a very strange interview at the New York Fashion Week event."
"The 55 year old actor started around e!"
"It's been more embarrassing ever since news anchor Kat Sadler celebrated Caroline rothfield's idol in New York City Square at a party at Harper fair."
"None of this makes any sense," Kerry explained of her attendance at the star show
"So I want to find the most meaningless thing, I can come to join, I'm here."
"You have to admit, it's totally meaningless." When Sadler added that the party was celebrating the icon, Kerry replied, "Celebrating the icon?"
"My God, that's just the lowest possibility we can think of I don't believe you exist, but there's a wonderful smell in the air. " The comedian then broke the impression of James Brown
"I don't believe in personality."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It's not like PBS is the first choice on the moving picture box in the recreational room in the penitentiary."”
“"It's OK, he's not watching.”
“...not onscreen and not in person...”
“Julia was letting us know that she was the real deal comedy wise and she didn t need to give us midriff for us to watch her work because here s the secret Julia s not afraid to be unlikable...”
“Fey continued, paying homage to Louis-Dreyfus' "Seinfeld" character: "Julia made the bold choice for her character Elaine Benes to wear long, loose dresses, flat shoes and over-sized coats and a center barrette.”
“After taking a beat, Fey added: "Just me?"”
“"We both studied comedy in Chicago, we both lost our virginity to (Louis-Dreyfus' husband) Brad Hall."”
“Maybe because I'd like to believe that we have a lot in common," Fey said.”
“"I've always liked Julia.”
“Tina Fey made things personal.”


"In the prison recreation room, PBS is not the first choice."
"Never mind, he's not watching."
“… Not on the screen, not in person... "
"Julia let us know that she is a real comedy genius. She doesn't need to show us her works, because there is a secret here. Julia is not afraid to be liked..."
Fay continued to pay tribute to the character in Louis Dreyfus's Seinfeld: "Julia boldly chose her character, Elaine Bennes, in a loose dress, flat shoes, a large coat and a medium hairpin."
Fay patted and said, "I'm alone?"
"We all studied comedy in Chicago, we all lost our virginity to (Louis Dreyfus's husband) Brad hall."
"Maybe it's because I want to believe we have a lot in common," Fay said
"I've always liked Julia."
"Tina Fay made it personal."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our newsletter to get the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Meghan Markle and more!”
“Can’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?”
“Wedding He s Only Allowed to Wear Shorts...”
“Prince George is third in line to the throne Image zoom Prince George s 5th birthday commemorative coin Credit The Royal Mint Image zoom The Progress of a Prince set from the Royal Mint Credit The Royal Mint RELATED VIDEO Prince George Wore Pants for the First Time at Royal...”
“On Prince George’s second birthday, the Royal Mint issued a similar coin.”
“The legend of St. George and the dragon has been used on royal coins for centuries, according to the Royal Mint, and deliberately invokes courage and the triumph of good over evil as a tribute to the prince on his birthday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The coin, also embossed with the year 2018, is part of a Royal Mint annual set called The Progress of a Prince.”
“According to legend, the dragon, who lived nearby St. George’s town, would attack the locals, so St. George, a knight, tamed and killed it.”
“The coin features an image of St. George, the patron saint of England, and a dragon.”


"Sign up for our newsletters and get the latest news from Kate Middleton, Megan markel and others!"
"Is there not enough coverage of the royal family?"
"He's only allowed to wear shorts for the wedding..."
"Prince George is the third heir to the throne image zooming Prince George's 5th birthday coin credit Royal Mint image zooming Prince's progress from Royal Mint credit settings Royal Mint related video Prince George wears pants for the first time in the royal family..."
A similar coin was issued at the Royal Mint on Prince George's second birthday
According to the Royal Mint, the legend of St. George and the dragon has been used on Royal coins for centuries, and the prince's birthday was commemorated by deliberately invoking the victory of courage and good and evil
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The coin also bears the year 2018, which is part of the Royal Mint's annual book entitled progress of the prince."
Legend has it that the Dragon living near St. George's town would attack the local people, so the knight St. George tamed and killed it
On this coin are portraits of the British Guardian Saint George and a dragon



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Neilson Barnard/Getty Images6.”
“He may not have liked it, but [his character] was the closest to who he was,” he said.”
“After the first year [of the show], it’ll quiet down.”
““They said, ‘O.K., you can go to Columbia [University] one day a week.”
“Best known at the time for her role in the Sisterhood of the Traveling Pants films, Lively told showrunners she wanted to go to college.”
“Lively, then 18, was eyeing an exit from Hollywood when first approached about the series.”
“Gossip Girl stopped Lively from quitting acting.”
“It was cool.”2.”
“Though the pair weren’t pals, castmate Michelle Trachtenberg – who played Gossip Girl baddie Georgina Sparks – insisted there was no drama between the women: “We were all chill.”
“Yet the second they’d be on set together, it’s as if they were.”The divide was mostly because of the actresses’ differing personalities, said Safran, who described Lively as “very in the moment,” while Meester was “very removed and very quiet” on set.”


"Image zooming source: Nelson Barnard / Getty images6."
"He may not like it, but [his character] is closest to him," he said
"After the first year, everything will calm down."
"They said," well, you can go to Columbia one day a week. "
"She was best known for her role as a sister in the panties movie, and lively told people in the show business that she wanted to go to college."
"When 18-year-old lively first talked about the series, he was planning to quit Hollywood."
"The gossip girl stopped him from leaving the show business."
"It's cool." two
Although they are not good friends, kastmat Michelle trestenberg, who plays gossip girl villain Georgina sparks, insists there is no drama between them: "we are all cold."
"But the second time they were on set, it was like they were together," Safran said The difference is mainly due to the different personalities of the two actresses. Safran described liveliness as "very present", while Meister was "very cold and quiet" on the set



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Aside from his stint on reality TV, the 32-year-old played baseball for the Los Angeles Angels of Anaheim and the Baltimore Orioles.”
“He was also engaged to Allie Lutz in 2013 but the pair never made it down the aisle.”
“Reinhardt, who previously dated Paris Hilton and Amanda Bynes, married Sutton in October.”
“PHOTOS: Latest celebrity picsAccording to E!, Sutton was booked on Saturday and released later that day.”
“Reinhardt is reportedly covering from an ACL operation.”
“TMZ reported that Sutton reportedly grabbed her husband's metal crutch and hit him repeatedly with it.”
“Paradise Valley Police Department told People Natalie Sutton was arrested early Saturday morning and charged with a class 1 misdemeanor charge for criminal damage and a class 1 misdemeanor charge for assault.”
“Former "The Hills" star Doug Reinhardt's wife was arrested on a misdemeanor domestic violence assault, according to multiple reports.”


"In addition to his performance on reality TV, the 32 year old plays baseball for the Los Angeles Angels and the Baltimore Orioles."
"In 2013, he was engaged to Ellie Lutz, but they never succeeded."
Reinhart dated Paris Hilton and Amanda Bynes and married Sutton in October
"Photos: the latest celebrity photos! , Sutton was reserved on Saturday and released later in the day. "
"Reinhart is reported to be covering the ACL operation."
"TMZ reported that Sutton had seized her husband's metal crutch and beat him repeatedly with it," he said
"Paradise Valley police told people that Natalie Sutton was arrested early Saturday morning and charged with first degree misdemeanor of criminal damage and first degree misdemeanor of assault."
"According to a number of reports, the wife of former mountain star Doug Reinhart was arrested for a misdemeanor of domestic violence."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My writing partner sells all of her clothes there.”
““I do have an account on [the resell/consignment site] The RealReal.”
“Tessa Thompson wore Rosie Assoui.”
“Dior...”
“Other standouts included Viola Davis in juicy orange Zac Posen Jane Fonda in long sleeved hot pink Brandon Maxwell with long sleek ponytail to match and both Tessa Thompson and Zoe Kravitz chasing the rainbow the former in a pleated metallic Rosie Assoulin and the latter in a feathery cascading...”
““Glitter is so hot right now, and it was sparkle, sparkle, sparkle everywhere, and lots of sequin sand silver,” Tom Fitzgerald, co-creator of the fashion and pop culture blog TomandLorenzo.com with Lorenzo Marquez, told Moneyish.”
“...purple Elie Saab gown Tracee Ellis Ross s silver Chanel disco ball Leslie Jones black sparkling Christian Siriano and Ellie Kemper s midnight blue capsleeve Jenny Packham gown...”
“Rich Polk Getty Images White always emerges when people are desperate for change in our culture mused Verdi because it s a blank canvas for new beginnings And the summer s glitter trend was on full display with sequins and beads dusted across almost everyone including Lea Michele s belted...”
“Priyanka Chopra wore Balmain.”
“...gown with full tulle princess skirt...”


"My writing partner sells all her clothes there."
"I do have an account on [resell / consignment site] real real."
"Tessa Thompson is wearing Rosie asui."
"Dior..."
"Others that stand out include Viola Davis in juicy orange Zac Posen Jane Fonda long sleeves, hot pink Brandon Maxwell with a long ponytail, Tessa Thompson and Zoe Kravitz in pursuit of rainbows - the former in wrinkled metal Rosie azolin Assoulin), the latter dressed in stacked feathers... "
Tom Fitzgerald, co-founder of the fashion and popular culture blog, said: "flash is very hot now. There's flash everywhere, flash, and a lot of sequins and silver." TomandLorenzo.com "With Lorenzo Marquez," monish said
“… Purple Elie Saab dress Tracee Ellis Ross silver Chanel disco Leslie Jones black shiny Christian Siriano and Ellie Kemper midnight blue capsleeve Jenny Packham dress... "
"When people are eager to change our culture, rich Polk Getty Images white will always appear, Verdi ponders, because this is a blank canvas, for a new start, the flashing trend of summer is fully displayed, sequins and beads are scattered on almost everyone, the belt of paulia Michelle..."
"Priyanka Chopra in balman."
“… Dress and tulle princess dress... "



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He is of American nationality and belongs to mixed ethnicity.”
“Undoubtedly, Kelvin has a net worth of million figures.”
“Kelvin Hayden Engaged To Taraji P. HensonKelvin Hayden is in a blissful relationship with the Empire star, Taraji P. Henson.”
“He is also generating his income from his gym house.”
“As of now, Kelvin has retired from football and is a co-founder of Karpa Deem gym.”
“Since 2005, his career in football helped him to generate $17.5 million wealth.”
“Kelvin signed a contract with the Chicago Bears with a deal of $840,000, including an average annual salary of $840,000.”
“He also gained a lavish revenue from the deals.”
“Kelvin previously signed a deal with Peyton Manning, Reggie Wayne, Marvin Harrison, Dwight Freeney, Dallas Clark, Ryan Lilja and Bob Sanders.”
“The deal also included $22 million money in guarantees.”


"He's American, mixed race."
"There's no doubt Kelvin's net worth is in the millions."
Kelvin Hayden is engaged to taraji P. Henson. Kelvin Hayden has a happy relationship with taraji P. Henson
"He also makes money from the gym."
"Kelvin has retired so far and is co-founder of kalpa gym."
"Since 2005, his football career has helped him create a fortune of 17.5 million dollars."
"Kelvin signed a contract with the Chicago Bears for $840000, with an average annual salary of $840000."
"He also made a lot of money from these deals."
"Kelvin previously signed an agreement with Payton Manning, Reggie Wayne, Marvin Harrison, Dwight Freeney, Dallas Clark, Ryan Lilja and Bob Sanders."
"The deal also includes a $22 million guarantee."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Born with hip dysplasia, years of gymnastics further aggravated the condition and eventually led her to receiving a hip implant in 2008.”
“The West Virginia native, who retired in 1986, was inducted into the International Gymnastics Hall of Fame in 1997.”
““I’m really excited,” Carson said.”
““It’s so much more difficult than I thought it would be.”“I’ll be dancing with her and thinking I’m doing a really good job, and then I’ll look back at the video and I just look terrible,” he added with a laugh.”
““Once we started getting going, it was nothing like I ever imagined,” he said of training with Carson.”
“During an appearance on Good Morning America on Tuesday, the actor described his experience thus far to host Michael Strahan.”
“Milo Manheim and Witney CarsonManheim, who rose to fame as the star of this year’s Disney Channel original movie Zombies, will be season 27’s youngest competitor at 17 years old.”
“Ware and Smith divorced in 2012.”
“What if all three did?”The couple adopted their daughter, Marley, in 2008.”
““Sometimes, when I’m tired on the field, and I feel like I can’t go anymore, I just think, what if he had one more breath?”


"She was born with dysplasia of the hip, and years of gymnastics further aggravated her condition, which eventually led to her hip implant in 2008."
The West Virginia retired in 1986 and was inducted into the international gymnastic hall of fame in 1997
"I'm really excited," Carson said
He added with a smile: "it's much more difficult than I thought." "I'll dance with her and feel like I'm doing really well, then look back at the video and I just look terrible."
"Once we started training, it was totally different from what I thought," he said of training with Carson
"On Tuesday's Good Morning America show, the actor described his experience of hosting Michael Strahan so far."
Milo Mannheim and Vitelli Casson Mannheim have made their mark in this year's Disney Channel Original Movie zombie. They will be the youngest competitors in season 27 at the age of 17
"Will and Smith divorced in 2012."
"What if all three do it? "The couple adopted their daughter Mary in 2008."
"Sometimes, when I'm tired on the court and feel like I can't walk, I think, what if he takes a breath again?"



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See more on Paltrow in the video below.”
“"I'm a target in a way most entrepreneurs are not."”
“In an interview with The Hollywood Reporteron Wednesday the 44 year old actress commented on criticism about her acting career and entrepreneurial endeavors declaring that if someone has something negative to say about her they better back it up with...”
“...facts...”
“"I'm interested in criticism based on fact, not on projections," Paltrow said.”
“"If you want to f**k with me, bring your A game."”
“The Goop CEO says she is self-aware enough to know where she falls short, and where she doesn't.”
“RELATED: Gwyneth Paltrow Interrupts James Corden’s ‘Goop’ Rant, Gets Him to Try 'Vaginal Steaming'"[Being a celebrity] makes [doing business] much more difficult.”
“For the business I'm creating, it's an obstacle I always have to overcome," she explained.”
“"For example, Reese [Witherspoon], who is a dear friend, has this quickly growing Draper James [clothing] business, and she leverages her celebrity in a great way for her brand."”


"See more about Paltrow in the video below."
"In a way, I'm a goal that most entrepreneurs don't have."
"In an interview with Hollywood reporters on Wednesday, the 44 year old actress commented on the criticism of her acting career and entrepreneurial efforts, saying that if someone has negative comments on her, they'd better use..."
“… The facts... "
"I'm interested in fact based criticism, not prediction based," Paltrow said
"If you want to play with me, bring your game."
"The stupid CEO said that she had enough self-knowledge to know her own shortcomings and her own shortcomings."
"Related report: Gwyneth Paltrow interrupted James cordon's growl and let him try" vaginal steam. "(becoming a celebrity) made it more difficult (doing business)"
"For the business I'm building, it's an obstacle I have to overcome," she explains
"For example, Reese (Witherspoon), a close friend with a fast-growing Draper James clothing business, has used her fame to make a great contribution to her brand."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Now, the Moonlight star is opening up about the challenges he faced as a black man in America.”
“In a recent interview, Ali revealed that his recent celebrity is an interesting contrast to the experience he’s had as a black man in America — an experience that he told GQ includes being racially profiled and being placed on the terror watch list for having a Muslim name.”
““When suddenly you go from being followed in Barneys to being fawned over, it will mess with your head,” he said.”
“Those experiences that you have from age 10 when you start getting these little messages that you are something to be feared walking down the street in Berkeley and some cops roll up on you and say straight up Give me your ID and you re like What the f...”
“...k Despite these interactions Ali maintains a decidedly hopeful attitude about being an American noting that he wants the country to live up to its claim of being great especially when it comes to racial politics...”
““I think African-Americans have a very convoluted relationship with patriotism,” he said.”
““The fact is, we essentially were the abused child.”
“We still love the parent, but you can’t overlook the fact that we have a very convoluted relationship with the parent.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Now, moonstar has made public the challenges he faces as a black man in America."
"In a recent interview, Ali revealed an interesting contrast between his recent fame and his experience as a black man in the United States - he told GQ that his experience included being racially discriminated against and being put on the terror watch list because of his Muslim name."
"When you suddenly go from being followed in Barney to being flattered, your head goes haywire," he said
"You've had this experience since you were 10 years old. When you start to receive such small messages: walking on the streets of Berkeley, you're a frightening person. Some policemen surround you and say, just give me your ID card. You're like an f..."
“…… In spite of these interactions, Ali is still absolutely optimistic that he is an American. He points out that he hopes this country will live up to its great declaration, especially in the aspect of ethnic politics. "
"I think African Americans have a very complex relationship with patriotism," he said
"The fact is, we are essentially abused children."
"We still love our parents, but you can't ignore the fact that our relationship with our parents is very complicated."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Simon BerlynSimon BerlynSimon BerlynSimon BerlynSimon Berlynh/t: DominoThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“See more photos below.”
“Simon BerlynStephen Shapiro of Westside Estate Agency holds the listing.”
“If you need further proof that Stefani lived here, just take in the statement outdoor pizza oven.”
“Simon BerlynThe backyard area is also nicer than most tropical resorts, complete with an infinity pool, a full tennis court, chicken coop, detached guest house, and a playground for Stefani’s children.”
“Jennifer Lopez also once owned the estate, which checks off the necessary criteria of a celebrity home in Cali: a home gym and screening room, thick hedges shielding the pool from view, a 250-foot private driveway, and a gated entry to keep the paps at bay.”
“The black-and-white striped kitchen is a true show stopper though, with hidden storage space and an adjoining breakfast room with a built-in leather banquette.”
“Simon BerlynSix of the bedrooms have ensuite bathrooms, and the master bedroom boasts a walk-in closet with chic carpeting and wood paneling.”
“Floor-to-ceiling windows look out onto the San Fenando valley, and vaulted ceilings, skylights, and hardwood flooring complete the package.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
Simon berlysimon berlynsimon berlynsimon berlynsimon berlynh / T: Domino this content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"See more photos below."
"Simon berlyn Stephen Shapiro of West End Realtors owns shares in the company."
"If you need further proof that Stefani lives here, just put the statement in an outdoor pizza oven."
"Simon bellinti's backyard is also better than most tropical resorts, with an unlimited swimming pool, a full tennis court, chicken cages, an independent guest house and a playground for Stefani's children."
"Jennifer Lopez, who also owned the property, checked the necessary criteria for Carly's celebrity home: a family gym and projection room, thick hedges blocking the view of the swimming pool, a 250 foot private driveway, and an entrance with a gate to prevent PAPS from entering."
"The black and white striped kitchen is a real show stop though, with hidden storage space and adjoining breakfast room with built-in leather banquets."
Six of the bedrooms have separate bathrooms, and the master bedroom has a walk-in closet with chic carpets and planks
From the French windows you can see the San Fernando Valley. The arched ceiling, skylight and hardwood floor make up the whole building



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out Entertainment Weekly’s full story at this link.”
“That said, we still don’t have a full trailer for the movie from Disney, where we actually get to see Smith’s Genie in action, so the image above and the footage below will have to do for the time being.”
“One Disney executive said we should imagine a mix of Fresh Prince and Hitch.”
“Image source: Daniel Smith/DisneyHow good will Smith’s Genie be?”
“And Smith will have a tough job ahead replacing the previous Genie, Robin Williams, a genius comedian who’s no longer with us.”
“After all, it’s not like we care as much about Aladdin or Jasmine as we do about the Genie.”
“The story offers a preview of what making an Aladdin movie means right now, featuring images from the set as well as the first footage that shows Smith in Genie attire.”
“As with other Disney creations, it’s Entertainment Weekly out with the first look at the new live-action movie.”
“Aside from Smith’s Genie, we’ve got Mena Massoud and Naomi Scott playing the other two main characters, Aladdin and Princess Jasmine.”
“Aladdin is one of those iconic Disney classics that deserves a modern take, and the upcoming movie has Guy Ritchie at the helm — which is an unexpected choice for this particular kind of movie.”


"Please click on this link to see the full story of entertainment weekly."
"That is to say, we don't have the full trailer of the Disney movie, where we can actually see Smith's Genie in action, so the above image and the following lens have to be done for the time being."
"One Disney executive said we should imagine a mixture of Fresh Prince and strange."
Photo source: how good will Daniel Smith / Disney Smith's elves be? "
"Smith will face a tough task to replace Robin Williams, a talented comedian, who is no longer with us."
"After all, we don't care as much about Aladdin and jasmine as we do about elves."
"This story provides a preview of what Aladdin's movie means now, from the set image as well as the first shot showing Smith in Elven costume."
"Like other Disney works, this is the first time Entertainment Weekly has launched this new live action movie."
"In addition to Smith's elves, we have MENA Masood and Naomi Scott playing the other two leading roles, Aladdin and Princess Jasmine."
Aladdin is one of Disney's classic works, which is worthy of modern people's appreciation, while the upcoming film is headed by Guy Ritchie - which is an unexpected choice for this kind of film



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And check out our host, Kylie Mar, on Twitter, Facebook, or Instagram.”
“Hit us up on Twitter, Facebook, or Instagram, or leave your comments below.”
“Check out the surprise twist at the end of Rick Grimes’s final episode of The Walking Dead:Read more from Yahoo Entertainment:Tell us what you think!”
“The Walking Dead airs Sundays at 9 p.m. on AMC.”
“He said in a recent interview that he had become frustrated and bored with the character’s storyline.”
“Though many mourn, Payne was ready for his stint on the show to end.”
“Fans did not take Jesus’s death lightly.”
“Other than Eugene and Rosita, this was the group’s first encounter with the Whisperers, living humans hiding among the dead.”
“After fighting off a few walkers with ninja-like skill, Jesus took one last swing of the sword only to have the would-be walker duck, then stab him in the back.”
“While on a mission to rescue Eugene (Josh McDermott) with Daryl (Norman Reedus) and Aaron (Ross Marquand), the group found themselves in a graveyard with a new foe approaching.”


"Check out our moderator Kelly Mar on twitter, Facebook or instagram."
"Contact us on twitter, Facebook or instagram, or leave a message below."
"Look at the surprise at the end of Rick Grimes' last episode of walking: death: read more from Yahoo! Ente is not sure: tell us what you think!"
"Walking dead on AMC at 9 p.m. Sunday."
"He said in a recent interview that he was frustrated and tired of the character's storyline."
"Although a lot of people are mourning, Penn is ready to end his work on the show."
"Fans don't take Jesus' death lightly."
"Apart from Eugene and Rosita, it's the first time they've met whisperers, living people hiding among the dead."
"After repelling a few walkers with Ninja like skill, Jesus swung his sword for the last time. As a result, the duck who wanted to be a walker died and stabbed him in the back."
"In the rescue of Eugene (Josh McDermott) and Daryl (Norman reed) and Aaron (Ross maccand), they find themselves in a cemetery and a new enemy is approaching."



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”
“NBC has had great success reviving shows like “Will & Grace,” while ABC’s “Roseanne” revival was one of the biggest shows on television this spring.”
“Aubrey Plaza told Entertainment Tonight at the start of 2018 that she would “do it,” although she did recommend waiting a bit longer since the show only wrapped three years ago.”
“Other “Parks and Recreation” cast members have gone on record in the past noting their interest in a revival.”
“Across its run, the show was nominated twice for the Emmy for Outstanding Comedy Series, while Poehler was nominated four times for Outstanding Lead Actress in a Comedy Series.”
“The show was never a ratings juggernaut but it was consistently one of the most acclaimed comedies on television.”
““Amy’s the boss of the show,” Offerman said, “so she can speak for everybody.”“Parks and Recreation” ran for seven seasons and 125 episodes between April 2009 and February 2015.”
“It would be amazing.”Poehler was joined on “Ellen” by her “Parks and Recreation” co-star Nick Offerman, who also expressed interest in stepping back into the shoes of Ron Swanson.”
“I think we’d all do it someday.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Registration: keep abreast of the latest film and TV news at any time!"
"NBC has been a great success in the revival of shows like will and grace, and ABC's rosani is one of the biggest shows on TV this spring."
"Aubrey Plaza told entertainment in early 2018 that she would 'do it', but she did suggest waiting a little longer because the show ended three years ago."
"Other members of the park and entertainment crew have recorded their interest in Renaissance in the past."
The show has been nominated for Best Comedy Series twice, while poller has been nominated for best actress in comedy series four times
"The show has never been a ratings blockbuster, but it has always been one of the most popular comedies on TV."
"Amy is the boss of the show," Overman said, "so she can speak for everyone." Park and entertainment aired seven seasons and 125 episodes between April 2009 and February 2015. "
"Great." Poller, who appeared in "Allen" with her co star Nick Overman in "Park and entertainment," also expressed his interest in taking Ron Swanson's stand again
"I think we'll all do that one day."



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In that way, yeah, of course, I’d be a part of something like that.””
“So we may get a more explicit version of the Quack chant.”
“The Mighty Ducks franchise may be making its way to TV!”
“ABC Signature Studios is in early development for a series based on the ’90s franchise, sources tell The Hollywood Reporter.”
“While no network is attached, original trilogy screenwriter Steven Brill and original producer Jordan Kerner reportedly approached ABC Signature head Tracy Underwood about creating the series.”
“The report goes on to say that the show will not be shopped around anytime soon and that the 1992 film’s original stars Emilio Estevez (Gordon Bombay) and Joshua Jackson (Charlie Conway) are not attached … yet.”
“However, that didn’t stop fans from getting very excited about the news on Twitter.”
“Whoa, a MIGHTY DUCKS TV series is in development…that’s my childhood right there.”
“...pic.twitter.com/RjpZbnooMn — Skyler Shuler (@Skylerhxc) January 22, 2018The ONLY way a Mighty Ducks series will work is if you bring Josh Jackson in to be the coach.”
“—  Barbarella  (@youthinkmemad) January 22, 2018Mighty Ducks show is being developed for cable or streaming.”


"In that case, yes, of course, I'll be a part of that."
"So we may get a clearer version of the quack hymn."
"Hercules duck series may be on TV!"
ABC's signature studio is developing a series based on a franchise in the 1990s, the source told Hollywood Reporter
"Although there is no Internet connection, former trilogy writer Steven Brill and former producer Jordan Kerner are reported to have contacted ABC's signature head Tracy Underwood to create the series."
"The report also said that the show will not be sold out soon. The original 1992 stars Emilio Estevez (Gordon Mumbai) and Joshua Jackson (Charlie Conway) have not been attached yet Not yet. "
"However, it doesn't stop fans from getting very excited about the news on twitter."
"Wow, a big duck TV play is in production That was my childhood. "
“... pic.twitter.com/RjpZbnooMn -Skyler Shuler (@ skylerhxc) January 22, 2018 if you coach Josh Jackson, the only way to have a strong duck series is to succeed. "
"Barbarella (@ youthinkmemad) is developing" duck show "for cable TV or streaming media on January 22, 2018."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow the AllAboutTRH Podcast on iTunes & Soundcloud – Remember to Rate, Comment & Subscribe!”
“He wasn’t really the man I thought he was if he did what he did to me.”In fact, Vicki says if she could talk to Brooks one on one she’d ask him one question: why?”
“Ultimately, it was revealed that Brooks never had cancer and was never treated by City of Hope Medical Center.”
“I’ve never been able to get the answer from him.”If you don’t remember Brooks faked cancer and showed off fake cancer documents to the media and Vicki’s RHOC co-stars in hopes of shutting down doubts about his health.”
“I still don’t know why.”
““We had a good thing going, or so I thought, but why?”
“Why did you do what you did to me?” Vicki explained.”
““Why did you reveal bad records?”
“He did a lot of weird ass crazy things that I still don’t understand because I don’t talk to him.”She added, “I don’t know why he did what he did, but he wasn’t a monster.”
“Like AllAboutTRH On Facebook.”


"Follow allaboutthh podcasts on iTunes and Soundcloud - remember ratings, reviews and subscriptions!"
"If he does something to me, he's not the person I think he is." In fact, Wiki said that if she could talk to Brooks one-on-one, she would ask him a question: "why?"
"In the end, it turned out that Brooks had never had cancer and had never been treated at the city of Hope Medical Center."
"I haven't been able to get an answer from him," he said. "If you don't remember Brooks faking cancer, showing fake cancer documents to the media, Wiki's RhoC co starred, hoping to dispel people's doubts about his health."
"I still don't know why."
"We had a good time, or I think so, but why?"
"Why are you doing this to me? "Wiki explained
"Why do you leak bad records?"
"He did a lot of strange things, and I still don't understand, because I don't talk to him." She added, "I don't know why he did it, but he's not a monster."
"It's like allaboutthh on Facebook."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She posted a photo of Gomez and Raisa on Instagram, saying, “Selena gained a kidney, I was able to keep my little girl, but I also gained another daughter.””
““I couldn’t get up without having someone help me.”
“Gomez also revealed that one of her best friends, Francia Raisa, had donated the kidney for the transplant.”
“Now, months later, Francia Raisa has opened up about her tough recovery from the surgery.”
“Back in 2015, Gomez revealed that she suffers from lupus.”
“And since then, she’s had to take several breaks to focus on her health.”
“The surgery happened in the summer of 2017.”
“And while both friends seem to be doing well now, it certainly seems like the overall experience was pretty scary.”
“In November, Gomez attended the Lupus Research Alliance Annual Gala, where she opened up about her struggle, saying that “it actually got to a point where it was life-or-death” before her surgery.”
““Thankfully, one of my best friends gave me her kidney and it was the ultimate gift of life.”


She posted a picture of Gomez and Lisa on instagram, saying: "Selena got a kidney, I can keep my little daughter, but I also got another daughter."
"I can't get up without help."
"Gomez also revealed that one of her best friends, Francia Raisa, donated a kidney for the transplant."
Today, a few months later, Francia Risha reveals her difficult recovery from surgery
"As early as 2015, Gomez revealed that he had lupus."
"Since then, she has had to rest a few times and focus on her health."
"The operation took place in the summer of 2017."
"Although both friends are doing well now, on the whole, their experience is really terrible."
In November last year, Gomez attended the annual meeting of the lupus research alliance. At the meeting, she disclosed her struggle. She said that before the operation, she had "in fact reached the point of life and death."
"Thank goodness, a good friend of mine gave me her kidney, which is the ultimate gift of life."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But - hey!”
“Like it or not, however, the movie also features human beings speaking lines of dialogue and not just gigantic creatures punching each other in their mammoth mouths.”
“Godzilla vs. Kong's (Human) Cast and CharactersMega-monster prizefight Godzilla vs. Kong, which will be released in North America on March 31 (both in theaters and on HBO Max), will feature a chaotic clash between two cinematic titans in a brutal brawl-to-settle-it-all.”
“"But we're aware that some players want a less brutal experience.”
“"A major part of Rust has always been its hardcore, ruthless PvP and will continue to be," Facepunch Studio's blog post about the new game mode reads.”
“Rust Adds Softcore Mode to Help 'More Casual Players'Facepunch Studios has added a new Softcore mode to Rust aimed at a more casual player base.”
“Samsung has one of those lovely sales on right now, now that you mention it, and it's quite a doozy.”
“Thankfully, we can continue to fight this problem with a never-ending stack of storage solutions, and more specifically, the cheap ones we pick up during big sales.”
“Even outside of gaming, it's hard to store even a few photos on your laptop with it starting to sweat.”
“Incredible Sale on Solid State Drives and More at Samsung Right NowThe never-ending battle between gaming and storage continues to rage even until this day, and it will likely rage far into the future.”


"But - Hey!"
"Like it or not, the movie is also about human dialogue, not just giant creatures punching each other with mammoth mouths."
"Godzilla vs. Kong (both in theaters and on HBO max), which will be released in North America on March 31, will play a chaotic conflict between the two movie stars to solve all this."
"But we realize that some players want a less brutal experience."
"A major part of rust has always been its iron, ruthless PVP, and will continue," facepunch studio's blog about the new game mode wrote
"Rust added soft core mode to help 'more casual players'. Facepunch studio has added a new soft core model to rust, aiming to create a more casual player group. "
"Since you mentioned Samsung, its sales are very good now. It's great."
"Thankfully, we can continue to solve this problem with a bunch of never-ending storage solutions, more specifically, the cheap solutions we bought at the big sale."
"Even outside the game, it's hard for your laptop to store a few photos because it's already sweating."
"Samsung's current sales of SSDs and other products are incredible, and the endless war between games and storage continues to this day, and is likely to continue into the distant future."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“His movie “The Pact,” with John Cena and Leslie Mann, is scheduled to hit theaters next spring.”
“The final season of “The Mindy Project” will premiere in September on Hulu.”
““I have found it’s hard to command respect while in a neck brace,” he added.”
“...begun filming...”
“Luckily on The Mindy Project I play a character who could break his neck falling out of his bunk bed and it s completely believable Barinholtz directed an episode of the show s sixth and final season which has already...”
““After the accident, I talked to Mindy [Kaling] and we agreed that the only option was writing it into the show,” he told People.”
“Conveniently for Barinholtz, the brace has been incorporated into his storyline as ex-con and nurse Morgan Tookers on the next season of “The Mindy Project.” The look should easily fit in with the essence of his eccentric oddball character.”
“Per doctor’s orders, he has to keep his neck stabilized until the fractures heal.”
“Ike Barinholtz is recovering after he broke his neck while filming the upcoming movie “The Pact.”While shooting a falling stunt from a high platform on set five weeks ago, Barinholtz fractured cervical vertebrae in his neck on impact.”


His film contract, with John seiner and Leslie Mann, is scheduled to be released next spring
"The final season of project Mindy will premiere in Hulu in September."
"I find it hard to win respect with a neck brace," he added
“… Start shooting... "
"Fortunately, in Mindy project, I played a role of falling off a bunk bed and breaking my neck. Barry Holtz directed an episode of the sixth and final season of the play, which is totally believable..."
"After the accident, I talked to Mindy (Carlin) and we agreed that the only choice was to put it on the show," he told people
For Barry Holtz, the scaffold has been easily integrated into his story of playing former prisoner and nurse Morgan tux in the next season of project Mindy. It should be easy to match the nature of his eccentric character
"According to the doctor's instructions, he must keep the neck stable until the fracture heals."
Ike barinholtz, who broke his neck while filming the upcoming film the pact, is recovering. Five weeks ago, when he was filming a high-altitude falling stunt on set, he fractured his neck and cervical vertebra due to impact



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When he wants to tell me something bad, he says it in my accent so I can't be mean.'”
“I laugh all the time.”
“The Modern Family star shared a series of shots from her wedding with her 10.8 million Instagram followers Tuesday to honor her first anniversary to Magic Mike actor Joe Manganiello, 39.”
“Vergara, 44, wrote: 'Happy First Anniversary love of my life ... nothing compares to you ... te amo ...”
“I will never forget that face,' accompanied by emojis of hearts and happy faces.”
“Scroll down for video One year in the books Sofia Vergara 44 shared her wedding shots on her one year anniversary to Joe Manganiello 39 Tuesday Dancing queen Sofia is having the time of her life in this shot from the swanky party Husband material Manganiello waits for his beautiful...”
“...bride in this shot from the ceremony Awww...”
“Flower girls dot the aisle ahead of the stars exchanging vows with one another Among the shots included Sofia walking down the wedding aisle with the Sabotage star the stunning couple dancing at the reception the flower girls walking down the aisle and a shot of the True Blood actor...”
“...waiting for his bride...”
“The gorgeous TV star and Pittsburgh native exchanged vows November 22, 2015 in a luxurious $3 million wedding at the The Breakers resort in Palm Beach, Florida.”


"When he wants to tell me something bad, he says it in my accent so I won't be mean."
"I've been laughing."
"The modern family star shared a series of wedding photos with 10.8 million instagram fans on Tuesday to mark the first anniversary of her marriage to magic Mike actor Joe manganiello, 39."
"Vergara, 44, wrote:" happy first anniversary of my life's love... There's nothing like you... T'amo... "
"I'll never forget that face," the face accompanied by inner emotion and happiness
"Rolling down a year's video in the book, Sofia Vergara 44 shares her wedding photo on her first anniversary with Joe manganiello.39 on Tuesday, the Dancing Queen Sofia is enjoying the time of her life. This photo comes from the fashionable party material manganiello is waiting for his beauty..."
“… The bride at the wedding
"Flower girls exchange vows with each other on the aisle in front of the stars, including Sophia and the star of destruction walking in the aisle of the wedding, amazing couples dancing at the reception, flower girls walking in the aisle, and a scene of the hero of true love as blood..."
“… Waiting for his bride... "
"The beautiful TV star and Pittsburgh natives held a $3 million luxury wedding on November 22, 2015 at the breakers resort in Palm Beach, Florida, with mutual vows."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Morgan is wearing a custom Joseph Abboud suit.”
“FYI: Kelsea is wearing a Kristian Aadnevik gown, Stuart Weitzman shoes, a Tyler Ellis clutch, and Roberto Bravo jewelry.”
“Kelsea is set to perform during the show and she is also nominated for two awards – Female Vocalist of the Year and Video of the Year for “Legends.”Kelsea will perform her song “I Hate Love Songs” and she says it’s one of her biggest televised performances to date!”
“The 24-year-old country singer got married to Morgan, 32, this past December.”
“Kelsea Ballerini and her new husband Morgan Evans are so cute while walking the red carpet as newlyweds at the 2018 Academy of Country Music Awards on Sunday (April 15) at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas.”


"Morgan is wearing a custom Joseph abed suit."
"For reference only: Kelsey is wearing Christian adnevick's dress, Stuart weizman's shoes, Taylor Ellis's handbag and Roberto Bravo's jewelry."
"Kelsey will perform during the show, and she has been nominated for two awards - female singer of the year and Legend video of the year." Kelsey will perform her song "I hate love songs," which she says is one of her biggest TV shows to date
The 24-year-old country singer married Morgan, 32, last December
"Kelsey Ballerini and her new husband, Morgan Evans, walked the red carpet as newlyweds at the 2018 Academy of country music awards ceremony at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas on Sunday (April 15)," he said



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Next to Joe Torre and your best friend since you were 4. pic.twitter.com/wTOSDOXu5J — xoxo, Gaga (@ladygaga) October 25, 2017”
“...pic.twitter.com/mxrNF1NFwq — Rob Lowe (@RobLowe) October 24, 2017When you got the best seat in the house.”
“@Dodgers, #WorldSeries sitting with the GOAT.”
“#dodgers #worldseries #pixel2 #astros A post shared by Omar (@omarbensonmiller) on Oct 24, 2017 at 7:08pm PDTIf Heaven is real, it's probably something like this.”
“@Dodgers #WorldSeries #GameOne #LA A post shared by Mario Lopez (@mariolopezextra) on Oct 24, 2017 at 6:29pm PDTNo matter who takes the game, we already won!”
“Oct 24 2017 at 6 42pm PDT A post shared by Ken Jeong kenjeong on Oct 24 2017 at 6 47pm PDT Nico I gettin the crowd hyped...”
“A post shared by Seth MacFarlane macfarlaneseth on Oct 24 2017 at 6 32pm PDT Honored to be asked to wave dodgers flag before game 1 of the worldseries mariolopezextra was waving it with me chingon Repost mlbdodgers2017 georgelopez 10 24 17 A post shared by George Lopez georgelopez on...”
“Jeong Val Kilmer Jimmy Kimmel George Lopez Mario Lopez Rob Lowe Members of Maroon 5 James Marsden Seth McFarlane Omar Miller Brett Ratner Jerry Seinfeld Kate Upton They told me this was Sound of Music Live but the World Series is cool too...”
“...a record setting WS Way too early 2018 power rankings Odds to win 2018 World Series Schedule Complete coverage Among the celebrities in attendance Tuesday night at Game 1 fans might spot Kareem Abdul Jabbar Jason Bateman Larry David Kirsten Dunst Ari Emmanuel Lady Gaga Arsenio Hall Dustin Hoffman Ken...”
“2017 World Series Here s everything you need to know about Houston s win over L A Astros win first World Series title Astros embrace enjoy their moment Correa proposes on field after WS win L A did everything right until Game 7 How the Astros dominated Darvish 2017 produced...”


"Next to Joe Torre and your best friend since you were four. pic.twitter.com/wTOSDOXu5J -XOXO, Gaga (@ ladygaga) October 25, 2017 "
“... pic.twitter.com/mxrnff1nfwq -Rob Lowe (@ roblowe) October 24, 2017, when you get the best seat at home. "
"@ the Dodgers, the world series, and the goats."
"If heaven is true, it may be like this post that # Dodgers # worldseries # pixel2 # Astros Omar (@ omarbensonmiller) shared on pdtif at 7:08 pm on October 24, 2017."
"@ Dodgers # worldseries # gameone # La Mario Lopez (@ mariolopezextra) shared a post at 6:29 p.m. on October 24, 2017. No matter who participates in the game, we have won!"
"Nico I gettin, a post shared by Ken Jeong at 6:42 p.m. on October 24, 2017, publicized in the crowd..."
"Seth McFarlane mcfarrance Seth shared a blog post on October 24, 2017 at 6:32 p.m. Pacific Daylight Time. It's a great honor to be asked to wave the flag of the Dodgers before the first game of the world series. Mario pezestra and I waved it. Chingon repeat mlbdodgers 2017 georgopoez 10 24 17 George Lopez George Lopez in "The blog post shared on the Internet."
"James Marsden Seth McFarlane Omar Miller Brett Ratner Jerry Seinfeld Kate Upton, a member of Jeong Val Kilmer Jimmy Kimmel George Lopez Mario Lopez rob low maroon 5, told me it was live music, but the world series was cool too..."
“… A record setting way too early in the 2018 power rankings to win the 2018 World Series schedule to attend on Tuesday night in the first game fans may find Karim abdeljabal Jason Bateman Larry David Kirsten Dunst Ali Emmanuel Lady Gaga Arsenio haldastin Hoffmann celebrity full coverage... "
"In the 2017 world series, here's all you need to know about Houston beating the Los Angeles astrologers to win the first World Series champion. Astrologers embrace and enjoy their moment. Correa proposed that after the scene, WS won Los Angeles and do everything right until Game 7, astrologers dominated Darwish, and in 2017



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Drop a comment below.”
“), Nick and Jess begin contemplating marriage.”
“Fox on Thursday announced that the seventh and final season will begin airing on Tuesday, April 10 at 9:30/8:30c.”
“The abbreviated eight-episode run will then air uninterrupted for six weeks, leading up to the one-hour series finale on Tuesday, May 15 at 9/8c.”
“(FWIW, your math isn’t wrong.”
“The network will inevitably air back-to-back episodes at some point before the finale.)”
“As previously reported, Season 7 kicks off with a four-year time jump.”
“After returning from a European book tour (that Julius Pepperwood novel must have really taken off!”
“Potentially complicating matters is Jess’ decision to take a job working for ex-boyfriend Russell (again played by Dermot Mulroney).”
“Are you looking forward to the final season of New Girl?”


"Comment below."
”Nick and Jess began to think about getting married
Fox announced on Thursday that the seventh and final season will begin at 9:30 / 8:30 on Tuesday, April 10
"The eight episode film will be broadcast for six weeks until the one hour finale on Tuesday, May 15, at 9 / 8."
"(fwiw, you're right in math."
"At some point before the end of the show, it's inevitable that the TV network will continue to broadcast some series."
"As previously reported, the seventh season starts with a jump of four years."
"When you come back from your European book tour (that Julius pepperwood novel must be a best seller!"
"Jess's decision to work for ex boyfriend Russell (played by demort muroni) could complicate things."
"Are you looking forward to the last season of new girl?"



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But “Red Sparrow” is an espionage thriller that’s more clever than it first appears.”
“We brace ourselves for another cliché: the tale of two spies who swoon for each other — and who, by the way, is using whom?”
“But as soon as her dancing days end, she learns that she’s going to be stripped of her health insurance and the apartment.”
“To Western eyes, Dominika lives in a very modest flat, which she shares with her mother (Joely Richardson), whom she’s devoted to taking care of.”
“We also learn that when her fury flies, there will be blood.”
“It’s here that she confronts what it means to be a pawn in the ruthless new Russian state (the same, it seems, as the old state).”
“But her career is cut short by a horrific on-stage collision (not an accident, as we soon discover).”
“Dominika starts off as a prima ballerina with the Bolshoi Ballet, dancing before the glitterati of Moscow in a costume of resplendent red and gold.”
“The movie is a thriller, but it’s also a kind of sexualized nightmare, and that’s the boldness of it.”
“...chess move at a time...”


"But red sparrow is a spy thriller, smarter than when it first appeared."
"We're ready for another clich é: the story of two spies falling for each other - who's using who, by the way?"
"But as soon as her dancing days are over, she knows she's going to be deprived of health insurance and an apartment."
In the eyes of Westerners, Dominica lives in a very humble apartment. She lives with her mother (Jolie Richardson). She has always been committed to taking care of her mother
"We also learned that when she was angry, there was blood."
"It's here that she's faced with what the chessmen of the ruthless new Russian state (which seems to be the same as the old one) means."
"But her career was interrupted by a terrible onstage collision (which we will soon find out is not an accident)."
Dominica started as the chief ballerina of the ballet company of the Moscow Grand Theatre, dancing in gorgeous red and gold costumes in front of the glittering dancers in Moscow
"This movie is a thriller, but it's also a sexual nightmare. That's its boldness."
“… A game of chess... "



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Muschietti talked about some of what to expect from Chapter 2 in this EW interview after the debut of It.”
“All of the Losers will have traumas that linger from their youth in Derry, and the resurrection of Pennywise serves as the catalyst for dealing with the more mundane monsters who plague them in adulthood.”
“Those who know King’s book are aware that although Beverly survived her first encounter with Pennywise, and her abusive father, she carries with her deep, invisible wounds that have led her to another toxic relationship.”
“Sophia Lillis played the young Bev Marsh in the original, and she would also return for the sequel, performing new scenes as the character in flashback.”
“Bill Skarsgård is also set to return as the malevolent clown — one of It’s favorite forms.”
“Variety first reported that Chastain is in talks for the film, which is scheduled for release in September 2019.”
“Now that It stands as the highest grossing horror film of all time, with $700 million in earnings worldwide, things are pretty real.”
“Chastain previously worked with Muschietti on the 2013 horror film Mama, and during post-production on It, the filmmaker told EW he hoped to recruit her to the Losers’ Club if the sequel became a reality.”
“...nearly 27 years later to face the evil shapeless presence they defeated as children...”
“Ever since New Line announced that King s epic 1986 novel would be split into two parts it has been obvious to most people including director Andy Muschietti that Chastain would be perfect to play the grown up Bev who returns to the town of Derry with her fellow Losers...”


"Maschetti talked about some of the second chapter in this EW interview."
"All the losers will live through the traumas of their youth in Delhi, and the resurrection of pennywis is the catalyst for dealing with the more mundane monsters that torment them as adults."
"Those who know the king's book know that although Beverly survived her first encounter with pennywis and her abusive father, she had deep, invisible wounds that led to another toxic relationship."
"Sophia Lillis plays the young bevmarsh in the original, and she will come back in the sequel to perform new scenes as a character in flashback."
"Bill scarsgarde will also return as a vicious clown - one of the most popular forms."
Variety first reported that chastan was negotiating for the film, which is due to be released in September 2019
"Now it has become the highest box office horror film ever, with global revenue of $700 million. Everything is true."
"Chastan had worked with maschetti on the 2013 horror film" Mom ". In the post production process, the director told EW that if the sequel becomes a reality, he hopes to recruit her to join the losers club."
“… Nearly 27 years later, in the face of the invisible existence of the evil they defeated as a child
"Since the new source announced that the king's 1986 epic novel will be divided into two parts, most people, including director Andy maschetti, have clearly seen that chastan will be the perfect person to play the grown-up Bev, who will return to Delhi with her losers..."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Smart kid."”
“"Tried to convince Haven that today was Christmas and Santa forgot about her but she saw right through it," he added.”
“Merry Christmas Eve!!"”
“"I'm having a moment.”
“"This years holiday card ... last one where I'll be the only dude in the photo," he wrote.”
“On Christmas Eve, Warren posted on his Instagram page a photo of their family's 2017 Christmas card, which shows him, Alba and their daughters, Honor, 9, and Haven, 6, sitting and wearing matching red holiday pajamas.”
“She announced in October that they are expecting a baby boy, who will be their first son.”
“The actress revealed in July that she is pregnant with her and husband Cash Warren's third child.”
“Jessica Alba is celebrating her final Christmas as a mother of two.”


"Smart kid."
"Trying to convince HARVIN that it's Christmas and Santa forgot her, but she saw through it," he added
"Happy Christmas Eve!"
"I have time."
"This year's holiday card... I was the only one in the last picture, "he wrote
"On Christmas Eve, Warren posted a picture of his family's 2017 Christmas card on instagram. In the picture, Warren, alba and their daughters, 9-year-old honor and 6-year-old Harwin, are sitting in matching red holiday pajamas."
"She announced in October that they were going to have a baby boy, who would be their first son."
"The actress revealed in July that she was pregnant with her third child with her husband, Cash Warren."
"Jessica Alba is celebrating her last Christmas as a mother of two."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“The whole family also poses together for a selfie with Monroe laying in the hospital bed and holding her bundle of joy.”
“Ashley Monroe and baseball player John Danks welcomed their first child, a baby boy, the country singer announced on Friday, August 4.”
““Welcome to the world, love of my life.”
“Dalton William Danks,” the 30-year-old songstress captioned an Instagram slideshow.”
“Welcome to the world, love of my life.”
“Dalton William Danks.”
“❤️ A post shared by Ashley Monroe (@ashleymonroemusic) on Aug 4, 2017 at 6:08am PDTIn the first pic, the adorable little boy sleeps with his hands above his head.”
“In another photo, the proud dad, 32, smiles and holds Dalton, who is swaddled in a blanket and wearing a hat, at the hospital.”
“The Pistol Annies singer previously revealed that she was pregnant on Christmas Day 2016 by sharing a photo of her ultrasound on Instagram.”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
"The whole family also posed for a self portrait together. Monroe was lying on the bed, holding her bundle of joy."
On Friday, August 4, country singer Ashley Monroe and baseball player John Danks announced that they had their first child, a baby boy
"Welcome to this world, the love of my life."
"Dalton William Danks," the 30-year-old singer wrote on an instagram slide
"Welcome to this world, the love of my life."
"Dalton William Danks."
“ ❤️  Ashley Monroe (@ ashleymonroemousic) shared a post at 6:08 am on August 4, 2017. In the first picture, the lovely little boy fell asleep with his hands above his head. "
"In another photo, the proud 32 year old father smiles and hugs Dalton in a hat wrapped in a blanket in the hospital."
"Pistol Annies singer previously shared her ultrasound photos on instagram, revealing that she was pregnant on Christmas 2016."



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Don t Wanna Live Forever Gorgeous Look What You Made Me Do Jingle Bell Ball 2017 Rita Ora Niall Horan James Arthur And More Bring Their Fashion A Game To The Red Carpet...”
“We knew there would be some fan love on Twitter but boy did you lot go HAM about Tay Tay Taylor Swift is absolutely amazing at the CapitalJBB TOM PickeringTj December 10 2017 Taylor Swift Jingle Bell Ball 2017 Set List Ready For It Blank Space Shake It Off I”
“...encrusted snake microphone in hand and look cool AF”
“London s O2 was lit up with smartphones filming the pop legend and combined with the voices of thousands of her fans singing every word to her biggest and best hits it made for one seriously magical atmosphere What other artist can perform an entire live set with a gem...”
“...and 'Blank Space', Tay showcased exactly why she's one of the most loved artists on the entire planet as she owned the stage from start to finish.”
“Your First Look Backstage At The Jingle Bell Ball 2017Bursting straight into hits like 'Ready For It?'”
“> AAA Pass At The Ready?”
“Backed by her trusty dance crew, Taylor was welcomed onto the stage by the loudest cheer from the 16,000 screaming fans and it made for one heck of an opening!”
“She's one of the world's most loved performers and Taylor Swift brought all her style and sass to Capital's Jingle Bell Ball with Coca Cola as she opened the second night of the UK's biggest Christmas party.”
“Taylor Swift OWNED The #CapitalJBB Stage & Brought All Her Biggest Hits For This Iconic PerformanceShe certainly lived up to her reputation!”


"I don't want to be gorgeous forever. Look what you've made me do. Rita Ola Neal Holland James Arthur and more people bring their fashion games to the red carpet in 2017."
"We know there will be some fans' love on twitter, but boy, you have a lot of going ham about tye tye Taylor Swift is absolutely amazing at capital jbb Tom Pickering December 10, 2017 tyle swift tinkle bell ball 2017 set list for it to get rid of it blank I"
“… It looks cool with a snake microphone in your hand. "
"O2 in London is lit up by the smart phones that shoot popular legends, plus the songs of thousands of fans, every word is sung to her greatest and best works, creating a serious and magical atmosphere. Other artists can use a gem to perform the whole scene..."
“… And 'blank space', Tai shows the exact reason why she is one of the most popular artists on the planet because she owns the stage from start to finish
"For the first time, you watched" bell, bell, bell "2017 backstage and went straight to" are you ready? "
"> are AAA passes ready?"
With the support of her trusted dance team, taylor made it to the stage amid the cheers of 16000 screaming fans. It's a great start
"She is one of the most popular performers in the world, and Taylor Swift brought all her style and fun to the capital's jingle ball with Coca Cola when she opened the second night of the largest Christmas party in Britain."
"Taylor Swift has the capital jbb stage, bringing all her hits to this iconic show. Of course she has lived up to her reputation



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"Thank you guys so much for sharing my broken heart with me," she said while becoming the first artist to win the most ACMs ever with 30 victories, breaking her tie with country’s greatest duo Brooks & Dunn.”
“Earlier in the evening, Miranda won ‘Song of the Year’ for "Tin Man."”
“Praise Jesus, thank y'all."”
“"Thank you so, so much.”
“I dedicate everything I have to it and for y'all to care so much about what I'm doing, I will never, ever take it for granted," Miranda shared with the audience.”
“It is my entire life.”
“I love country music.”
“Thank you so much.”
“I really can't.”
“Getty ImagesUpon collecting her award Miranda declared, “I cannot believe this…”"I cannot believe this.”


"Thank you so much for sharing my broken heart with me," she said, also becoming the first artist to win the most ACMS with 30 wins, breaking her ties with America's greatest groups Brooks and Dunn
Earlier in the evening, Miranda won "song of the year" for "Tin Man"
"Praise Jesus, thank you."
"Thank you very much."
Miranda shared with the audience, "I've dedicated everything I have to this film, and I'll never take it for granted that you care so much about what I'm doing."
"This is my life."
"I love country music."
"Thank you very much."
"I really can't."
"Getty imagesupon announced when he received the award," Miranda said, "I can't believe this..." "I can't believe this."



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The Crown” Season 2 streams Dec. 8 on Netflix.”
““Matthew Goode is incredible.”
“She finds her salvation in [Snowdon], who is the antithesis of her life and past.”Snowdon has a significant effect on Margaret when it comes to her “sense of place in the world,” Kirby continues.”
“That’s why she finds someone very distinctly unroyal, that’s not approved by the establishment, that’s not aristocratic.”
““She’s attempting to define herself in contrary to it.”
““It’s more about how Margaret is wrestling with remaining part of her family and not having a choice of the way she wants to live her life — the man and the children she would have had,” Kirby says of the emotional journey.”
“...while still wanting to be normal and a modern woman In the second season her forward motion as a somewhat unwilling princess straining at the confines of royal responsibility are front and center...”
“He encapsulated everything Margaret was trying to discover in season one which was anti establishment anti royal and made her feel at least temporarily more complete For Kirby a continued challenge comes to portraying Princess Margaret in that duality of being so essentially royal and part of this old establishment...”
“She’s actually meeting somebody when she’s still extremely wounded and so is he, as we later discover,” Kirby tells Variety.”
“Of course, what happens if and when Elizabeth cannot give Philip the attention he needs will undoubtedly add to the marital tension felt within the second season.”


The second season of crown was broadcast on Netflix on December 8
"Matthew Goodall is incredible."
"She found her own salvation in (Snowden), and Snowden is the opposite of her life and the past." "Snowden had an important influence on Margaret's sense of world status," Kirby continued
"That's why she found a very obviously unpopular person, not recognized by those in power, not aristocratic."
"She tried to define herself in the opposite way."
"It's more about how Margaret fights the rest of her family than about choosing the lifestyle she wants - the men and children she should have," Kirby said of the emotional journey
“… Although she still wants to be a normal modern woman in the second season, as a reluctant princess, her efforts to move forward within the scope of Royal responsibility are positive and Central... "
"He summed up what Marguerite tried to discover in the first season, that is, anti Royal and anti Royal things, which made her feel that at least for the time being, it was a more complete and continuous challenge for Kirby to portray Princess Margaret. In this duality, she was essentially Royal and a part of the old royal family..."
Kirby told variety magazine: "in fact, she was meeting someone who was seriously injured, and so was he, and we found out later."
"Of course, if Elizabeth can't give Philip the attention he needs, what will happen, which will undoubtedly aggravate the marital tension felt in the second season."



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Season 5”
“You have to admire the strange moxie it took, for HBO to put together a half-hour sex comedy, starring Sarah Jessica Parker and two other women in their 30s (and one in her 40s), run by gay men.”
“Ten years and two movies later, the show has ceded its cultural prominence, as a new generation fixes its eyes on an entirely different kind of aspirationalism.”
“What that aspiration is, exactly, isn’t yet clear, but the days when thousands, if not millions, of young women trained their gaze on a city life of flashy careers and upscale brunches and fabulous parties seem decidedly over.”
“If, of course, they ever existed in the first place.”
“There’s no doubt that Sex and the City had some pretty hefty cultural influence, elevating once-niche luxury brands to household-name status, serving as inspiration for countless blogs and articles about dating and city life and, anecdotally anyway, leading to a huge uptick in brunching.”
“But really, who knows how many people actually followed the show's siren call to Manhattan, only to face inevitable disappointment.”
“A decade later, those trends are largely gone, but there’s still the show—this great, thrilling, maddening, occasionally dumb show.”
“As a longtime fan of the show who hadn t watched an episode in some time owing to exhaustion I probably tore through the whole series at least twice in 2005 and 2006 I decided to re watch the entire thing recently to see how it looks now that its...”
“...of the moment modernness has given way to vintage charm...”


"Season five"
"You have to admire HBO for spending so much time making a half-hour sex comedy starring Sarah Jessica Parker and two other women in their 30s (and a woman in her 40s), run by gay men."
"In the two films ten years later, with the new generation focusing on a completely different kind of idealism, the play has given up its prominent position in culture."
"It's not clear what this desire is, but it seems that the days when thousands (if not millions) of young women are looking to city life are over, full of flashy careers, high-end brunches and wonderful parties."
"Of course, if they existed in the first place."
"There is no doubt that" sex and the city "has a considerable cultural influence. It has promoted the former niche luxury brand to a household name, inspired countless blogs and articles about dating and city life, and, in any case, led to a sharp rise in brunch."
"But seriously, who knows how many people actually come to Manhattan with the sound of the show's siren, but inevitably face disappointment."
"Ten years later, these trends are basically gone, but there's still this great, exciting, crazy, occasionally stupid show."
"As a long-term TV fan, I may have read the whole TV series at least twice in 2005 and 2006. Recently, I decided to watch it again to see what it looks like now, because it is..."
“…… Now, the modern has been replaced by the charm of retro.... "



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The singer and footballer shared a collection of photos and videos from their adventurous jaunt to China, kicking things off with Wilson running a football camp.”
“WATCH: Ciara Drops More Than 20lbs After Giving Birth to Daughter Sienna“Teaching the kids to ‘MakeEmMiss’ all the way in China with @Nike,” wrote the 28-year-old athlete, before sharing a video showing him leading the kids in a sprint.”
“The youngsters appeared to be having a blast, despite Wilson saying that some locals had been wary about American football being played in China.”
““The coolest part of Shanghai is the love of sports here,” he said in a video posted on Instagram.”
“Encouraging these young kids about football and going outside the box it s been interesting because American football is such a physical sport and here in China they ve been talking about Maybe they re too small and it s not the case A lot of people said I was...”
“...too small Wilson added...”
““So there’s a huge lift, encouragement, involvement and growth of kids wanting to play football here and it’s really exciting to bring football to China.”
“Exciting times!”NEWS: Ciara and Russell Wilson Celebrate 1-Year Wedding AnniversaryNext, Wilson hit the Great Wall of China, leading a bunch of budding footballers in a run along the iconic wall.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
The singer and footballer shared a set of photos and videos of their adventure trip to China, starting Wilson's summer football camp
"Observation: Sheila lost more than 20 pounds after giving birth to her daughter Siena," the 28 year old athlete wrote before sharing a video: "use @ Nike to teach children all the way to make emmiss in China."
"Although Wilson said that some local people are cautious about the development of American football in China, these young people seem very excited."
"The coolest part of Shanghai is the love of sports," he said in a video posted on instagram
"It's interesting to encourage these young people to learn football and jump out of the penalty area, because American football is a sport. In China, they have been talking about it all the time. Maybe they are too young. Many people say I'm not like this..."
“… It's too small, Wilson added
"Therefore, the children who hope to play here have been greatly inspired, encouraged, participated and grown up. It's really exciting to bring football to China."
"Exciting moment! News: Sheila and Russell Wilson celebrate their first wedding anniversary. Next, Wilson ran into the great wall of China and led a group of fledgling football players running along the iconic Great Wall



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“More From WWD:Met Museum Responds to Celebs Smoking at the Costume Institute GalaHeartworks Gala Raises $1.2 Million for Marfan FoundationIndochino Bolsters Management Team...”
“More than 30 protestors have died.”
“The country has been plunged into chaos by his economic policies, with people starving, medical supplies running out and countless demonstrations calling for his resignation.”
“Herrera’s Instagram post was the most outspoken the Venezuelan-born designer has been publicly about the government of President Nicolás Maduro.”
“The family requests privacy as they grieve,” said a spokeswoman for Carolina Herrera when reached for comment Saturday.”
“They are not available for further comment.”
““Carolina and Reinaldo Herrera and their family are deeply devastated by this tragedy.”
“According to reports, Reinaldo Herrera, 34, and his colleague Fabrizio Mendoza, 31, were discovered Thursday after an apparent kidnapping in an abandoned vehicle on a highway that connects Caracas to the Caribbean coast.”
“The Communist Dictatorship must go,” Herrera wrote in a post on her brand’s Instagram account, @houseofherrera, which has 1.7 million followers.”
“The Electoral Results must be respected.”


"More from the Metropolitan Museum responding to celebrity smoking at galahartworks Party of Fashion College, raising $1.2 million for Marfan foundation Indochina sponsorship management team..."
"More than 30 protestors have died."
"Because of his economic policy, the country was in chaos, people were starving, medical supplies were exhausted, and countless demonstrations demanded his resignation."
"Herrera's post on instagram is the most outspoken of the Venezuelan born designer's public talk about President Maduro's government."
"Family members are asking for privacy in grief," a spokeswoman for Carolina erera said Saturday when contacted for comment
"No further comment is available at this time."
"The state of Carolina and Renaldo erera and their families were deeply destroyed by this tragedy."
"Renaldo Herrera, 34, and his colleague Fabrizio Mendoza, 31, were reported to have been found in an abandoned car on a highway linking Caracas with the Caribbean coast on Thursday
"The Communist dictatorship has to end," Herrera wrote in a post on its brand instagram account @ house of herera, which has 1.7 million followers
"The results of the election must be respected."



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Ben Affleck and Lindsay Shookus | Credit: Eric Jamison/Invision/AP”
““They were all chatting and laughing.”
“Ben Affleck Was in a 'Great Mood' While Bonding with Lindsay Shookus' Parents: SourceThe more the merrier!”
“Ben Affleck and Lindsay Shookus were seen going out to dinner with the producer’s parents in Santa Monica, California, on Saturday night.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Justice League actor, 45, dressed casually for the family outing, wearing a leather jacket, dark t-shirt, jeans and sneakers.”
“Shookus, 38, also opted for a low-key ensemble, wearing a light pink sweater, a pair of ripped jeans and white heels.”
“According to an onlooker, the whole group enjoyed a two-hour dinner while sitting on the patio at Cassia, a restaurant that serves Southeast Asian cuisine.”
“Image zoom Credit: X17online.com“Ben was in a great mood,” the eyewitness tells PEOPLE of the outing.”
““Lindsay seemed very happy to have her parents here.”As for Affleck’s connection with the Shookus family, “You could tell Ben gets along great with her parents,” the eyewitness remarks.”


"Image zooming Ben Affleck and Lindsay shookus | source: Eric Jamison / invision / AP"
"They're all talking and laughing."
"Ben Affleck is in a good mood with Lindsay schokus' parents: the more sources, the better!"
On Saturday night, Ben Affleck and Lindsay schokus were seen eating out with the producer's parents in Santa Monica, California
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The Justice League actor, 45, dressed casually on family outings in leather jackets, dark T-shirts, jeans and sneakers."
"Shookus, 38, also chose a low-key fit, wearing a light pink sweater, a pair of ripped jeans and white high heels."
"According to a bystander, the group sat on the terrace of Cassia restaurant, which serves Southeast Asian food, for two hours for dinner."
"Image zooming: x17 online" Ben is in a good mood, "witnesses told people
"Lindsay seems happy to have her parents here." As for the relationship between Affleck and the shawkes, "you can tell Ben and her parents get on well," the witness said



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Shop all of McCullough’s beauty must-haves below and learn more about her journey to the Miss USA title here.”
“Those are my favorite!”) to keep her camera-ready.”
“Mercier Translucent Powder and the NARS Lip Pencil It s like lip gloss almost...”
“I would give myself a good seven out of ten because I know there s still like such an area of improvement that I want for myself For now she s depending on a few Sephora faves like the Laura...”
“I’ll see these looks; especially these editorial looks and I’m like, ‘oh my gosh, I want to look like that.”
““I’m very hard on myself,” she shared with ESSENCE.”
“...beat...”
“That s what really helped me keep the hair bigger so it didn t look like it was flat on stage As for her makeup routine Kára isn t afraid to admit that she s still learning to perfect her...”
“And just some holding spray.”
“And I also have Chi Biosilk ($20, jcpenney.com).” She continued, “And when it came to on stage presence, I always had a teasing comb or brush, to get the roots really good.”


"Buy all of McCullough's beauty essentials below, and learn more about her experience of winning the title of Miss America here."
"Those are my favorite ones!" Get her camera ready. "
"Murier translucent powder and nals lip pencil are like lip gloss..."
"I will give myself nine times out of ten good grades, because I know there are still many places to improve, so I want to improve myself now, she depends on fans like Laura..."
"I'm going to see these expressions, especially these editorial expressions, and I'm going to say," oh my God, I want to look like that. "
"I'm very hard on myself," she told me
“… Defeat... "
"That's really helping me keep my hair bigger, so it doesn't look like it's flat on the stage. As her makeup routine, Carla is not afraid to admit that she's still learning to perfect her..."
"There are still some spray."
"I also have Chi BioSilk (20 dollars, jcpenney.com "She went on," when I show up on stage, I always have a teaser's comb or brush to get really good roots. "



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Leaving Aug 25 The Road...”
“But you can wash off all that grimdark with the fun humor in The 40 Year Old Virgin starring Steve Carell.”
“Credit: TohoEvery month a bunch of new TV shows, movies and Netflix Originals land on Netflix.”
“While the latter stays (presumably) forever, non-Netflix content typically has an expiration date.”
“That's why next month movies like 13 Assassins, The Road and The 40 Year Old Virgin are all on their way out.”
“If you haven't seen any of those films, do yourself a favor and go watch them.”
“The Road is a pretty dark take on the apocalypse.”
“As in, it's dark even for a post-apocalyptic movie which, by definition, is going to be a little dark.”
“Kids take the biggest hit next month, losing Disney/Pixar's Finding Dory, along with seasons of Care Bears, Pound Puppies and Littlest Pet Shop.”
“3 Littlest Pet Shop Seasons 2 4 Pariah Pound Puppies Seasons 1 3 Seeking a Friend for the End of the World The 40 Year Old Virgin The Adventures of Chuck Friends Season 2 Transformers Prime Seasons 2 3 Transformers Rescue Bots Seasons 2 4 Leaving Aug 23 Sausage Party...”


"Leave the road on August 25..."
"But you can use the humor of Steve Carrell's 40 year old virgin to wash away all the gloom."
Credit: every month, a batch of new TV programs, movies and original works of Netflix come to Netflix
"While the latter (may) exist forever, non Netflix content usually has an expiration date."
"That's why next month's movies like 13 assassins, road and 40 year old virgins are all in their way out."
"If you haven't seen these movies, do yourself a favor and go see them."
"This road is quite dark for the end of the world."
"Just like in a movie, even for a post apocalyptic movie, it's dark. By definition, it's a little dark."
"Next month, the kids will be the hardest hit, losing Disney / Pixar's" looking for dolly, "as well as the four seasons bear, pound puppies and the smallest pet store."
"3 little pet stores Season 2 4 pariah POUND PUPPIES Season 1 3 looking for friends for the end of the world 40 year old virgin chuck friend adventure Season 2 transformers golden season 2 3 Transformers rescue robot Season 2 4 leaving sausage party on August 23..."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See the full list of winners from the 75th annual Golden Globes here.”
“The actor beat out Jason Bateman of Ozark, Freddie Highmore of The Good Doctor, Bob Odenkirk of Better Call Saul, and Liev Schreiber of Ray Donovan for the win.”
“The This Is Us starred nabbed his first Golden Globe — for Best Actor in a TV Series, Drama — and became the first black actor to ever win in the category.”
“And he thanked This Is Us creator Dan Fogelman for the opportunity.”
““Now, Dan Fogelman, throughout the majority of my career, I’ve benefited from colorblind casting, which means, hey, let’s throw a brother in there.”
“That’s always really cool,” Brown said as he accepted his award.”
““But Dan Fogelman, you wrote a role for a black man that can only be played by a black man.”
“So what I appreciate so much about this is that I’m being seen for who I am and being appreciated for who I am, and it makes it that much more difficult to dismiss me or dismiss anybody who looks like me.”Watch Brown’s speech below.”
“Backstage after his big win, Brown spoke about making history with his win.”
““I was thinking I’ve never been the first brother to do anything,” he said.”


"Here you can see the complete list of the 75th Golden Globes winners."
The actor beat Jason Bateman of ozak, Freddie haymore of the good doctor, Bob odenkel of better call sol and liv Schreber of ray Donovan
The film starring "this is us" won his first Golden Globe Award for best actor in TV series, and became the first black actor to win the Golden Globe Award
"He thanks our Creator Dan fogman for giving him this opportunity."
"Now, Dan fogman, I've benefited a lot from color blind actors for most of my career, which means, hey, let's throw a brother in."
"That's always cool," Brown said as he received the prize
"But Dan fogman, you wrote a character for a black man that can only be played by a black man."
"So what I really appreciate is that people see who I am and appreciate who I am, which makes it more difficult to fire me or anyone who looks like me." Look at Brown's speech
"Backstage after his big win, brown talked about making history with his victory."
"I'm thinking, I've never been the first brother to do anything," he said



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...new brother or sister Kate recently made her final public appearance before her maternity leave...”
“They added Kate is now officially on maternity leave until the autumn and looking forward to welcoming the new baby The whole family is excited including the children who are very much aware that they are about to welcome a...”
“News.”
“It’s very difficult to be totally prepared when you don’t know if it’s going to be a boy or a girl,” a source tells E!”
““William and Kate don’t know the sex of the baby so they’re rather looking forward to finding out.”
“The couple are currently awaiting the arrival of baby number three with Kate‘s due date quickly approaching in April.”
“Kate Middleton and Prince William still don’t know the gender of the baby they’re expecting!”


“…… Kate's new brother and sister recently made their last public appearance before maternity leave... "
"They added that Kate is now officially on maternity leave until autumn and is looking forward to welcoming her new baby. The whole family is very excited, including those who are very clear that they are going to have a..."
"News."
A source told e
"William and Kate don't know the gender of the child, so they're looking forward to it."
"The couple are currently waiting for the arrival of baby number three, and Kate's due date will soon be April."
"Kate Middleton and Prince William still don't know the sex of their baby!"



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In February 2016, Molzahn revealed to Bustle that she believed she found “the one” off-screen.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Would Host Chris Harrison Ever Be The Bachelor?”
“The nutritionist appeared on the second season of Bachelor in Paradise in 2015.”
“The two dated for 2½ years before breaking up in 2013, but they gave their relationship another shot in 2014 before calling things off for good.”
“She then appeared on the debut season of the franchise’s spin-off show Bachelor Pad, where she met Kiptyn Locke.”
“...just short of finding love with Jake Pavelka and placed second...”
“God s Love and faithfulness has always been true to me but since the day I met you I truly believed that God had all along been letting me find my way to you Molzahn appeared on the 14th season of the ABC dating show in 2010 where she fell...”
“”Molzahn continued, “Taylor, you’re the answer to some of my hearts greatest prayers and deepest desires, and that you have chosen me, and that we really get to do this, my heart is full of praise!”
““My heart is gushing with happiness and excitement & I can’t stop thinking of how good God is!!!”
“Last night I said yes to spending forever with him!” she captioned a photo in which she placed her hand against Leopold’s chest to show off her ring as he kissed her forehead.”


"In February 2016, molzahn revealed to bustle that she believed she had found the 'that' off screen."
Related video: will host Chris Harrison become a bachelor? "
"The nutritionist appeared in the second season of 2015's singles in heaven."
"They dated for two and a half years and then broke up in 2013, but they gave their relationship another chance in 2014 and then cancelled it forever."
"Then she appeared in the first season of the spin off, bachelor's apartment, where she met kiptin Locke."
“… Just a little bit closer to finding Jack paverka's love, ranked second... "
"God's love and loyalty have always been true to me, but since the day I met you, I really believe that God has been making me find my way to you. Molzahn appeared in Season 14 of ABC Dating Show 2010, where she fell down..."
"Morzan went on," Tyler, you are the answer to some of the greatest prayers and deepest wishes in my heart. You chose me, and we did. My heart is full of praise! "
"My heart is full of happiness and excitement, I keep thinking how good God is!"
"Last night I promised to be with him forever! "She added a caption to a picture in which she put her hand on Leopold's chest to show him the ring he used to kiss her on the forehead."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the star said, referencing her illness.”
“She largely retreated from public life after being diagnosed with Lyme disease in 2014.”
“File Photo by Heinz Ruckemann/UPI | License PhotoJune 1 (UPI) -- Avril Lavigne is getting close to her new, billionaire beau in Italy.”
“E!”
“News reported Thursday the 33-year-old singer was spotted kissing Phillip Sarofim during a romantic stroll Wednesday in Lake Como.”
“AdvertisementA photo shows Sarofim embracing Lavigne as they share a smooch during the outing.”
“The singer wore a white dress and pink hat, while Sarofim sported a polo shirt, shorts and baseball cap.”
“The show of PDA comes amid Lavigne's return to the spotlight.”
“"[She] purposely lived a quiet life," People said in its June 11 issue.”
“It's been a long recovery and I want to make sure that this is perfect for you guys!"”


“…… The star said, referring to her illness. "
"After she was diagnosed with Lyme disease in 2014, she basically quit public life."
Avril lavini approaches her new billionaire boyfriend in Italy on June 1
“E！”
"The 33 year old singer was found kissing Philip salofim during a romantic walk in Lake Como on Wednesday, the news reported on Thursday
"A picture in the advertisement shows that salofim is hugging lavini and they are taking pictures together on an outing."
The singer wore a white dress and a pink hat, while sarofim wore a polo shirt, shorts and baseball cap
"The appearance of the PDA comes at a time when ravini is back in the spotlight."
In a June 11 article in people magazine, "she deliberately leads a peaceful life."
"It's a long recovery and I want to make sure it's perfect for you!"



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The album, released on November 10, has sold 1.05m copies in its first four days on sale, according to Nielsen Music figures reported by Billboard.”
“Early sales figures suggest Taylor Swift is on course to break her own chart record with new album Reputation.”
“Check out some of the fan-captured pictures below.”
“And for those who aren’t die-hard Swifties, these talented ladies are just some of her backup singers and dancers.”
“Along for this special trip were a few squad members including Clare, Eliotte, Mel and Kamilah.”
““And that happened.”“She’s just shopping out here, chillin’ on White Bridge,” said one woman who was talking to someone on her cellphone as Swift’s Instagram account documented the conversation.”
““I live across the street and just came to get this for dinner,” said a man in one of the videos as he stood next to Swift, holding a jar of spaghetti sauce and his phone while FaceTiming friends in Kentucky.”
“Inside, she approached fans and engaged with them as they approached her, signing albums and FaceTiming with fans’ friends who couldn’t make it to the store.”
““We always have this tradition of going to Target to go buy the album, and so we’re going to go do that,” Swift told her Instagram followers before heading to the West Nashville store on White Bridge Road.”
“Swift, known for her particularly personal interaction with fans, chronicled the store visit in her Instagram Stories.”


According to billboard, the album was released on November 10 and sold 1.05 million copies in its first four days, according to Nielsen music
"Early sales figures show that Taylor Swift is expected to break his chart record with the reputation of his new album."
"Look at some of the photos taken by fans below."
"For those who are not rigid swimsuits, these talented women are just her backup singers and dancers."
"There are several players on this special trip, including Claire, Eliot, Mel and Camilla."
"That's what happened." "She's just shopping here, hanging out on the white bridge," said one woman, who was talking to someone on her mobile phone, and Swift's instagram account recorded the conversation
"I live across the street and come to have this for dinner," said a man in one of the videos, standing next to swift, holding a can of spaghetti sauce and a mobile phone, joking with friends in Kentucky
"Inside, she approached the fans. When they approached her, she contacted them, signed the album and joked with the fans who couldn't get to the store."
"We've always had a tradition of going to target to buy albums, so we're going to buy them," swift told her instagram fans before heading to the West Nashville store on white bridge road
"Swift is known for her special personal interaction with fans, and she records her shopping experience in the instagram story."



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What did you most enjoy about having Hunter and Fitz team up together for this, and getting to play that bond and dynamic?”
“I didn’t get to shoot a great deal with Iain when I was in the show before, so that new dynamic was nice.”
“!” I wasn’t up to date on the show, so I was trying to piece it all together.”
“What happened?”
“BLOOD: With all the Marvel stuff, you go, “What’s going on?”
“I’m in!”advertisingWhen you found out where everybody else was, what was your reaction?”
“So, I was like, “Yeah, cool!”
“They told me, and I found out from Iain [De Caestecker], as well, that it was pretty much just gonna be me and him, the whole episode.”
“In typical Marvel fashion, they don’t say too much.”
“And then, sometime in the summer, (executive producer) Maurissa [Tancharoen] got in touch.”


"Let hunt and Fitz work together to develop this bond and energy. What do you like best?"
"I didn't shoot too much with Ian on the show before, so the new developments are very good."
"!" I can't keep up with the times on the show, so I want to put it all together. "
"What's the matter?"
"Blood: all miraculous things, you go," what's the matter? "
"I'm in! "What's your reaction when you find out where everyone else is?"
"So, I thought," yes, cool! "
"They told me that I also found out from Ian that the whole episode was almost me and him."
"In the typical way of marvel, they don't say much."
"Then, sometime in the summer, (executive producer) tancharoen got in touch."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...from them...”
“...scarves...”
“The Oscar-winning actor, currently on a press tour for thriller Red Sparrow, responded to comments suggesting that the sleeveless Versace outfit worn during a photocall in London implied that she was being mistreated alongside her coat-wearing male co-stars.”
““Wow.”
“I don’t really know where to get started on this ‘Jennifer Lawrence wearing a revealing dress in the cold’ controversy,” she wrote.”
““This is not only utterly ridiculous, I am extremely offended.”
“That Versace dress was fabulous, you think I’m going to cover that gorgeous dress up with a coat and a scarf?”
“I was outside for five minutes.”
“I would have stood in the snow for that dress because I love fashion and that was my choice An article in Jezebel had the headline Please Give Jennifer Lawrence a Dang Coat showing the actor s co stars Joel Edgerton and Jeremy Irons among them wearing large coats and...”
“The Red Sparrow photocall in London.”


“… From them... "
“… Scarf... "
The Oscar winning actress, who is currently on a press tour for the thriller red sparrow, responded that Versace's sleeveless dress at a photo exhibition in London implied that she was being abused along with the supporting actor in a coat
"Wow."
"I really don't know where to start with the argument that 'Jennifer Lawrence was wearing a revealing dress in the cold,'" she wrote
"It's not only ridiculous, I'm also very angry."
"That Versace dress is wonderful. Do you think I can cover that gorgeous dress with my coat and scarf?"
"I was outside for five minutes."
"I'll stand in the snow and buy that dress because I like fashion. It's my choice. In an article in Jezebel, the title is "please give Jennifer Lawrence a dangerous coat with actor partners Joel Edgerton and Jeremy Irons wearing a big coat, and..."
"The red sparrow is taking pictures in London."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He's besties with Jermane, too so at least he knows someone else there.”
“Awww, they're so cute!”
“Or as Gabrielle Union puts it: his BFFFFFFFFFThis mansion is amazing!!!”
“), since people don't know each other they'll all be fighting to establish their preeminence with the person they do know: their BFF Larry.”
“He tells her of his plan to bring all his friends and she warns him to be careful with his invite list (what fun would that be?”
“Every day is a vacation!”
“Gurl, you live in Los Angeles!!”
“Like, never?”
“He's her celebrity hairstylist and she wants to know the last time he had a vacation?”
“Me neither!”


"He and Germain are good friends, too, so at least he knows other people there."
"Oh, they are so lovely!"
"Or as the Gabriel League put it: his mansion is amazing
"), because people don't know each other, they try to build an advantage with the people they know: their boyfriend Larry."
"He told her that he was going to bring all his friends, and she warned him to be careful of his invitation list (what's so funny about that?"
"Every day is a holiday!"
"Gul, you live in Los Angeles!"
"Like, never?"
"He's her celebrity hairdresser, and she wants to know when his last vacation was?"
"Me too!"



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He’s having fun with it,” Shannon said.”
“"We expect things to be very blurry and we're not sure how good your vision's gonna get."”
“June recently underwent eye surgery and we will finally see the results of that operation in Friday's episode.”
“As shown in the clip exclusively shared by E!, June and her boyfriend Geno head to the optometrist's office for a check-up and an evaluation on the aftermath of her surgery.”
“"This is it baby.”
“The moment of truth," Geno says.”
“"This has been a long week, and she actually stayed in the chair longer than I thought she would.”
“I mean, just get the patch off and see what the doctor's got to say.”
“If she can't see and it's bad news, I don't know what the f— she's gonna say or do."”
“"It's hard for me to even think about me going completely blind," Mama June then says.”


"He had a good time," Shannon said
"We expect things to be very fuzzy, and we're not sure how good your vision will be."
"Joan recently had an eye surgery, and we'll see the results on Friday's show."
"As shown in the clip shared exclusively by E! Joan and her boyfriend Gino went to the optometrist's office to have an examination and evaluate the condition after the operation
"That's it, baby."
"The moment of truth," Gino said
"It's been a long week, and she's actually sitting in her chair longer than I thought."
"I mean, take the patch off and see what the doctor says."
"If she can't see it's bad news, I don't know what she will say or do."
"It's hard for me to imagine being completely blind," Joan's mother continued



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Gwen Stefani (@gwenstefani) on Nov 24, 2017 at 7:22am PSTClick inside to see more photos Gwen shared from her Thanksgiving…Family #sograteful gx #happythanksgiving A post shared by Gwen Stefani (@gwenstefani) on Nov 23, 2017 at 3:28pm PST”
“Gwen also posted a pic of her three-year-old son, Apollo, fishing with Blake, captioning it, “#thankful.”Check out all the photos below!”
“Two duo was joined by their families for the country Thanksgiving as well.”
“In the pic, Blake is giving a holiday sweater-clad Gwen a smooch on the cheek.”
““Had the best thanksgiving ❤️,” she captioned it.”
“The 48-year-old “You Make It Feel Like Christmas” singer took to Instagram on Friday (November 24) to share a photo of herself and 41-year-old country singer enjoying a sweet PDA moment during the holiday.”
“Gwen Stefani and her beau Blake Shelton spent Thanksgiving together in his home state of Oklahoma!”


"Gwen Stefani (@ gwenstefani) shared a post at 7:22 a.m. on November 24, 2017. Click inside to see more photos of Thanksgiving shared by Gwen Family # so grateful GX # happythanks shared the post of Gwen Stefani (@ gwenstefani) at 3:28 pm on November 23, 2017 "
Gwen also posted a picture of her three-year-old sons Apollo and black fishing with the words "thank God!"
"The families of the two groups also attended rural Thanksgiving."
In this photo, Blake is kissing Gwen on the cheek in a holiday sweater
"Thanksgiving was the best ❤️ "She added a title to it."
"The 48 year old" you make it feel like Christmas "singer shared on instagram on Friday (November 24) photos of himself and a 41 year old country singer enjoying a sweet PDA moment during the holiday."
"Gwen Stephanie and her boyfriend Blake Sheldon are spending Thanksgiving together in his hometown of Oklahoma!"



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Though he has discussed pursuing a career in rap, and there has been a great deal of industry interest in his doing so, he has not yet made a commitment to a career in music.”
“He is often referred to as the reincarnation of his father.”
“Now in his late teens, he has begun to make waves for his freestyling skills.”
“Though he has considered a career in acting, he is currently focused on completing his schooling, and would like to study film.”
“Christopher Wallace, Jr., portrayed his father as a child in the biopic, "Notorious".”
“His father was one of the most successful rap artists of the 90s.”
“He was six months old when his father was shot in what is still an unsolved drive-by murder.”
“...and Faith Evans.”
“Christopher Wallace, Jr., was born in New York, and is the son of The Notorious B.I.G.”
“Christopher Wallace, Jr. net worth: Christopher Wallace, Jr. is an American student who has a net worth of $50 million dollars.”


"Although he has discussed engaging in rap music, and the industry is very interested in him doing so, he has not committed to engaging in music."
"He is often called the reincarnation of his father."
"Now that he's a teenager, his freestyle technique is starting to make a splash."
"Although he has considered acting career, his current focus is to finish his studies and want to study film."
Christopher Wallace, Jr. portrays his father as a child in the biographical film infamy
"His father was one of the most successful rap artists of the 1990s."
"When he was six months old, his father was shot and killed, which is still an unsolved driving murder."
"And faith, Evans."
"Christopher Wallace Jr. was born in New York, the son of the infamous B.I.G."
"Net worth of Christopher Wallace Jr.: Christopher Wallace Jr. is an American student with a net worth of $50 million."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is not hurting anyone.”Chiquis finds the prejudice that persists toward homosexuals in Latino culture disheartening and believes that intolerance is spiking suicide rates among young LGBT people: “We have to guide them and tell them we will always love them,” she said.”
“I know that some people don t necessarily believe in that but all I know is that I love this person and I don t necessarily have a preference I love who I love His sister Chiquis Rivera who appears with him on the video and stars with Lopez and...”
“Sister Chiquis Rivera shows him her unconditional support and love.”
“Brought to you by the editors of People en Español.”
“Follow us on Instagram, Facebook, and Twitter.”
“Johnny Lopez, the youngest son of late Mexican singer Jenni Rivera, addressed rumors surrounding his sexual orientation in a video he posted to Instagram today.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““There has been a lot said about me in the past few weeks.”
“Things didn’t come out the way I wanted this to,” he said.”
“I wanted to make this video first and for everyone to understand me but my boyfriend as you all know Joaquín we both got a little too excited and he posted a few pictures of us and I retweeted them and it went viral Lopez 16 said Joaquín and he...”


"He didn't hurt anyone." Chiquez found the prejudice against homosexuals in Latin American culture frustrating and argued that intolerance was driving up suicide rates among young LGBT people: "we have to guide them and tell them that we love them forever," she said
"I know that some people don't necessarily believe this, but I only know that I love this person, and I don't necessarily like the person I love. I love his sister chiquez Rivera, who appears in the video with him, plays with Lopez, and..."
"Sister chiquez Rivera showed him her unconditional support and love."
"The editors of the Spaniard brought it to you."
"Follow us on instagram, Facebook and twitter."
"Johnny Lopez, the youngest son of the late Mexican singer Jenny Rivera, talked about rumors about his sexual orientation in a video he posted to instagram today."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In the past few weeks, people have been judging me a lot."
"Things didn't go as I had hoped," he said
"I want to make this video first so that everyone can understand me, but my boyfriend, you know, Joe Quinn, we are all a little too excited. He posted some of our photos, I forwarded some, and then we went crazy. Lopez said on the 16th that Joaquin and he... "



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She also posted a sweet snapshot with one of her furry friends, pet pooch Emu.”
“Suddenly you’re like, ‘I don’t recognize you anymore.’ We had to refall for each other.”Hemsworth wasn’t the only one feeling Cyrus’ love on International Kissing Day.”
“FROM PEN: EW’s Top Ten Rom-Com Movie MomentsOf their time apart, the star recently revealed, “I needed to change so much.”“And changing with someone else not changing like that is too hard.”
““Our first smooch 8 years ago!”Cyrus and Hemsworth, 27, rekindled their love in 2016 after ending their engagement three years prior.”
““Happy #InternationalKissingDay!” wrote the singer, 24.”
“In the still from the movie, Cyrus and her fiancé kissed in character as the film’s love interests.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“...photo from the 2010 movie which she and Hemsworth filmed in Tybee Island Georgia on Twitter in honor of International Kissing Day...”
“It s been eight years since Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth s romance first blossomed on the set of Nicholas Sparks drama The Last Song Miley Cyrus Shares Throwback Photo of Her First Smooch with Liam Hemsworth for International Kissing Day On Thursday the Malibu singer posted a sweet throwback...”


"She also posted a sweet snapshot with one of her furry friends, the pet dog EMU."
"All of a sudden you say, 'I don't recognize you anymore.' We had to meet each other again. "On international kiss day, Hemsworth is not the only one to feel Cyrus's love."
The star recently revealed, "I need to change too much." "It's hard to change with others instead of like that."
"Our first kiss eight years ago! "Cyrus and 27 year old Hemsworth, who ended their engagement three years ago, are back in love in 2016."
"Happy international kiss day! The 24-year-old singer wrote
"In the still life of the movie, Cyrus and her fiance kiss on the role, which is the interest of the movie."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
“… This is a picture of her and Hemsworth in a 2010 Movie on Tibby Island, Georgia, to mark International kiss day
"It's been eight years since the romance between Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth debuted in Nicholas Sparks. Last song Miley Cyrus shares a retrospective photo of her first kiss with Liam Hemsworth on international kiss day on Thursday. Malibu's singer released a sweet retrospective... "



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on NBC.”
“While Milo Ventimiglia’s appearance as a 70-something Jack Pearson is likely a dream, This Is Us fans may recall last season when Randall had a hallucination and saw Jack standing on a ladder at the family cabin.”
“This Is Us is toying with an alternate timeline in the Season 2 finale—and it’s not via a flashback or a flash forward.”
“While the episode, titled “The Wedding,” will feature some upbeat moments as Kate Pearson (Chrissy Metz) gets ready to marry her longtime love Toby (Chris Sullivan), emotions will run high as she walks down the aisle without her dearly departed dad (Milo Ventimiglia) by her side.”
“But now, promos for “The Wedding” episode confirm that Jack will be back for his little girl’s big day.”
“The teaser for the This Is Us season 2 finale shows Jack Pearson in the present day sporting gray hair a salt and pepper goatee and wire rimmed glasses as he touches his wife Rebecca s Mandy Moore face and says Where d the time go Bec This Is Us...”
“...fans and pretty much the rest of the universe know that Jack Pearson died on Super Bowl Sunday in 1998 when he was 53 years old...”
“The Pearson patriarch saved the family dog (and a pillowcase full of family belongings!)”
“...after a house fire, but he couldn’t save himself.”
“Complications from smoke inhalation did Papa Pearson in, and now Kate’s wedding marks 20 years since his tragic passing.”


"NBC's et."
"Although Milo Ventimiglia's appearance as Jack Pearson in his 70s is likely to be a dream, American fans may still remember Randall's hallucination last season when he saw Jack standing on the ladder of his cabin."
"This is another timetable for us to play with the season 2 finale, not by flashback or forward."
"Although the title of this episode is" wedding ", when Kate Pearson (Chris Metz) is going to marry her longtime lover Toby (Chris Sullivan), she will show some optimistic moments, but when she walks down the aisle, her mood will be high, without her dear father (MILO vantimiglia) beside her."
But now the wedding Promo confirms that Jack will be back for his daughter's big day
"This is the trailer of the last episode of season 2 in the United States. It shows that Jack Pearson has gray hair, salt and pepper goatee and metal framed glasses. He touches the face of his wife Rebecca's Mandy Moore and says where the time is, this is us..."
“…… As fans and almost everyone in the world know, Jack Pearson died on Super Bowl Sunday in 1998, when he was 53 years old... "
"Patriarch Pearson saved the dog (and a pillowcase full of family belongings!)"
“… After a fire, but he couldn't save himself
"The complications of inhaling smoke left Pearson's father untouched, and now Kate's wedding marks his unfortunate death for 20 years."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“B made it clear that that day has not arrived...”
“Image zoom Anna Wintour and Cardi B | Credit: David X Prutting/BFA.comCardi B has been making the NYFW fashion rounds lately.”
“Week The internet gagged when a photo of Cardi B and Anna Wintour emerged on Saturday the unlikely pair sitting side by side at the Alexander Wang fall winter 2018 runway show for New York Fashion Week...”
“But no one was as surprised to see them together as Cardi B was herself.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I couldn’t believe it, girl,” the rapper (née Belcalis Almanzar) told E!”
“News.”
““I couldn’t contain myself, but I kept it together.”But just what did the two talk about?”
““Stuff,” the 25-year-old “Bodak Yellow” rapper said coyly.”
“Fiancé Offset was also by her side at the Prabal Gurung show on Monday.”


"B made it clear that the day had not yet arrived..."
Image zooming Anna Wintour and Katie B | credit: David x pruting / Boao Forum for Asia B has been touring FW fashion week in New York recently. "
"When a picture of Katie B and Anna Wintour appeared on Saturday this week, the Internet blocked the unlikely couple sitting side by side on the runway of King Alexander's New York Fashion Week in autumn and winter 2018..."
"But no one is as surprised to see them together as Katie B himself."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I can't believe it, girl," rapper n é e belcalis almanzar told me
"News."
"I can't control myself, but I put it together." But what did they talk about? "
"Things," said the 25-year-old bodak Huang rapper shyly
"Her fiance was with her at the prabal Gurung show on Monday."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She appeared to be genuinely enjoying herself and looked entirely comfortable helping him in doting over his son.“Image zoom Anna Faris and Michael Barrett | Credit: Splash News Online...”
““We tried hard for a long time, and we’re really disappointed.”“Our son has two parents who love him very much and for his sake we want to keep this situation as private as possible moving forward,” they continued.”
“Split Exes Chris Pratt and Anna Faris appear to be keeping things friendly over a year after their split...”
“Pratt and Faris were photographed walking together in Santa Monica, California, on Tuesday morning — just one day after they were seen out along with their 6-year-old son Jack.”
“The Guardians of the Galaxy star, 39, and actress, 41, were dressed casually, with both wearing baseball caps.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The former couple, who were married for eight years, first announced they were splitting on August 6, 2017 with a joint statement on Facebook.”
““Anna and I are sad to announce we are legally separating,” the statement said.”
““We still have love for each other, will always cherish our time together and continue to have the deepest respect for one another.”RELATED: Going Strong!”
“Image zoom Chris Pratt and Katherine Schwarzenegger | Credit: TheImageDirect.com“She seemed to be really happy and fit in with him and his son,” the source previously told PEOPLE.”


"She seems to really enjoy herself and seems willing to help him spoil his son." Image zooming Anna Faris and Michael Barrett credit: splash news online “
"We worked hard for a long time and we were really disappointed." "Our son has two parents who love him very much and we want to keep the situation as secret as possible for him," they continued
"Chris Pratt and Anna Faris, the ex girlfriends who broke up, seem to have a friendly relationship one year after they broke up..."
Pratt and Faris were photographed walking together in Santa Monica, California, on Tuesday morning, just a day after they were out with their six-year-old son Jack
The 39 year old guardian of the Galaxy star and the 41 year old actress dressed casually, both in baseball caps
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The former couple, who have been married for eight years, announced their first break-up in a joint statement on Facebook on August 6, 2017."
"Anna and I are sad to announce that we will be legally separated," the statement said
"We still love each other, will always cherish our time together, and continue to have the deepest respect for each other." Related: stronger! "
"Image zooming Chris Platt and Katherine Schwarzenegger | credit: TheImageDirect.com "She seems really happy to fit in with him and his son," the source told people earlier



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Indica una valoración global para el sitio:”
“¿Cómo podemos mejorar?”
“MSN Agradecemos tus comentarios...”
“ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Switch to English Comentarios es Elegir un idioma United States español es United States English en Inicio Famosos Cine Netflix Juegos en línea Música Envía tus comentarios a...”
“Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية المتحدة العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية”
“English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines English Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska...”
“English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk Deutschland Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland...”
“...msn volver a msn inicio entretenimiento por Microsoft News búsqueda web Ir a navegación Ir a contenido Iniciar sesión Cambiar idioma y contenido Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada...”


“Indica una valoración global para el-sitio:”
"Como podmos machola?"
“MSN Agradecemos tus comentarios…”
According to reports, the current investigation in this respect, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, The investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, the investigation of both sides, from switching to English comentrios of Comentario s. Elegir, elegir, American idiom, American, American, American, American, American ESA, American, American English, American, American English, American, American English, American, American English, American, American English, American, American English, American, American English, American English, American English, American English, American English, American English, American English, American English, American English English, American, American, American, American“
“Türkiye T the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the  the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the T T T T T T T T  At present, t is adopting λ λ α α α λ α α α according to different bases, in different Europe and in different countries It's the first time that we've been able to find a way to solve the problem
"English Italian Italian Magyarorsz á g Magyar Malaysian English Mexican Spanish Dutch New Zealand English Norwegian Norsk bokm å L Ö sterreich Deutsch per ú Espa NIA ol Philippine English Polska Polska Polska Portuguese Portuguese Portuguese Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South African English Swiss Fran å AIS Suomi Suomi sverige Svenska..."
"Canada, English, French, French, Spanish, Republic, Chile, Spanish, Colombia, Spanish, Denmark, Denmark, Germany, German, French, French, India, English, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia Asia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, International Edition, English, Ireland... "
“… MSN Volver a MSN Inicio entretinimiento por Microsoft News B ú squeda Web IR a navegaci ó n IR a contenido iniciar Sesi ó n Cambiar idioma y contenido Afrique francophones Fran ê AIS am é Rica Latina Espa? Ol Argentina Espa? Ol Australian English Belgi è Nederlands Belgique Fran ê AIS Brasil Portugu ê s Canada... "



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“What are your thoughts on Cristiano & Georgina's fun day at the pool?”
“Article continues below advertisementWonder what adventures these two cuties will have next, maybe a visit to one of their dad's major soccer games?”
“Poor Mateo clearly wasn't enjoying himself though, as he looked like he needed an SOS out of the water ASAP!”
“Captioning the photo with three red hearts, Cristiano smiled for the camera as Eva looked so cute while bobbing around in a pink floatie and Georgina posed model style.”
“Article continues below advertisementThe couple took the twins to the pool, where Mateo and Eva looked SOOO adorable while floating around, but one of them definitely wasn't having a good time!”
“Cristiano is also the father of his seven year old son, Cristiano Ronaldo Jr., from a previous relationship.”
“So these two clearly have their plates full with not one, not two, but three little new ones to take on!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyIt's been babies galore for Cristiano & Georgina, as the couple welcomed their twins via surrogate in June of last year, and only four months later, she gave birth to their daughter Alana Martina.”
“Click-through for the adorable pics.”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"What do you think of Cristiano and Georgina's interesting day at the pool?"
"The article continues with the following ad to find out what adventures these two lovely players will take next, perhaps to visit one of their father's major football matches?"
"Poor Matteo obviously doesn't like himself though, because he looks like he needs a cry out for water as soon as possible!"
"In the subtitle of this picture with three hearts, Cristiano smiles at the camera, EVA swings around in pink floats, and Georgina poses as a model."
The couple took the twins to the swimming pool, where Matteo and EVA looked very cute when they were floating in the water, but one of them must have had a bad time
"Cristiano is also the father of his 7-year-old son Cristiano Ronaldo Jr., who had a relationship with him."
"So these two people's plates are obviously full of not one, not two, but three new little ones!"
Gettyit's been baby again for Cristiano & Georgina, because the couple got their twins through surrogacy in June last year, and only four months later, she gave birth to their daughter Alana Martina
"Click to see lovely pictures."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I mean, it’s just what it is.””
“I have anxiety problems, I take medication for anxiety.”
““I smoke weed.”
“In 2016, Carter opened up to Entertainment Tonight about his monthlong stay at the Betty Ford Center in 2011, dismissing “misconceptions” that “I’m a meth head, or I’m a crackhead, or I’m a drug addict.”“I drink wine,” he said.”
“Hours before Carter’s arrest, a message appeared from his Twitter account informing fans that, due to “transportation issues,” the singer would not be able to make a scheduled performance in Kansas City.”
“Denise Truscello via Getty Images Madison Parker and Aaron Carter in Las Vegas in April.”
“Carter’s girlfriend, Madison Parker, was in the vehicle and was charged with obstruction and two drug-related charges.”
“TMZ reports that Carter refused to submit for testing for suspected DUI.”
“...of marijuana and possession of drug-related objects.”
“According to the outlet, the singer was detained Saturday evening and is facing several misdemeanor charges, including DUI, possession of less than 1 oz.”


"I mean, that's what happened."
"I have anxiety problems. I take anxiety drugs."
"I smoke marijuana."
"In 2016, Carter tonight disclosed to the entertainment industry his experience of spending a month at Betty Ford Center in 2011, refuting the" misunderstanding "that" I am an addict, or a lunatic, or an addict "and" I drink, "he said
"A few hours before Carter's arrest, a message appeared on his twitter account informing fans that the singer would not be able to perform in Kansas City due to" traffic problems. "
"Denise truscello via Getty Images Madison Parker and Aaron Carter performed in Las Vegas in April."
"Carter's girlfriend Madison Parker was in the car at the time and was charged with obstructing traffic and two drug-related charges."
"TMZ reported that Carter refused to submit a test for suspected drunk driving."
“…… Marijuana and drug-related substances. "
The singer was detained on Saturday night and faces a number of misdemeanor charges, including drunk driving and possession of less than an ounce of drugs, according to media reports



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““We are two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship,” the pair insisted...”
“This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year,” read the statement.”
“...s Day that they were calling it quits on their marriage In an effort to reduce any further speculation we have decided to announce our separation...”
“The actor s decision to ditch the wedding jewelry comes on the heels of his ex Aniston 49 stepping out sans ring at friend Aniston and Theroux shocked fans when they announced in a joint statement the day after Valentine...”
“Courteney Cox’s Beverly Hills home on Feb. 27.”
“Theroux, 46, was spotted without his ring in New York City on March 1st.”
“Click through RadarOnline.com’s gallery to see the actor out and about in New York City without his wedding ring!”
“Justin Theroux is wasting no time moving on from Jennifer Aniston now that the two have officially announced their divorce just over two years after they got married.”


"We are two best friends who decided to separate as a couple but look forward to continuing the friendship we cherish," the two insisted
"This decision was made amicably by both sides at the end of last year," the statement said
“… On the day they announced the end of their marriage, in order to reduce more speculation, we decided to announce separation... "
"Before the actor decided to give up wedding jewelry, his 49 year old ex girlfriend Aniston announced in a joint statement from friends Aniston and Cyrus that they announced in a joint statement the day after Valentine's day that..."
"Courtney Cox's home in Beverly Hills on February 27."
Seru, 46, was found without a ring in New York on March 1
"Click RadarOnline.com Go to the gallery in New York to see the actor. He doesn't have a wedding ring! "
"Justin Theroux is seizing the opportunity to leave Jennifer Aniston because they have just been married for more than two years and officially announced their divorce."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He’s just a really fun, funny person.””
““I was like, ‘He was really cute, this guy was really cute,’ so I called him,” she said.”
“After their initial meeting, Spears dug up his phone number out of her bag nearly “five months later,” she revealed in a January 2017 radio interview.”
“Image zoom Spears and Asghari | Credit: Britney Spears/InstagramDespite their strong relationship, it was nearly a missed connection.”
“The couple even fueled engagement rumors after Spears was spotted vacationing on a Hawaiian beach with a sparkly diamond ring on that finger.”
“The cute pair has been inseparable since, going on cozy date night dinners, attending friends’ birthday parties and celebrating special occasions together — including Spears’ recent birthday and Valentine’s Day.”
“The pop icon and her boyfriend continue to publicly show off their affection for one another since their romance blossomed after they met on the set of her “Slumber Party” video shoot.”
“Spears, who is mom to sons Sean Preston, 13, and Jayden James, 12, simply shared three pink bow emojis along with her post.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“#princess,” the shirtless personal trainer-turned-model captioned the image.”


"He's such an interesting man."
"I just thought, 'he's cute, this guy's cute,' so I called him," she said
She revealed in a radio interview in January 2017: "after their first meeting, spears took his phone number out of his bag almost" five months later. "
"Image zooming spear and asgali credit: spear / instagram despite their strong relationship, which is almost a missed link."
"After Spears was found wearing a sparkling diamond ring on his finger while on holiday on a Hawaiian Beach, the couple even contributed to the rumors of engagement."
"Since then, the lovely couple have been inseparable, eating a comfortable date dinner together, going to friends' birthday parties together, and celebrating special days together - including Spears' recent birthday and Valentine's day."
The pop icon and her boyfriend continue to show their love for each other in public, and their relationship has blossomed since they met in her "sleep party" video
"Spears, the mother of sons Sean Preston (13) and Jaden James (12), only shared three Pink Bows in her post."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Princess," the model, who was born as a personal trainer, wrote an inscription for the photo



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But talk to me three months postpartum when I still look six months pregnant.'”
“I feel like you guys think these thoughts too.”
“And then there are moments like this that are a perfect duality: heavy and light, exhausted and exhilarated, unrecognizable and yet distinctly me (plus someone else),' she wrote.”
“'Mine has been a long, winding journey forward and back and forward again.”
“...like Daphne often uses social medial to speak candidly with her 279 000 Instagram followers about her own experiences and in her latest post she recalls her own complex relationship with her body...”
“Babymoon Daphne shared a photo of herself in a seersucker bikini at 30 weeks pregnant back in September Loving it Daphne recently told Daily Mail Online that she is almost too happy to put up bikini pictures while pregnant because there is no expectation for what her body should look...”
“'We all have complex relationships with the history of how we get comfortable living in and owning it.”
“'But I decided to share it with all of you because the female body is worth so much more than objectification, scrutiny, comparison, hatred...we do so much in this skin,' she continued.”
“'I have collages of each baby growing in my belly and [I] try to write myself little reminders of what it felt like to know their movements and the excitement of holding them inside me before I got to know the actual people that would emerge,' she wrote.”
“The soon-to-be mother-of-three explained that when she took the picture on Monday evening, it was supposed to be just for her family.”


"But three months after delivery, and I look like I'm six months pregnant, you can talk to me."
"I think you have the same idea."
"There are also moments when there is a perfect duality: heavy and light, tired and excited, unrecognizable, but clear to me (plus others)," she wrote
"My life is a long and tortuous journey, going forward again and again."
“…… Like Daphne, she often uses social media to talk frankly about her experiences with 279000 instagram fans. In her latest post, she recalls her complex relationship with her body... "
"In September this year, babymon Daphne shared a picture of herself wearing a bubble gauze bikini when she was 30 weeks pregnant. She liked this picture very much. Daphne recently told the Daily Mail Online that she was almost too happy to post a picture of her bikini during her pregnancy because she didn't have any expectations about what her body should look like..."
"We all have a complex relationship with how to live comfortably and the history of having it."
"But I decided to share with you, because women's bodies are more valuable than objectification, examination, comparison and hatred We do a lot of things on this skin, "she continued
"I have a jigsaw puzzle of every baby in my stomach, and I try to write myself some tips to remind myself of how it feels to know the real people before I know them, and the excitement of holding them in my heart," she wrote
"The mother, who is about to become a mother of three, explained that when she took this picture on Monday night, it should only be for her family."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Mandy Moore and Taylor Goldsmith | Credit: Mandy Moore/Instagram“I’m kind of confident that it’s not going to be the stereotypical white wedding dress, because it just doesn’t feel the most me,” she said.”
“Image zoom Mandy Moore and Taylor Goldsmith | Credit: Mandy Moore/InstagramAnd given that the two already live together, Moore admitted that once they do tie the knot, she doesn’t think their relationship will feel much different.”
“Taylor Goldsmith might already be engaged to Mandy Moore, but the musician only just made the relationship Insta-official!”
“Goldsmith, 33, joined Instagram and posted his first picture on Monday.”
“In it are two black-and-white photo strips featuring himself and his bride-to-be striking a mix of silly and sweet poses.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Made some cool new bookmarks in Portland OR,” he wrote in the caption, tagging Moore’s profile.”
““It doesn’t feel real coming home at the end of the day and waking up in the morning like, ‘Wow, I live here?”
“!’” she said at the time.”
““I am excited just to be married.”


"Image zooming Mandy Moore and Tyler goldsmith | image source: Mandy Moore / instagram" she said, "I'm a little confident that it won't be that kind of stereotyped white wedding dress, because it doesn't feel very good to me."
"Image zooming Mandy Moore and Taylor goldsmith | image source: Mandy Moore / instagram and given that the two are already living together, Moore admits that once they get married, she doesn't think their relationship will be very different."
"Tyler goldsmith may be engaged to Mandy Moore, but the musician just officially announced the relationship!"
Goldsmith, 33, joined instagram and released his first photo on Monday
"There are two black-and-white photos of him and his bride to be in a stupid and sweet pose."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Made some cool new bookmarks in Portland," he wrote in the title, marking Moore's profile
"Isn't it true to come home at the end of the day and wake up in the morning like 'Wow, I live here'
"!" she said at the time. "
"I'm happy to get married."



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More Wine which is out Oct 17 Union hopes that the way people approach her about the topic changes...”
“But after realizing how much joy she felt raising three boys with Wade 35 his nephew Dahveon Morris 16 and sons from a previous marriage Zaire 15 and Zion 10 Wade s third son Xavier 3 conceived with another woman while Wade and Union were broken up lives with his...”
“In her new book We’re Going to Need More Wine — excerpted exclusively in the new issue of PEOPLE — the star of BET’s Being Mary Jane opens up about her struggles with infertility and failed IVF treatments.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I have had eight or nine miscarriages,” Union, 44, writes in the book.”
“For three years my body has been a prisoner of trying to get pregnant I ve either been about to go into an IVF cycle in the middle of an IVF cycle or coming out of an IVF cycle Image zoom While Union has spoken about IVF previously she did...”
“...not reveal the heartbreaking struggle she has faced...”
“But even after enduring three years of failed IVF cycles and being constantly bloated from the hormones Union writes that she and Wade remain bursting with love and ready to do anything to meet the child we ve both dreamed of Image zoom Credit Aaron Davidson WireImage The pair tied...”
“...the knot in August 2014 and at first the star didn t see children as part of her future...”
“...mother Union first discovered that having a baby was something she wanted...”


"More wine will come out on October 17, and the union wants people to change the way they approach her..."
"But when she realized how happy it was to raise three boys with Wade, Wade was 35, his nephew davien Morris was 16, his ex husband's son Zaire was 15, Zion was 10, Wade's third son Xavier was 3, and was pregnant with another woman, while Wade and Ewing broke up with him..."
"In her new book, we need more wine, Bette star Mary Jane talks about her fight against infertility and IVF failure."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I've had eight or nine miscarriages," Ewan, 44, wrote in the book
"For three years, my body has been a prisoner trying to get pregnant. I have to either enter the IVF cycle in the middle of the IVF cycle or zoom out from the IVF cycle image. Union has talked about IVF before, and she has done so..."
“…… Don't reveal the heartbreaking struggle she is facing... "
"But even after three years of failed IVF cycles and an expanding hormonal alliance, she and wade are still full of love and ready to do anything to meet our dream child image zooming credit Allen Davidson wired image two get married..."
“… At the end of August 2014, the star didn't see her children as part of her future at first. "
“… For the first time, the mothers' Union found that having a baby was what she wanted... "



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Justin Hartley This Is Us NBC John Lithgow Perry Mason HBO Tobias Menzies The Crown Netflix Tom Pelphrey Ozark Netflix Michael K Williams Lovecraft Country HBO BEST SUPPORTING ACTRESS IN A DRAMA SERIES Gillian Anderson The Crown Netflix Cynthia Erivo The Outsider HBO Julia Garner Ozark Netflix Janet McTeer Ozark...”
“BEST ACTRESS IN A DRAMA SERIES Christine Baranski The Good Fight CBS All Access Olivia Colman The Crown Netflix Emma Corrin The Crown Netflix Claire Danes Homeland Showtime Laura Linney Ozark Netflix Jurnee Smollett Lovecraft Country HBO BEST SUPPORTING ACTOR IN A DRAMA SERIES Jonathan Banks Better Call Saul AMC”
“Josh O’Connor is nominated for Best Actor in a Drama Series, while Olivia Colman and Emma Corrin find themselves together in the Best Actress in a Drama Series category.”
““The Crown” also saw many of its royal players recognized.”
““Ozark” stars Jason Bateman and Laura Linney will vie for Best Actor in a Drama Series and Best Actress in a Drama Series respectively, while Tom Pelphrey, Julia Garner, and Janet McTeer are all nominated for their supporting roles.”
“This year, two Netflix series lead the pack, with “Ozark” and “The Crown” each up for six awards including Best Drama Series.”
“Film nominees will be revealed on February 8, and the format of this year’s event will be announced at a later date, as health and safety guidelines are taken into consideration.”
“The show will continue its combined Film and Television awards format, honoring the finest in both cinematic and televised/streaming achievement.”
“The winners will be revealed LIVE on The CW on Sunday, March 7, 2021 from 7-10pm ET/PT, with acclaimed film, television, and stage star Taye Diggs returning to host for his third consecutive time.”
“Association CCA announced today the series nominees for the 26th annual Critics Choice Awards...”


"Justin Hartley, this is NBC John lichgao Perry Mason, HBO Tobias Menzies, Tom perfrey Ozark, Michael K. Williams, love crafts, country HBO best supporting actress Gillian Anderson, crown runner Cynthia elivo, outsider HBO Julia garner Ozark, Janet mctil o Zach... "
"Best actress in a drama series Christina baransky's good fight CBS all visit Olivia Coleman's crown Netflix Emma Colin's crown Netflix Claire Danmark home show time Laura Linny ozak Netflix Jules mollett Lovecraft national HBO best supporting actor in a drama series Jonathan banks best called sol a MC”
Josh O'Connor was nominated for best actor in drama, while Olivia Coleman and Emma Colin were also nominated for best actress in drama
"The crown has also given recognition to many royal players
"Ozark" stars Jason Bateman and Laura Linney will compete for best actor and best actress in the drama respectively, while Tom pelfrey, Julia Garner and Janet mctil are all nominated for supporting roles
This year, Netflix starred in two series, "ozak" and "crown" respectively won six awards, including best feature film
"The film nomination list will be announced on February 8, and the format of this year's event will be announced later due to health and safety guidelines."
"The show will continue in the form of its joint film and TV awards in recognition of its best achievements in film and TV / streaming."
The winner will be announced on CW TV from 7:00 p.m. to 10:00 p.m. EST on Sunday, March 7, 2021. The famous movie, TV and stage star Taye diggs will return to the host position for the third time in a row
"CCA announced the series nominations for the 26th annual critic choice award today..."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Meghan trusts and appreciates her advice.”Read more: From Meghan Markle and Prince Harry to Victoria and David Beckham: How These Celebrity Couples First Fell in LoveCheck out The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
““Victoria told Meghan to visit Sarah Chapman, who bills herself ‘London’s most sought-after facialist’.”
“The fact that the Duchess of Sussex has chosen not to wear Beckham dresses sounds a little strange considering how close the two women have gotten since Markle and Harry got engaged.”
“The Beckhams attended their wedding in May 2018 and even joined the royal couple on the Australian leg of their tour in later October, so you would think Markle throwing on a VB ensemble would be a no-brainer.”
“However, that’s not the case.”
“So why isn’t the former actress willing to wear her pal’s dresses?”
“While it seems odd that the retired actress isn’t supporting Mrs. Beckham’s creations she actually has a good reason for it.”
“Here’s why you won’t see Markle in any VB dresses, plus the advice and recommendations the former Spice Girl gave to the duchess when she first moved to London.”
“Why Markle won’t wear Victoria Beckham dressesThe former Suits star won’t wear any of her friend’s dresses simply because they don’t look good on her.”
“She explained that while she is a fan of Beckham’s dresses she doesn’t have the frame for them to fit her properly.”


"Megan trusts and appreciates her advice." Read more: from Megan markel and Prince Harry to Victoria and David Beckham: how these celebrity couples fell in love for the first time! Check out the memo on Facebook
"Victoria asked Megan to visit Sarah Chapman, who claims to be" the most popular facial beautician in London. "
"It sounds strange that the Duchess of Sussex chose not to wear David's skirt, because the two women have been very close since Marcel and Harry were engaged."
"The Beckhams attended their wedding in May 2018 and even joined the royal couple on their tour in Australia in late October, so you would think it would be easy for markel to join VB."
"However, this is not the case."
"So why doesn't the former actress want to wear her friend's clothes?"
"Although it seems strange that the retired actress does not support Mrs. Beckham's creation, in fact she has good reasons to do so."
"That's why you don't see Marcel in a VB dress, and the advice and advice the former Spice Girl gave to the Duchess when she first moved to London."
"Why doesn't markel wear Victoria Beckham's dress? The former star doesn't wear her friend's dress just because it doesn't look good on her."
"She explained that although she was a fan of the Beckhams dress, she didn't have the right frame."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I know Kourtney, for some reason, finds more comfort in talking to a stranger about family stuff, rather than talking to the source,” she said.”
“She’s always picked his.”Khloé said she wished her sister would communicate her feelings more openly with the family.”
““I like [pregnancy,]” she said.”
“...this for myself said the experience couldn t have gone any better...”
“She just didn t want anyone changing her happy moment and her happy pregnancy so I m really proud of her that she stuck to her guns and was able to tell her story her way Image zoom Credit Vivien Killilea Getty And Kylie who said she was really doing...”
“We get why you kept it private.’ … Kylie’s always wanted to be a mom, so this is really exciting for her.”
““Everyone was just like, ‘Okay, we get it.”
““People were saying, ‘We’re going to post, we’re going to announce,’ and I’m like, ‘No!’ But she did it perfectly and it was such a positive experience for her.”“Totally,” Kim said.”
““That was a lot of anxiety for me,” she said.”
“We kept that a secret!”Momager Kris, 62, admitted keeping a lid on the news wasn’t easy.”


"I know that, for some reason, Courtney finds more comfort in talking to strangers about family matters than in talking to sources," she said
"She always chose him." Heloe said she hoped her sister would share her feelings more openly with her family
"I like to be pregnant," she said
"It means to me that this experience can't be better..."
"She just doesn't want anyone to change her happy moments and her happy pregnancy, so I'm really proud of her. She sticks to her stand and can tell her story in her own way, thanks to Vivien killiea Getty and Kylie, who say she's really doing..."
"We understand why you're keeping it a secret."... " Kelly always wanted to be a mom, so it was really exciting for her
"Everyone said," OK, we get it. "
"People say, 'we're going to publish, we're going to announce,' and I say, 'no! "But she did it perfectly and it was a very positive experience for her." "Absolutely right," Kim said
"That's too anxious for me," she said
"It's our secret! "Mom Chris, 62, admits it's not easy to hide the news."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Grace and Frankie, Streaming now, Netflix...”
“We sure hope so.”
“...the popularity of the show if a sixth season is in the cards could we see that 9 to 5 reunion...”
“We hope our show will inspire and entertain families and folks of all generations and I want to thank the good folks at Netflix and Warner Bros TV for their incredible support From the sounds of it Parton isn t likely to show up in Season 5 either but with...”
“I am thrilled to be bringing some of my favorite songs to life with Netflix.”
“The country star made a statement, “As a songwriter, I have always enjoyed telling stories through my music.”
“Much like her NBC films, Coat of Many Colors and Coat of Many Colors: Circle of Love, Parton’s Netflix project will see her take on the role of executive producer, singer-songwriter, and she will act in the series.”
“The episodes would be based on Parton’s songs with each installment covering a song a piece.”
“Details on Parton’s deal were made public on Monday, as the streaming service shared that it has partnered with the multi-hyphenate on an eight-part anthology series.”
“Tomlin added that it may be difficult as Parton has her own deal with Netflix in the works.”


"Grace and Frankie, now streaming, Netflix..."
"We certainly hope so."
“… If the sixth season is coming, can we see nine or five reunions... "
"We hope our show will inspire and entertain families and people of all generations, and I want to thank the good friends of Netflix and Warner Bros. for their incredible support, because Parton is unlikely to be in season 5, but there are..."
"I'm happy to bring my favorite songs to Netflix's life."
"As a songwriter, I always like to tell stories through music," the country singer said
"Like her NBC films multicolor coat and multicolor coat: the cycle of love, Patton's Netflix project will be run by her as executive producer, singer and songwriter, and she will play a role in the series."
"These episodes will be based on Patton's songs, one song for each issue."
"Details of the parton deal were announced on Monday as streaming media services revealed that it has teamed up with multi-hyphenate to launch an eight part Anthology Series."
"Tomlin added that it could be difficult because Patton has her own job dealing with Netflix."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Raise the roof!”
“Proving she was the adventurous type, North took her place at the bow of their gondola.”
“...mirrored shades Young fashionistas The kids of the group gave their parents a serious run for their money in the style department Best tressed Mother of three Kourtney tucked her shoulder length long bob behind her ears for a polished touch Kim s eldest North four was dressed in orange...”
“Kim gave her tresses a slick center part as they cascaded down her front to hit about hip length Boat trip The family made sure to catch the much beloved It s A Small World ride In the bag Putting practicality over presentation Kourt carried a backpack while accessorizing with...”
“Day out: Kourtney brought along her kids Penelope and Reign, but her eldest Mason didn't appear to join the groupSimple: Besides her, Kourtney went for minimalist-chic in all black, wearing a navy sweatshirt with clingy black leggingsRapunzel!”
“The kids of the group gave their parents a serious run for their money in the style department.”
“The mother-of-three tucked her shoulder length long bob behind her ears for a polished touch.”
“...practicality over presentation she carried a backpack while accessorizing with mirrored shades...”
“Daughter North was happy to be at the park with mom Going to the sock hop Baggy socks teamed with stone colored kicks which appeared to a new shoe from hubby Kanye Easy rider Kim had a blast as she sped down Big Thunder Mountain Railroad with the kids Putting...”
“The Armenian-American beauty styled her black hair straight as possibleHaving the time of her life!”


"Lift the roof!"
"To prove that she was the kind of adventurous person, North had a place in the bow of their gondola."
“…… Young fashionistas are a group of children who have a serious campaign for their parents in the fashion department. They are the mothers of the best three children. Courtney tucked his shoulder length Bob behind his ear for an elegant touch. Kim's boss, North four, is dressed in orange... "
"Kim gave her hair a smooth central part as they cascaded down in front of her and hit the boat about the hip length. Traveling family members must catch up with the most popular one. This is a small world ride in the bag to introduce the practicality of Kurt carrying a backpack at the same time with..."
"Going out: Courtney took her children Penelope and Rafe, but her big Mason didn't seem to join the group. Simple: in addition to her, Courtney also wore an all black minimalist fashion, a navy blue sweatshirt and a sticky black long legged princess with long hair!"
"The children of this organization have a serious campaign for their parents in the fashion department."
"The mother of three put Bob shoulder length behind her ears and polished it
“… She carries a backpack, while accessories and mirror shadows... "
"My daughter, north, is very happy to go to the park with her mother. She is wearing loose socks and stone colored kicks. She looks like a new pair of shoes from her husband, Kanye Easy Rider. Kim is galloping down the Dali mountain railway. The children
This American Armenian beauty combed her black hair as straight as she could and spent her whole life



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Ashton Kutcher and Josh Groban...”
““[Being] comfortable with your body,” she said.”
“January Jones is not holding back when it comes to talking about being a single mother — and the damper it can put on intimacy.”
““It limits your sex life, for sure,” the 40-year-old Mad Men alum said during an interview with Violet Gray published on Friday, January 26.”
“She explained: “Because you can’t bring someone home when your kid’s coming into the room.”
“Honestly, my son turns up in the middle of the night and asks for a massage, and then I fall asleep.”
“I imagine that’s what marriage is like?”But the blonde beauty — who has recently been linked to The Bachelor’s Nick Viall — revealed how important she thinks lovemaking is.”
““Sex, what’s that?”
“As my mom always said, sex is a gauge of your relationship, so if you have a good relationship you should be having sex regularly,” Jones told the outlet.”
““Even if you’re angry or you’ve been together for a million and five years.”


"Ashton Kutcher and Josh Groban..."
"Feel comfortable with your body," she said
"January Jones didn't flinch when it comes to single mothers - it's going to hurt intimacy."
"It definitely limits your sex life," the 40 year old advertising maniac alumnus said in an interview with the January 26 issue of violet gray
"Because when your child comes into the room, you can't take someone home," she explained
"To be honest, my son came to me for a massage in the middle of the night, and then I fell asleep."
"I think marriage is like this? "But this blonde - recently linked to single Nick Villar - revealed how important she thought it was to have sex."
"Sex, what's that?"
"As my mother used to say, sex is a measure of your relationship, so if you have a good relationship, you should have sex regularly," Jones told the media
"Even if you're angry or you've been together for 105 years."



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The catastrophe in Mexico City led to the death of over one hundred people.”
“Not only has there been hurricanes this year, but Mexico suffered its own disaster in the form of an earthquake.”
“AdvertisementThe administration for disaster relief in the United States said Texas should not rely on federal funds for the rebuilding of the destroyed city.”
“The governor of Texas previously said the bill would be billions of dollars.”
“As CI readers know, this year has proven to be particularly deadly as hurricane season in 2017 ravaged through not only several Caribbean Islands but Houston, Texas as well.”
“The alliance features some of the biggest names in arts, sports, and celebrities in Hollywood and offers humanitarian relief to those in need.”
“On Wednesday, Marc Anthony and Lopez announced the creation of an organization called Somos Una Vos which means “We’re One Voice” in Spanish.”
“#tiotomás #titiadela #familia #puertorico #unidosporpuertorico #LOVE #lovemakestheworldgoround #TioNegroImissyou A post shared by Jennifer Lopez (@jlo) on Sep 27, 2017 at 2:58pm PDTIn her post, Lopez wrote after six long days they found her family, so the “rebuilding” begins.”
“Now the rebuilding begins!!”
“After a long 6 days we found the last of the family!”


"The disaster in Mexico City killed more than 100 people."
"This year, there are not only hurricanes, but also Mexico's own disasters in the form of earthquakes."
"The U.S. disaster relief agency said Texas should not rely on federal funds to rebuild destroyed cities."
"The governor of Texas had previously said that the bill would amount to billions of dollars."
"As Ci readers know, the hurricane season of 2017, which swept not only several islands in the Caribbean, but also Houston, Texas, has proved particularly lethal."
"The alliance features some celebrities in Hollywood's art, sports and celebrity circles, and provides humanitarian relief to those in need."
On Wednesday, Mark Anthony and Lopez announced the creation of an organization called "Somos una Vos," which means "we are one voice" in Spanish
"Tiotoma á s ţ titiadela ţ family ţ PuertoRico ţ unidosporpuertorico ţ love ţ love makes the world gold ţ tionegroimeissyou wrote in her post at 2:58 p.m. on September 27, 2017 that after six long days, they found her family, and" Reconstruction "began."
"Now reconstruction begins!"
"After six long days, we found the last child in the family!"



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Each brave voice that is raised, heard and credited by our watchdog media will ultimately change the game.””
“The behavior is inexcusable, but the abuse of power familiar.”
“And If everybody knew, I don’t believe that all the investigative reporters in the entertainment and the hard news media would have neglected for decades to write about it.”
“I didn’t know about these other offenses: I did not know about his financial settlements with actresses and colleagues; I did not know about his having meetings in his hotel room, his bathroom, or other inappropriate, coercive acts.”
“Harvey supported the work fiercely, was exasperating but respectful with me in our working relationship, and with many others with whom he worked professionally.”
“Not everybody knew.”
“One thing can be clarified.”
“The intrepid women who raised their voices to expose this abuse are our heroes.”
““The disgraceful news about Harvey Weinstein has appalled those of us whose work he championed, and those whose good and worthy causes he supported.”


"Every brave voice raised, heard and praised by our monitoring media will eventually change the game."
"This kind of behavior is unforgivable, but the abuse of power is familiar."
"If everyone knows, I don't believe that all investigative journalists in the entertainment industry and hard news media will ignore the coverage of this matter for decades."
"I don't know about these other crimes: I don't know about his financial reconciliation with actresses and colleagues; I don't know about his meetings in hotel rooms, bathrooms, or other inappropriate coercion."
"Harvey is very supportive of this work. In our working relationship, he is very angry with me, but he also respects me, and he has cooperated with many other people professionally."
"Not everyone knows."
"There is one thing to clarify."
"The intrepid women who loudly expose this abuse are our heroes."
"The disgraceful news about Harvey Weinstein shocked us. He supported our work and their cause."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We know that we signed up for this, but our kids did not.””
“It’s never a story revolving [around] them or about them or anything too personal.”
“According to Kim Kardashian West, her three kids with husband Kanye West — daughters North, 5, Chicago, 5 months, and son Saint, 2½ — are pretty much in the dark about their mom and dad’s level of fame.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It’s pretty intense, but at home I’m not known,” she recently told ITV’s This Morning.”
““My kids have no clue what’s going on.”
“So I don’t really feel it — I spend most of my time at home.”When it comes to her mom and sisters, however, 37-year-old Kardashian West said they do reflect on how much their lives have changed in recent years.”
““We do talk about how crazy our life has been over the past decade,” she said.”
““And we’re so grateful.”
“We’re so appreciative, and I mean, we’re still exactly the same.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"We know we signed up, but our kids didn't."
"It's never been a story about them, or about them, or anything too personal."
"According to Kim Kardashian West, the three children of her husband Kanye West - five-month-old daughter north, five-month-old Chicago and two-and-a-half-year-old son Saint - know little about their parents' level of fame."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's quite intense, but at home I don't know," she recently told ITV this morning
"My child doesn't know what happened."
"So I didn't really feel it - I stayed at home most of the time." However, Kardashian West, 37, said of her mother and sisters that they did reflect on how much their lives had changed in recent years
"We're really talking about how crazy our lives have been over the past decade," she said
"We are very grateful."
"We're very grateful. I mean, we're exactly the same." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's a great honor to have the opportunity to perform it on the Billboard Music Awards' international stage, in celebration of the film's 20th anniversary."”
““I'm so grateful to the late James Horner, and to Will Jennings, for writing it and creating the opportunity for me to be part of Titanic, an amazing film whose legacy will continue for generations to come.”
“"This song means a lot to me, and it has played such a huge role in my career,” Dion said in a statement.”
“The French-Canadian singer will be celebrating the 20th anniversary of Titanic with a performance of the Oscar-winning ballad "My Heart Will Go On."”
“This year's Billboard Music Awards may be stacked with the hottest stars of right now, but Celine Dion will be taking us back to 1997.”


"It's a great honor to have the opportunity to perform on the international stage of the Billboard Music Awards to celebrate the film's 20th anniversary."
"I am very grateful to the late James Horner and will Jennings, who wrote this film and created the opportunity for me to take part in Titanic. This is an amazing film, and the legacy of this film will be handed down from generation to generation."
"This song means a lot to me and has played a huge role in my career," Dion said in a statement
The French Canadian singer will celebrate the 20th anniversary of Titanic by singing the Oscar winning ballad "my heart will continue."
"This year's Billboard Music Awards may have the most popular stars, but Celine Dion will take us back to 1997."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may also be able to restore your clothes with some common household supplies, like baking soda, coffee, or hydrogen peroxide.”
“If the fading is from normal washing and wear, dyeing the garment back to the original color can give it a new life!”
“In that case, washing your clothes with salt or vinegar may help your clothing look like new again.”
“Sometimes, detergent can build up on laundry, making it look dull.”
“Luckily, there are a few different ways you can restore the vibrant color to your garments.”
“It can be really frustrating to buy colorful clothing only to see it fade as soon as you wash it.”


You can also use some ordinary household products to repair your clothes, such as baking soda, coffee or hydrogen peroxide
"If the fading is caused by normal washing and wearing, dyeing the clothes into primary colors can give them a new life!"
In this case, washing with salt or vinegar can make your clothes look new
"Sometimes the washing powder will pile up on the clothes and make them look dull."
"Fortunately, there are several different ways to restore a bright color to your clothes."
"It's really frustrating to buy colorful clothes and fade them after washing them."



**Something goes wrong**
“I like to have some good food.””
“He said, “house parties are pretty casual.”
“However, one thing that keeps him grounded is hanging out with his friends.”
“It’s been an exciting time for the Jonas brothers with Joe getting engaged and also the release of Nick’s latest track.”
“News that around 30 people came together during an outing at an Italian eatery in New York City.”
“AdvertisementA source said to E!”
“He said, “the casserole thing with her is on lock.”As you may already know, Nick and the rest of his brothers including Frankie, Kevin, and his wife Danielle, met up earlier in the month to celebrate Joe Jonas’ engagement to Sophie Turner.”
“He explained, “I think it’s a really nice thing for her.”Home A post shared by Nick Jonas (@nickjonas) on Nov 12, 2017 at 1:02pm PSTAdditionally, he loved Denis Jonas’ cooking skills and explained that his mother makes the best sweet potato casserole.”
“She does it every time with a big smile!”He added now that her boys are all grown up and out of the house, doing his laundry makes Nick’s mother feel like a mom again.”
“When asked what Jonas does upon seeing his mother for the first time, the performer said, “Laundry – I ask for my mom to do my laundry.”


"I like to eat delicious food."
"Family gatherings are casual," he said
"However, there is one thing that keeps him grounded, and that is to be with his friends."
"It's an exciting time for the Jonas Brothers, Joe is engaged and Nick's latest repertoire is on."
"About 30 people got together during an outing at an Italian restaurant in New York City."
"A source said to me!"
"The casserole with her is locked in," he said As you may already know, Nick and his other brothers, including Frankie, Kevin and his wife Danielle, met earlier this month to celebrate the engagement of Joe Jonas and Sophie Turner
"I think it's really a good thing for her," he explained On November 12, 2017, at 1:02 p.m., Nick Jonas (@ nickjonas) shared a post. In addition, he liked Dennis Jonas's cooking and explained that his mother made the best sweet potato casserole. "
"She laughs happily every time! "He added that now her children have grown up, come out of the house, wash Nick's clothes and make Nick's mother feel like a mother again."
When asked what Jonas did when he first met his mother, the performer said, "wash the clothes - I asked my mother to do it for me."



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The Seattle Seahawks quarterback and his wife, Ciara, went out for a night on the town at the Seattle Art Museum, to take in the Yayoi Kusama exhibit -- but Wilson went the extra mile and surprised his ladylove by getting the museum all for themselves.”
“The singer took to Instagram on Sunday to share a video of her and Russell, seen only in silhouette, inside one of the installations included in Kusama's "Infinity Mirrors" exhibit.”
“"When Ya Man Shuts Down The Museum For #DateNight...”
“Still Got My Head Spinnin," Ciara captioned the post.”
“NEWS: Ciara & Russell Wilson Share Pics From Their Amazing Trip to ChinaThe video was taken in one of the show's many "Infinity Mirrored" rooms, giving a perspective of endless expanse.”
“This particular installation is titled "Aftermath of Obliteration of Eternity."”
“Ciara also posted a clip of herself dancing in another mirror room, titled "Phalli’s Field."”
“NEWS Ciara Shows Off Fit Figure at the Gym Making Progress Wilson and Ciara who celebrated their 1 year wedding anniversary in July also posed for pics in a number of other installations including the Obliteration Room where the couple added their own stickers to the millions of other colorful...”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The Seattle Seahawks quarterback and his wife, Sheila, spent an evening in the small town of the Seattle Museum of art to see the exhibition of kusana - but Wilson took a big step and surprised his wife because he got the museum himself."
On Sunday, the singer shared a video of her and Russell on instagram, which only appeared in a device in the "infinite mirror" exhibition of Kusama
"When you close the museum for date night..."
"My head is still spinning," Sheila wrote in the title of the post
News: Ciara and Russell Wilson share photos of their amazing trip to China. This video is taken in one of the many "infinite mirror" rooms of the show, giving people an infinite perspective
This device is called "the consequence of eternal annihilation."
Siala also uploaded a video of herself dancing in another mirror room, called "fali's field."
"News of siala's body progress at the gym shows Wilson and siala who celebrated their first wedding anniversary in July and also put photos in some other installations, including the erasure room, where the couple added their own stickers to millions of other colors..."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“More From Kevin Yeomanadvertising...”
“Kevin is a member of the TCA.”
“It’s the time of year for people to exchange shiny trinkets and baubles with one another, and just in time, The Orville has a line of merchandise inspired by the show for those last-minute gift givers or super-fans looking to treat themselves.”
“Season 2 of the Star Trek inspired sci fi sorta comedy from Seth MacFarlane is headed to FOX just before 2018 calls it a day and the folks from NECA Rizolli Ripple Junction Titan Kidrobot Dark Horse Rittenhouse not the evil organization from NBC s Timeless and Think Geek are...”
“...ready with a ton of merchandise to help mark the occasion...”
“The Orville is full of otherworldly possibilities when it comes to merch but the abovementioned companies have mostly kept things terrestrial in design with a variety of T shirts and coffee mugs emblazoned with the show s logo or versions of the badges worn by various members of the crew...”
“Engineer Security Medical etc...”
“Meanwhile, for those who don’t necessarily want to wear their love for the show, there are plenty of toys and other collectibles ready to eat up some shelf space in your home.”
“...advertising One of the more interesting offerings from The Orville Catalog of Stuff is The World of the Orville book from Titan which delivers a look behind the scenes of the series and offers a glimpse at some of the concept art from the show so curious fans can see...”
“...what went into bringing the series to life...”


"More about Kevin yeoman advertising..."
"Kevin is a member of the TCA."
"It's the time of the year when people exchange shiny trinkets and trinkets with each other. Just in time, Orville has a series of products inspired by the show, for those who give gifts at the last minute or want to reward their super fans."
"Inspired by Star Trek, the second season of Seth MacFarlane's science fiction Comedy Star Trek will be released soon. Just at the end of 2018, audiences from NECA rizolli ripple junction Titan kidobot black horse Rittenhouse are not NBC's eternal evil organization, they think geeks are..."
“… Prepare a ton of goods to commemorate this moment... "
"The Orville is full of extraordinary possibilities in Mercer, but most of the above companies keep the ground things in their design, including various T-shirts and coffee cups with exhibition logo, as well as badge versions worn by different crew members..."
"Engineers, safety, medical care, etc..."
"At the same time, for those who don't necessarily want to wear their favorite clothes to the show, there are a lot of toys and other collections at home that can be used to eat some shelf space."
“… One of the more interesting products in the advert Orwell catalog is Titan's Orwell world, which introduces the behind the scenes scenes of the series and provides a glimpse of the concept art of the play. Curious fans can see... "
“… What makes this series come to life... "



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More:XXXTentacion murder suspect to get mental competency examMore:3rd suspect arrested in slaying of rapper XXXTentacion...”
“Newsome was booked into Broward County's Main Jail on charges of first-degree murder and robbery with a deadly weapon.”
“The gunmen fled with a Louis Vuitton bag containing $50,000.”
“Officials have said a struggle ensued when the rapper's sports car was blocked by another vehicle, two masked gunmen approached and shot XXXTentacion multiple times.”
“The 20-year-old rap star, whose real name was Jahseh Onfroy, was fatally shot as he left a motorcycle dealership.”
“...see YAWN in June...”
“The Broward County Sheriff s Office said in a statement Tuesday evening that 20 year old Trayvon Newsome was taken into custody after surrendering at his lawyer s Fort Lauderdale office around 5 p m Newsome and three other men are accused of killing XXXTentacion ex ex ex ten ta...”
“The Associated PressFORT LAUDERDALE, Fla. (AP) — The fourth suspect in the shooting death of emerging South Florida rap star XXXTentacion has turned himself in to authorities.”


"More: suspect of psychological ability in the murder of xxxentacion. Example: the third suspect was arrested in the killing of rapper xxxentacion..."
"Newsome was sent to Broward County's main prison on charges of first-degree murder and robbery with lethal weapons."
"The shooter escaped with a $50000 louis vuitton bag."
Officials said that when the rapper's sports car was blocked by another car, two masked shooters approached and fired several shots at xxtantacion, followed by a fight
"The 20-year-old rap star, whose real name is Josh onfroy, was shot dead while leaving a motorcycle dealership."
“… Look at June's yawn... "
"The Broward County Sheriff's office issued a statement on Tuesday night saying that 20-year-old trayvonne neusom was detained after surrendering at the Fort Lauderdale lawyer's office around 5 p.m., and neusom and three other men were accused of killing the top 10 teaching assistants..."
Fort Lauderdale, Florida (AP) - a fourth suspect in the shooting of emerging South Florida rapper xxxentation has surrendered to authorities



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Missy Elliott talks about how she influenced hip hop as an artist, as well as her personal rise to where she is today.”
“Because there are going to be times that people tell you you can’t do it or you don’t look the part, but I am a walking testimony.”Preach, Missy.”
“The two artists have collaborated on songs like “Burnitup!” and “Son of a Gun,” but they’re also close friends.”
“Jackson surprised Elliott by flying out to New York while touring in the UK to be the one to present her with the award.”
“The singer noted that Missy has raised the bar for artists in the music industry by being an artist who can do more than just rap.”
“Some act some choreograph some write hit songs some create whole new sounds some women are able to make their mark in one of these fields but there s only one woman who has made her mark in all these fields In other words Jackson continued on to say that...”
“...not only has Elliott made her mark on music but she s done so with boldness and courage She thanks the rapper for many things...”
“Her legacy, her character, and her friendship included.”
““I am so grateful for Missy’s beautiful soul.”
“I am grateful for her creativity, her energy, grateful for her soaring inspiration.”


"Miss Eliot talked about how she influenced hip-hop as an artist and how she developed herself to this level."
"Because sometimes people will tell you you can't do it, or you don't look right, but I'm a living witness." Preach, miss
The two artists worked together on Bernie Tupper! "There are also" gun sons, "but they are also good friends
"Jackson took Elliot by surprise. He flew to New York on a British tour and became the person who presented her the prize."
"The singer points out that missy has raised the bar for artists in the music world because she is an artist who is not just a rap singer."
"Some performed, some choreographed, some wrote pop songs, some created new voices, some women were able to make a difference in one of these areas, but only one woman was successful in all of these areas, in other words, Jackson went on to say..."
“…… Elliott not only made her debut in music, but also achieved it with boldness and courage. She thanks rappers for doing a lot of things.... "
"Including her legacy, her character and her friendship."
"I'm grateful for Missy's beautiful soul."
"I thank her for her creativity, her energy, her inspiration."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There are times when all of us have been sensitive, and sometimes feelings get hurt.”
“Says SJP: “When you’re on set, you’re working 90-hour weeks, you’re never home, you’re exhausted.”
“We’re professional actresses.”
“No.”
“As for the film, she had reportedly “openly refused to participate unless she was paid more.”“Are we the best of friends?”
“A Telegraph article goes into more detail about the rumored salary tensions that had long dogged the show, explaining that Cattrall had tried to negotiate a raise for herself after Sarah Jessica Parker became an EP after season two, which created distance between her and the other cast members.”
“The Sex and the City movie finally makes it onto our screens.”
““When they didn’t seem keen on that, I thought it was time to move on.”2008: The first movie comes out.”
““I felt after six years it was time for all of us to participate in the financial windfall of Sex and the City,” Cattrall said.”
“In an interview with Jonathan Ross that same year, Cattrall opens up about some of the long-running money tensions on the show.”


"Sometimes we are very sensitive, sometimes our feelings will be hurt."
"When you're on set, you work 90 hours a week, you're never home, you're exhausted," SJP said
"We are professional actresses."
"No
As for the film, she was reported to have "publicly refused to participate unless she was paid more." "Are we best friends?"
An article in the Daily Telegraph described in more detail the wage tension that had long plagued the show, explaining that after Sarah Jessica Parker became EP after the second season, katlar tried to negotiate a raise for herself, which created a gap between her and other actors
"Sex and the city movies are finally on our screen."
"When they don't seem keen on this, I think it's time to move on." 2008: first movie released
"Six years later, I think it's time for all of us to participate in sex and the city's economic windfall," katlar said
"That same year, in an interview with Jonathan Ross, katlar talked about some of the long-standing financial tensions in the play."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The 2017 MTV Video Music Awards will air live from the The Forum in Inglewood, Calif. on August 27 AT 8 p.m.”
“Surefire...”
“The nominees in the new section include Logic ft Damian Lemar Hudson for Black SpiderMan The Hamilton Mixtape for Immigrants We Get the Job Done Big Sean for Light Cara for Scars to your Beautiful Taboo ft Shailene Woodley for Stand Up Stand N Rock NoDAPL and John Legend for...”
“The VMAs have also added a new award category titled Best Fight Against the System that celebrates videos that inspire viewers to stand up against injustice.”
“The Weeknd, meanwhile, has his visuals for "Reminder" nominated for Best Direction, Best Art Direction and Best Editing.”
“Skip Marley is nominated for Best Pop, Best Direction, Best Art Direction and Best Visual Effects.”
“Perry's video for "Chained to the Rhythm" ft.”
“Behind Lamar is Perry and The Weeknd who both scored five nominations each.”
“Other Video of the Year nominees include Mars for "24K Magic," Alessia Cara for "Scars To Your Beautiful," DJ Khaled ft. Rihanna & Bryson Tiller for "Wild Thoughts," and The Weeknd for "Reminder."”
“AdvertisementThe rapper will be going up against The Weeknd, Bruno Mars, Ed Sheeran, Ariana Grande and Lorde for Artist of the Year as the VMA's take a page from the MTV Movie & TV Awards and has eliminated gendered categories.”


"The 2017 MTV Video Music Awards will be broadcast live at the forum in Inglewood, California, at 8 p.m. on August 27."
"Of course..."
"In the new section nominations include logical foot Damian lemma Hudson black spider man Hamilton Remix band immigrants we got the job done with big Sean light Kara scar you beautiful taboo foot shaylin Woodley stand up on the rocks of nordap and John Legend..."
"VMA has also added a new category of awards, called" best confrontation system, "which celebrates encouraging viewers to fight against unfair videos."
At the same time, his visual works for "reminders" were nominated for best director, best art director and best editing this week
"Skip Marley was nominated for best pop music, best director, best art direction and best visual effects."
Perry's video for connect to rhythm
"Behind Lamar are Perry and weekend, who each have five nominations."
Other nominations for best picture of the year include Mars for "24K magic," Alicia Kara for "scar to your beauty," DJ Khalid foot Rihanna and brysontiler for "wild ideas," and weekend for "reminder."
"Advertising rappers will compete this week for artist of the year with Bruno Mars, ed Sheeran, Arianna grand and Lord, and VMA will take a page out of the MTV film and Television Awards and remove the gender category."



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The hilarious, the emotional and the down-right awkward...Nicole Kidman had a certain glow about her at this year's SAG awards, featuring a berry pout and fully loaded lashes.”
“Here are the best viral moments from the Grammys 2020...”
“2018 GRAMMY AwardsTrust our London-look girl Rita Ora to be wearing Rimmel on the red carpet.”
“Rita Ora's vampy lipWhen?”
“We spotted the bullet via makeup artist's Daniel Martin's Instagram, and our guess is Dior's Addict Lacquer Stick, in Diablo 684, £27.50.”
“2018 OscarsAdvertisementElizabeth Moss was all class in a rose gold sequinned gown but turned up the heat with a hot fuschia lip.”
“Elizabeth Moss's punchy pink lipWhen?”
“Read next An A-list stylist answers our 6 most-pressing fashion questions Fashion An A-list stylist answers our 6 most-pressing fashion questions What would she wear on a Zoom date?”
“And of course, Vaseline's Intensive Care Cocoa Radiant Lotion, £5.99, was used to give her skin that extra glow.”
“Ashunta Sheriff provided the goods, revealing that she mixed two shades from The Lip Bar together – Liquid Matte Creme in Savage and Drama Queen.”


"Funny, emotional and downright embarrassing Nicole Kidman has a special shine at this year's sag awards ceremony. She pouts berries and has thick eyelashes. "
"Here are the most infectious moments at the 2020 Grammy Awards ceremony..."
"At the 2018 Grammy Awards, Rita ora, our London girl, will wear Rimmel on the red carpet."
When is Rita ora's vampire Lipp? "
"We found the bullet through makeup artist Daniel Martin's instagram, and we suspect it was Dior's addictive lacquer stick in Diablo 684, 27.50 pounds."
"Elizabeth moss wore a rose gold sparkle dress at the 2018 Academy Awards ceremony. The whole class was very enthusiastic, but she warmed up with her fiery Fuschia lips."
When are Elizabeth Moss's pink lips? "
"Read the next page A-list hairstylist answers our 6 most pressing fashion questions fashion A-list hairstylist answers our 6 most pressing fashion questions what will she wear on a zoom date?"
"Of course, Vaseline's special cocoa radiation emulsion (5.99 pounds) is used to brighten up her skin."
"The Ashunta Sergeant provided the goods and revealed that she mixed the two colors on the lipstick -- the liquid matte butter of Savage and the queen of drama."



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Yes, even Rubber Man... in whatever form that takes.”
“...for Season 8”
“The Harmon’s are scaring up drama at The Murder House with Director Supreme Paulson.”
“Connie, Sarah and Dylan.”
“Viviene and Ben Harmon are seen here in what looks a lot like the Los Angeles Murder House.”
“AHS #8 WITCHES RULE THIS SEPTEMBER — Ryan Murphy (@MrRPMurphy) June 14, 2018Since then, Murphy has posted shots of the Murder House and Coven casts on familiar sets.”
“The Coven/Murder House AHS crossover season won't be happening next year...because it's happening THIS YEAR.”
“Season 8 is the long awaited Murder House/Coven crossoverThe promise of the Harmons and the witches of Miss Robichaux's Academy pairing up for a season of chaos has been rumored for awhile... but Murphy didn't officially confirm the connection until June.”
“Seriously, flashbacks are almost as big an AHS staple as surprising sex scenes.”
“That being said, AHS will likely explore the lead-up to the disaster as well.”


"Yes, even the rubber man... In any form. "
“… Season 8
"The hamons are playing up the murder scene with the top Paulson director."
"Connie, Sarah and Dylan."
"Vivian and Ben Hammond are seen here, looking like the house of the Los Angeles murder."
"In September this year, witches ruled the country - Ryan Murphy (@ mrrpmurphy) on June 14, 2018, Murphy released photos of the murder house and the sorceress club on a familiar set."
"The coven / crimeter house ahs cross season won't be on next year Because it's going to be on this year. "
"Season 8 is the long-awaited murder house / witches intersection. Harmons and miss robichu's College witches promise to pair a chaotic season that has been rumored for some time... But Murphy didn't officially confirm the link until June
"Really, flashbacks are almost as important as unexpected sex scenes."
"Nevertheless, AHS is likely to explore the causes of the disaster as well."



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What happened in Game of Thrones season 8 episode 2?”
“Once the Night King was vanquished, all of the dead — including zombie Viserion — fell too, ending the Great War.”
“But after realizing that his zombified brother couldn’t be killed by normal means, the Hound tackled the Mountain through the crumbling Red Keep wall and the two both fell to their deaths.”
“...a horrific beating...”
“Meanwhile after convincing Arya to abandon her quest for vengeance on Cersei the Hound finally came face to face with the Mountain and it was time for Cleganebowl The Hound managed to stab the Mountain through the stomach with a sword and through the eye with a dagger despite taking...”
“Despite his injuries, he still made it to Cersei’s side and the twin Lannisters died together as the castle crumbled around them.”
“Jaime ultimately came out on top, but was mortally wounded in the process.”
“However, he was caught by Euron Greyjoy and forced into a fight to the death.”
“After Tyrion freed Jaime in hopes that he could convince Cersei to leave Westeros with him, Jaime attempted to sneak into the Red Keep to reunite with his sister.”
“Jon and Tyrion then watched on in horror as Daenerys transitioned fully into the Mad Queen some had long feared she would become.”


What happened to game of Thrones Season 8 Episode 2? "
"Once the night king is defeated, all the dead - including Vicario the zombie - will also fall, ending the war."
"However, after realizing that his zombie brother could not be killed by normal means, the hound rushed up the mountain through the collapsed red wall, and both of them fell dead."
“… Terrible beating... "
"At the same time, after persuading Arya to give up the pursuit of cersei's revenge, the hound finally faces the mountain. It's time for cleganeburg. The hound tries to pierce the belly of the mountain with a sword and the eye of the mountain with a dagger, even though it takes it away..."
"Although he was injured, he came to cersei. When the castle collapsed around them, the twin lannisters died together."
"James won the championship in the end, but was fatally injured in the process."
"However, he was caught by Oren greyjoy and forced to fight to death."
Tyrion releases James in the hope that he can persuade cersei to leave vestros with him. James tries to sneak into the red fort to reunite with his sister
"Jon and Tyrion watched in horror as daenerys turned into a crazy queen. Some people had long feared that she would turn into one."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[H/T Film School Rejects]”
“Let us know in the comments below!”
“Which cameo in The Last Jedi was your favorite?”
“You can get The Last Jedi on Digital HD now and on Blu-ray March 27th.”
“Even Mark Hamill earned an additional role, providing the vocalizations for the alien who attempts to put coins in BB-8.”
“Star Wars fans may have recognized saga staple Warwick Davis' voice during the Canto Bight scene, as the actor voiced one of the aliens in the casino.”
“Tom Hardy, Take That singer Gary Barlow, and Princes Harry and William all shared a scene together where they played Stormtroopers, yet the scene was reportedly absent from the final cut.”
“Actors Joseph Gordon-Levitt and Noah Segan, who have appeared in all of Johnson's films, both made brief appearances, with Gordon-Levitt lending just his voice to an alien character while Segan played a Resistance pilot.”
“Johnson managed to sneak in quite a few cameos in The Last Jedi, with some being more obvious than others.”
“The filmmaker returned the favor to Rogue One director Gareth Edwards, who made an appearance as a Resistance trooper during the battle of Crait .”


"[H / T film school refused]"
"Please let us know in the comments below!"
"Which guest star in the last Jedi was your favorite?"
"You can now see the last Jedi in Digital HD and Blu ray on March 27."
"Even Mark Hamill has been given an extra role to voice aliens trying to put coins in bb-8."
Star Wars fans may have recognized the voice of the legendary protagonist Warwick Davis in Cantor Bay because he voiced an alien in the casino
"Tom Hardy, take singer Gary Barlow as an example. Prince Harry and Prince William have a scene playing the stormtroopers together, but it is reported that this scene did not appear in the final clip."
"Actors Joseph Gordon Levitt and Noah Segan, who play in all Johnson's films, are all short-lived. Gordon Levitt only dubs an alien character, while Segan plays a fighter pilot."
"Johnson has successfully guest starred in a number of roles in the last Jedi, some of which are more obvious than others."
The filmmaker gave it back to Gareth Edwards, the director of hooligan one, who appeared as a resistance soldier at the battle of Crete



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch Rhimes and Washington discuss the ending above and see the portrait below.”
“...spoiler that I m going to hold onto for the rest of my life Also Read Ratings Scandal Series Finale Surges 44 Percent From Last Week Well that sounds par for the course for Rhimes...”
““Scandal” wrapped its seven-season run on Thursday night with a final episode that packed in fierce outfits, killer monologues and the most tragic death in the history of the series (RIP David Rosen).”
“It also gave us a Shonda Rhimes’ cliffhanger that probably made more than one Gladiator knock over their glass of red wine in shock.”
“And we’re sure if you saw the finale you already know we’re talking about that “YAS QUEEN!”-enducing painting of Olivia Pope (Kerry Washington) two young girls see hanging in the Smithsonian’s National Portrait Gallery.”
“You know, something that suggests she eventually becomes PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES.”
“Also Read: 'Scandal' Star Scott Foley on Why Series Finale Will Have Fans Asking 'Did That Happen?'”
“Following the episode, Rhimes, Washington and the rest of the cast sat down on “Jimmy Kimmel Live!” to discuss the ending, and of course that moment came up.”
“When the late-night host asked Washington what she thinks the portrait is doing there, she nervously answered: “Gosh, I really want Shonda to answer this question.”
“Because even in the script it s written that we don t know exactly why Rhimes jumped in to say It says the audience is left not knowing But of course the showrunner revealed she actually knows what s up adding I get one last thing to say as a...”


"Watch Rhimes and Washington discuss the ending above, and look at the portrait below."
“… Spoiler, I'll stick to the rest of my life also reading the ratings scandal series, ratings soared 44%, good from last week, sounds like the same course as Rhimes... "
Scandal ended its seven season broadcast on Thursday night with a final episode featuring fierce costumes, killer monologues and the most tragic death in history
"It also gives us a suspense about Sunda Rhimes, which may make more than one Gladiator upset their wine glass in shock."
"If you've seen the last episode, you know we're saying, 'Queen Arthur! "After Olivia Pope's painting (Kerry Washington), two young girls are on display at the Smithsonian National Portrait Gallery."
"You know, it shows that she will eventually become president of the United States."
"Also read: 'scandal' star Scott Foley why the series ending will have fans ask 'happened? '””
After this episode, Rhimes, Washington and other actors sit in "Jimmy Kimmel! "When we discuss the ending, of course that moment comes."
When the late night host asked Washington what she thought the portrait was doing there, she nervously replied, "God, I really want shoda to answer that question."
"Because even in the script, we don't know why Rhimes would break in and say that the audience didn't know, but of course, the performer revealed that she knew what would happen next, and I have one last sentence to say..."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It takes a man who's not only confident in the love that you have for one another, but confident in what he has going on in his own career."”
“"[Marriage] takes a lot of work.”
“I’m constantly rejected," Scarlett explained to Parade magazine.”
“It’s not necessarily true.”
“Because actors, if they’re not having success, connect it directly to unpopularity — to the fact that nobody wants them.”
“It's related to rejection.”
“"There's always going to be the more successful person.”
“They were married for two years before calling it quits in 2010 — and it seems their careers were to blame for the breakup.”
“Before Blake, Ryan was previously married to Scarlett Johansson.”


"It takes a man who is confident not only in his love for each other, but also in his career."
"(marriage) takes a lot of work."
"I'm often rejected," Scarlett explained to Parade magazine
"It doesn't have to be true."
"Because actors, if they don't succeed, relate it directly to unpopularity - to the fact that no one wants them."
"It's about rejection."
"There will always be more successful people."
"They announced their breakup in 2010 after two years of marriage - it seems that their career is the main cause of the breakup."
"Before black, Ryan married Scarlett Johnson."



**Something goes wrong**
“””
“Sunna Saaaaa,” one fan tweeted.”
“Former BFFs Paris Hilton and Nicole Richie, best known for starring together on their hit reality show The Simple Life from 2003 to 2007, have had their share of very public ups and downs over the years.”
“But now, over a decade after the show has ended, the former co-stars appear to be in a good place.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Hilton, 37, and Richie, 36, were photographed happily chatting at The Daily Front Row Fashion Awards in L.A. on Sunday, giving fans hope that a reboot of The Simple Life isn’t totally out of the question.”
“Image zoom Credit Stefanie Keenan Getty Hilton who showed off her gigantic 20 carat 2 million engagement ring went for full on glam wearing a black plunging Philipp Plein belted gown featuring a high slit paired with jeweled pumps while Richie opted for a natural makeup look and donned a...”
“...pink floral dress featuring beautiful beading along with Jimmy Choo accessories...”
“Image zoom Credit: David Crotty/Patrick McMullan/GettyLooking for more style content?”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”


“””
"Sunna saaaa," one fan tweeted
"Former boyfriends Paris Hilton and Nicole Ritchie, best known for CO starring in the 2003-2007 hit reality show simple life, have gone through ups and downs in public over the years."
"But now, more than a decade after the show, the former co stars seem to be in a good position."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On Sunday, Hilton, 37, and Ritchie, 36, were photographed chatting happily at the daily first row fashion awards ceremony in Los Angeles, which made fans hope that it's not impossible to start a simple life again."
"Stefanie Keenan Getty Hilton shows her 20 carat 2 million engagement ring. She is wearing a black Philips pleated lace up robe with high slits and gemstone heels, while Richie chooses natural makeup and wears one..."
“… Pink floral dress with beautiful beads and accessories from Jimmy Choo... "
"Image scaling credit: David Crotty / Patrick McMullen / gettylooking more style content?"
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hugging and kissing: Jason and Brittany were caught indulging in some scandalous behavior at The Den on L.A.'s Sunset Strip last weekMarried man: Jason and his wife, Jessica, pictured at the American Country Awards in December, share two children and have been married since 2001”
“The Bobcats dancer has deleted her own account on the social networking website after fans of Aldean labelled her a 'homewrecker', sent profanities and accused her of 'taking advantage' of the married country star.”
“Photos taken at a Hollywood bar show country star Jason Aldean, who is married with two children, getting very cosy with Brittany Kerr.”
“The 35-year-old appears to be all over the cheerleader, placing his arms around her waist and nuzzling her neck.”
“Sealed with a kiss Country music star Jason Aldean who is married with two children can be seen kissing former American Idol contestant Brittany Kerr both have since issued public apologies After flirting for a while Aldean can be seen leaning in for a kiss with the pretty blonde who...”
“...places her hands on his shoulders and reciprocates...”
“At one point, Aldean places his hand over Kerr's and the pair gaze intently into each other's eyes.”
“The pair were pictured last Wednesday night in the patio area of The Den, a popular hangout for locals and tourists along L.A.'s Sunset Boulevard.”
“Aldean, 35, was wearing a checkered shirt, silver hoops in his ears and bracelets, but must have left his trademark cowboy hat at home.”
“Very cosy The pair were gazing into each other s eyes as they partied at The Den in West Hollywood on Wednesday night Hands on The singer appeared to be all over the cheerleader Meanwhile 24 year old Kerr whose first time singing in front of people was at her...”


"Hugs and kisses: Jason and Brittany were found indulging in some shameful behavior in their study on Sunset Boulevard in Los Angeles last week. Married man: Jason and his wife Jessica, who were photographed at the American country awards in December, have two children and have been married since 2001."
"The bobcat dancer deleted her account on the social networking site because aldian's fans called her a" family wrecker, "blasphemed her and accused her of" using "the married country star."
"A picture taken at a Hollywood bar shows that Jason Aldean, a married country star with two children, is very close to Brittany Kerr."
"At 35, she seems to be full of cheerleaders, arms around her waist, nose against her neck."
"A sealed country music star Jason ordi, who is married to two children, can see that before the kiss, American Idol player Brittany Kerr has made a public apology after flirting for a while, Aldean can see in a beautiful blonde who kisses the tilt..."
“… Put her hand on his shoulder and respond... "
"On one occasion, Alden put his hand on Kerr's and the two of them focused on each other's eyes."
The two posed on the terrace of den, a popular place for locals and tourists on Sunset Boulevard in Los Angeles, last Wednesday night
"Alden, 35, is wearing a plaid shirt, a silver band on his ear and a bracelet, but he must have left his trademark cowboy hat at home."
"It's very comfortable. On Wednesday night, when they met in a pub in West Hollywood, they looked into each other's eyes and put their hands on the singer, which seemed to be the whole body of the cheerleader. Kerr, 24, sang in front of people for the first time, just beside her..."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Chappelle’s stand-up special was recorded in November at The Comedy Store in Los Angeles.”
“...assault last year...”
“...of sexual misconduct.”
““I shouldn’t say this, but f–k it, [C.K’s] allegations were the only one that made me laugh,” he said in his “Dave Chappelle: The Bird Revelation” special released on New Year’s Eve.”
““It’s terrible, I know it’s terrible.”
“I m sorry ladies At the same time you know what I mean Jesus Christ I don t know they took everything from Louis it might be disproportionate I can t tell I can t tell this is like where...”
“...it s hard to be a man Chappelle 44 went on to address C K s incident with writer Abby Schachner with whom he masturbated while on the phone...”
“She told the New York Times that it was “one of the things that discouraged her from pursuing comedy.”“One lady said, ‘Louis C.K.”
“...masturbated in front of me, ruined my comedy dreams,'” he said of Schachner.”
““Word?”


"Chappelle's stand up feature was recorded at the Los Angeles comedy store last November."
“… Last year's attack
“… Sexual misconduct. "
"I shouldn't have said that, but the f – k it, [C.K] accusation is the only one that makes me laugh," he said on the new year's Eve special "Dave Chappelle: Revelation of birds."
"It's terrible. I know it's terrible."
"I'm sorry, ladies, and you know what I mean, Jesus Christ. I don't know they took everything from Louis. It's probably out of proportion. I can't say. I can't say what this is..."
“…… It's hard to be a man. On the 44th, Chapel talked about the incident with the writer Abby Schachner. He masturbated with Abby Schachner on the phone... "
She told the New York Times that this was "one of the factors that hindered her pursuit of comedy."
"Masturbating in front of me ruined my comedy dream," he said of shachener
"The word



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: The Best Places to Buy Comfy Bras Online That Actually Fit...”
“With this guide, managing irregular bra cup sizes (yes, even for sports bras) should be a breeze, and sore, achy breasts from ill-fitting bras will be a thing of the past.”
“Bra size shouldn’t be a guessing game.”
“Best of all, knowing how to measure your bust will make adjusting to changes in your breasts (from losing or gaining weight, hormone fluctuations, aging, pregnancy, and more) so much less stressful.”
“All you need is a tape measure and a little free time, and you’ll have saved yourself a lot of bra-shopping misery.”
“Equipment is minimal.”
“...much easier especially for online shoppers...”
“Learning how to measure bra size can feel uncomfortable but knowing your measurements and keeping them written in a note on your phone or somewhere else that s accessible when the bra shopping mood strikes will make bra shopping so...”
“The best option is to know your bra size by taking bust measurements using these simple measuring instructions, which will ensure a perfect fit in band and in cup—and can even help you find the right amount of support.”
“...day or between washings...”


"Related: the best place to buy a really comfortable bra online..."
"With this guide, it should be easy to manage irregular bra cup sizes (yes, even sports bras), and breast soreness caused by unsuitable bras will be a thing of the past."
"Bra size should not be a guessing game."
"Most importantly, knowing how to measure your chest circumference will greatly reduce the stress of adapting to changes in your breasts (from weight loss or gain, hormonal fluctuations, aging, pregnancy, etc.)
"All you need is a tape measure and a little free time, so you don't have to buy a lot of bras."
"There are very few devices."
“… Especially for online shoppers... "
"It's uncomfortable to learn how to measure the size of a bra, but knowing your size and writing it on your mobile phone or other place where you can use it when your bra shopping mood hits will make your bra shopping so..."
"The best choice is to use these simple measurement instructions to measure your bra size, which will ensure that the bra fits perfectly with the cup and even help you find the right amount of support."
“… During the day or between washing and gargling... "



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#2018,” she said.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“5: 'A Little Too Romantic of a Concert'Chip Gaines is sharing a hint as to how his fifth baby reached conception.”
“The Fixer Upper star and his costar and wife, Joanna Gaines, announced Tuesday that they were expecting their fifth child together on social media.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The father of four shared how their next baby came about in a hilarious tweet, writing, “Hint #3 You might recall a few months back.. the ever amazing, ever romantic @JOHNNYSWIM was in Waco.”
“And they put on a little too romantic of a concert.. anyways, one thing led to another, & we are officially pregnant.”
“And I could not be more EXCITED!”
“5 7ThePerfectNumber Before his tweet Chip 43 let fans know on Instagram about their pregnancy writing Gaines party of 7 If you re still confused WE ARE PREGNANT joannagaines along with a photo of the couple cradling his fake baby bump while Joanna 39 shows off hers under a grey...”
“...sweater...”


"2018," she said
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"5:" the concert is a bit too romantic. "Chip Gaines is sharing hints about how his fifth child got pregnant."
On Tuesday, the "repairman" and his partner and wife Joanna Gaines announced on social media that they will have a fifth child together
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The father of four shared on a funny tweet how their next child was born," he wrote, "tip 3 you may remember a few months ago.".. Once amazing, once romantic @ johnyswim in Waco. "
"They put on a concert that was a little too romantic.".. In short, one thing leads to another & we're officially pregnant. "
"I can't be more excited!"
"5.7 his perfect number in front of twitter chip 43 let fans know that they are pregnant on instagram. If you don't understand that we are pregnant with Joan againes, there is a picture of a couple holding his dummy doll, and Joanna 39 shows her picture in a gray background..."
“… "Sweater..."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“As the carriage grew closer, Perreau wondered aloud if the new duchess would recognize her.”
“She appeared on television shows like Deal or No Deal and films like Remember Me, but her most notable role was as Rachel Zane on American TV show Suits, which she appeared on from 2011 to 2017.”
“But on her wedding day, her worlds collided when a surprise guest showed up.”
“After the nuptials at St George's Chapel in Windsor Castle, the happy couple embarked on a carriage ride through London.”
“However, they had no idea that ITV News, an English news station, had a special guest waiting for them.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“The moment Meghan saw our studio guest Gigi Perrreau - her drama teacher from #Immaculateheart School in LA.”
“The person you could say helped make today happen!!”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"As the carriage drew nearer and nearer, Perot cried out to see if the new duchess would recognize her."
"She has appeared in TV series such as trade or not and movies such as remember me, but her most eye-catching role is playing Rachel Zane in the American TV show set from 2011 to 2017."
"But on her wedding day, when a surprise guest appeared, her world collided."
After their wedding at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle, the happy couple rode through London in a carriage
"However, they did not know that ITV News had a special guest waiting for them."
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"When Megan saw our studio guest Gigi Perot, she was a drama teacher at flawless Heart school in Los Angeles."
"The person you can say helped to make this happen today!"



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The next year, Ricci was cast as the ominous Wednesday Addams in The Addams Family.”
“Later appeared in Cher’s ‘Shoop Shoop Song’ music video.”
“ADVERTISEMENTADVERTISEMENT Taylor Lautner Although he began appearing in small roles from the age of 9, Taylor Lautner first graced the big screen with his adorable face in 2005 in The Adventures of Sharkboy and Lavagirl – little did he know his career had barely started.”
“Nowadays, Taylor Swift has sold over 40 million albums worldwide, received 21 Billboard Music Awards, 10 Grammy Awards, 11 Country Music Awards and much more.”
“That same year, Swift was offered a recording contract and became the youngest ever artist to be signed by Sony/ATV.”
“At the age of 14, Swift and her family moved to Nashville to pursue her music career – and it definitely paid off!”
“ADVERTISEMENTADVERTISEMENT Taylor Swift Everyone has heard of T-Swizzle, whether you like pop and country music or not.”
“She is an advocate for women’s rights.”
“More recently, she appeared in the 2017 live-action adaptation of Beauty and the Beast and continues her work with the UN as a UN Women Goodwill Ambassador.”
“Outside of the magical world, Watson made her second Hollywood debut in 2013 in Perks of Being a Wallflower and The Bling Ring.”


The next year, Matteo Ricci was chosen as the ominous Wednesday Adams of the Adams family
"Later it appeared in Xueer's" shop shop song "music video."
"Although Taylor Lautner has played a small role since he was 9 years old, in 2005, in the adventures of shark boys and girls, Taylor Lautner appeared on the big screen for the first time with his lovely face. He hardly knew that his career had just begun."
Today, Taylor Swift has released more than 40 million albums around the world and won 21 Billboard Music Awards, 10 Grammy Awards, 11 country music awards and so on
In the same year, swift won a record contract, becoming the youngest artist ever signed by Sony / ATV
"At the age of 14, swift and her family moved to Nashville to pursue her music career - it was definitely rewarding!"
"Advertising Taylor Swift everyone has heard of t-swizzle, whether you like pop or country music or not."
"She's a feminist."
"Recently, she starred in the 2017 live action version of beauty and the beast and continued to work with the United Nations as a UN women's goodwill ambassador."
"Outside of the magic world, Watson made her second Hollywood appearance in 2013, which was a bonus for her as a wallflower and a shiny ring."



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bailed out: Walter got spooked and Ariana bailed out of the saddleBack on: Ariana after her tumble still rode Walter in competition'She looks so hot…you've already got a whip, maybe we just need a saddle or something, she can ride me,' he mused.”
“Sandoval went to watch her on competition day, but the setting proved too arousing for the sex-starved man.”
“While Jax boasted about having 'more sex in the last two days than the last six months', Tom Sandoval was peeved about his lack of action with Ariana.”
“'I wish Brittany would hook up with someone, to make it even,' he admitted.”
“Breakup sex: Stassi was surprised when Brittany admitted to having sex with JaxThe boys went to a pub to console Jax.”
“'I don't know why,' she cringed.”
“'I'm so confused about everything,' said Brittany, who admitted that she'd had sex with Jax a few times since their split.”
“Spa day: Brittany took Stassi Schroeder to a spa outing that was supposed to be a gift for Jax on their two-year anniversaryStassi advised Brittany to 'never' get back together with the promiscuous barman.”
“'Since he can't keep it in his pants…I'm taking Stassi,' said Brittany defiantly.”
“The romantic pampering was supposed to be a gift for Jax on their two-year anniversary.”


"Bail: Walter was startled, and Ariana was bailed out of the saddle: Ariana still rode Walter in the race after she fell down," she looks very sexy You already have a whip. Maybe we just need a saddle or something. She can ride me, "he said thoughtfully."
"Sandoval went to see her on match day, but it turned out that the scene was too exciting for men who were sexually hungry."
"When Jax bragged that" he had more sex in the past two days than in the past six months, "Tom Sandoval was annoyed by the lack of cooperation between him and Ariana."
"I hope Brittany can hook up with someone to make things fair," he admits
"Breakup sex: Stacy was surprised when Brittany admitted having sex with Jakes. The boys went to the bar to comfort Jakes
"I don't know why," she winced
"I'm confused about everything," Brittany said, admitting that she had sex with Jakes several times since they broke up
"Spa day: Brittany took Stacy Schroeder on a spa trip, which was originally a gift for Jakes' two-year anniversary. Stacy advised Brittany to "never" reunite with this lousy barman. "
"Since he can't hide it in his pants I'll take Stacy, "Brittany said defiantly
"This romantic love is supposed to be a two-year anniversary gift for Jax."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She’s kept an unusually low profile over the past few months, posting sporadically on social media and making few public appearances.”
“Swift most recently collaborated with Zayn Malik on “I Don’t Wanna Live Forever” for the “Fifty Shades Darker” soundtrack this year.”
“She typically releases a new album every two years.”
“It’s been three years since Swift debuted the mega-selling “1989,” marking the longest break between albums since she debuted her first in 2006.”
“It’s been rumored that Swift will also release a video for the new song at the ceremony.”
“Also significant: the MTV Video Music Awards are this Sunday.”
“This past Monday, she shared a cryptic 10-second video of a reptilian tail on social media.”
“Last Friday, the third anniversary of the day she announced her first pop album — “1989” — and unveiled its debut single — “Shake It Off” — she deleted every post on her Twitter, Facebook, and Instagram accounts.”
“The popstar had kept fans on their toes since last week.”
“Multiple sources told Variety that new music was coming this week, although Swift was expected to make the announcement on Friday.”


"In the past few months, she has been keeping an unusually low profile, posting sporadically on social media and rarely appearing in public."
Swift recently teamed up with Zane Malik to score "I don't want to live forever" for this year's "50 degrees of darkness."
"She usually releases a new album every two years."
"It's been three years since swift released her hit album 1989, the longest interval between her two albums since she released her first album in 2006."
"It is said that swift will also release a video of the new song at the ceremony."
"Equally important: the MTV Video Music Awards will be held this Sunday."
Last Monday, she shared a 10 second mystery video of a reptile's tail on social media
Last Friday, on the third anniversary of her debut pop album 1989 and her debut single "get rid of it," she deleted all posts from her twitter, Facebook and instagram accounts
"The pop star has been keeping his fans on the alert since last week."
A number of sources told variety that new music will be released this week, but swift is expected to announce the news on Friday



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And just like his big brother, Dylan definitely has the abs thing mastered (he’s on the far left in the picture above — and in the far right in the one below).”
“Image zoom Credit: Zac Efron Twitter“What’s the point of all the finish lines we cross in life if there’s no one there to celebrate with?” the actor wrote on Instagram at the time.”
“All About His Hot Younger Sibling DylanZac Efron and his brother Dylan are getting off the grid and heading out on an adventure.”
“The Greatest Showman star, 30, stated in an Instagram post — complete with baby goats!”
“— on Tuesday that they’ll be filming during their travels, but exactly what they’re working on isn’t clear.”
“Last year, the two teamed up to test outdoor gear for Columbia and road tripped to Montana.”
““I race endurance sports,” Dylan said in a social media video for brand.”
““I qualified for the Boston Marathon and I finished two Iron Man [triathlons].”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“He’s since ran the Boston Marathon, and his older sibling Zac stood on the sidelines in April to cheer him on.”
““This used to get me down when I felt alone- There’s many reasons BTW❤ – Ima be at every  with you from here until forever, Brother.”


"Like his big brother, Dylan has absolutely mastered the abdominal muscles (he's on the far left in the picture above and on the far right in the picture below)
"Image scaling credit: Zac Efron tweet" what's the point of all the finish lines we've crossed in life if no one's celebrating there? "The actor wrote on instagram at the time."
"Everything about his spice girl dylanzak Efron and his brother Dylan is about getting off the grid and starting an adventure."
"The greatest acting star, 30, said in an instagram post - and baby goat!"
"On Tuesday, they will shoot on the road, but the exact content is not clear."
"Last year, the two teamed up to test outdoor gear for Colombia and took a road trip in Montana."
"I love endurance sports," Dylan said in brand's social media video
"I qualified for the Boston Marathon and finished two triathlons." Get news, feature, etc
"He took part in the Boston Marathon, and his brother Zach stood on the sideline to cheer him on in April this year."
"When I feel lonely, it often frustrates me - by the way, for many reasons ❤  I'll be with you from here to forever, brother



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Otherwise, go for denim that lacks elasticity.”
“If you want a saggy butt or your inner thighs to look like they’re grasping for air then sure, go for it.”
“Stretch denim shorts do not look good on this body style in my opinion.”
“Here’s what I have found: AVOID ANYTHING WITH SPANDEX!”
“This is me (the NON super model option), so trust me with this.. I’ve tried everything.”
“So I’m going with an hourglass or pear figure human when it comes to this advice.”
“Supermodels you can wear anything.”
“Pear / Hourglass or “Small Waist with a Big ‘Ol Booty”Pear/Hourglass: Both are the same when it comes to shorts unless we are comparing a normal human with a supermodel.”
“Like the slender body style, the stretch will keep your shorts in place!”
“Straight figureNo matter what you weigh, this figure has a waist bust and hip measurement that are all pretty similar and this style of jean shorts would work really well for your figure.”


"Otherwise, buy jeans that lack elasticity."
"If you want your hips to droop or your inner thighs to look like you're breathing air, go ahead."
"In my opinion, stretch denim shorts don't look good in this size."
"Here's what I found: avoid anything with spandex!"
"This is me (non supermodel option), so please believe me.. I've tried everything. "
"So in this proposal, I'll use hourglass or pear shaped people."
"Supermodel, you can wear anything."
"Pear shaped / hourglass" or "small waist with big 'ol trophy'" pear shaped / hourglass: in terms of shorts, both are the same, unless we compare normal people with supermodels. "
"It's like a slim figure, the stretch will keep your shorts in place!"
"Straight body no matter how much you weigh, the waist and hip circumference of this body are very similar, this kind of jeans shorts is very suitable for your body."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jameson’s now doing the same thing.’”
“That was our bonding time and some of my favorite moments.”
“During an interview for Redbook magazine, Pink recalled that she even staged a ‘sit-in’ with daughter Willow Hart at her school once!”
“Apparently, the 6-year-old was really upset with her mom and was refusing to talk to her.”
“Desperate times call for desperate measures, right?”
“The superstar, who explained she is a ‘total crier’ said that ‘Willow won’t ever cry, and it annoys me to no end.”
“One day I had a sit-in at her school because I knew she was upset and she would not talk to me.”
“I sat down on the pavement and was like, ‘I am not moving until you tell me all about your feelings, because this is going to be a life-long conversation for you and I and you have to learn to let me in.’’Aww…what a good mother!”
“‘Without batting an eye, she goes, ‘I promise to tell you about my feelings more if you promise to tell me about yours less,’’ Pink went on.”
“That is just the best thing for a six-year-old to say!”


"Jameson is doing the same thing now."
"It was our intimate time and my favorite time."
"In an interview with red book magazine, Pinker recalled that she even had a sit in with her daughter willo Hart at school once!"
"Obviously, the six-year-old girl was angry with her mother and refused to talk to her."
"You need desperate measures when you're desperate, right?"
"The superstar explained that she was a 'downright whiner,' and she said: 'willow will never cry, which makes me very angry.'
"One day, I sat in her school because I knew she was sad and she didn't want to talk to me."
"I sat down on the sidewalk and thought," I won't move until you tell me how you feel, because this will be a lifelong conversation between you and me. You have to learn to let me in. " "Ah What a good mother
"She said without blinking an eye," if you promise to tell me less about your feelings, I promise to tell you more about mine, "Pinker continued
"For a six-year-old, that's the best way to say it!"



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more bio…”
“Furthermore, she is also the wife of NFL player Antonio Gates.”
“...reality series, WAGS LA.”
“Though she became famous for the reality TV Show, she was familiar with the camera before.”
“She used to appear as a model and also appeared on the music videos.”
“Recently, Barbie Blank confronted WAGS Star Sasha Gates for the stealing allegation on Nicole Williams Bachelorette party.”
“Here are the full details of the news.”
“Barbie Blank Confronted WAGS Star Sasha Gates For The Stealing AllegationIn the recent episode of WAGS LA, Autumn gave the clue to Barbie Blank about the latest spat over a couple of butt facials.”
“She told to Blank:“In old Sasha fashion, she just lied and tried to manipulate,”Though Barbie was upset that the once super-close friends couldn’t work it out, she did not keep Autumn from talking about Sasha.”
“Furthermore, Autumn continued:“She’s telling me that she’s going to your wedding in one breathe and in the next breathe she was accusing you of stealing her Rolex,”Blank got shocked knowing Sasha accused her of stealing.”


"See more profiles..."
"She's also the wife of NFL player Antonio gates."
“… Reality series, swing Los Angeles. "
Although she is famous for reality shows, she used to be familiar with cameras
"She has appeared as a model and in music videos."
"Recently, Barbie Blanc confronted wags star Sasha gates over theft charges at Nicole Williams' singles party."
"Here are all the details of the news."
"Barbie blank confronts wags star Sasha gates on theft charges in the latest episode of wags La, autumn, and she gives Barbie blank clues about recent spats over her buttocks and face."
"In the fashion of old Sasha, she just lied and tried to manipulate," she told blanke. Although Barbie was sad that her former super close friend couldn't solve the problem, she didn't stop Qiu from talking about Sasha
In addition, Qiu continued, "she told me that she was going to your wedding. On one breath, on the next breath, she accused you of stealing her Rolex." blanch was shocked to know that Sasha accused her of stealing. "



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Instead she instantly got to work putting her ideas into action.””
“Mulan didn’t even considering letting doubt get the best of her.”
“She completely defied tradition, obstacles and gender stereotypes to stand up for what she believed in.”
“...such a great example of a woman who ran with a crazy idea without worrying about what others might think...”
“We both had to push ourselves beyond what was considered to be normal based on our upbringing to learn about what is out there in the world in order to discover who we truly are Explaining further why she feels so inspired by the brave princess she says Mulan is...”
“I grew up in a town that was very isolated where most everyone was coming from one similar perspective.”
““[Mulan] grew up in a place where there were certain traditions that no one dared to deviate from.”
“She believes that dreaming big means, “never discounting your ideas as crazy, but instead finding ways to make them real because you wholeheartedly believe that your best adventure hasn’t happened yet.” Danielle says there’s one princess she relates to the most.”
“Today, Danielle works for Hasbro, shooting both lifestyle and product imagery that captures the joy and excitement of play and kids infinate imaginations.”
“While working as a respiratory therapist in the ICU, caring for critically ill patients, Danielle was driven to live her own life to the fullest and turned her passion for photography into a career.”


"Instead, she immediately set out to put her ideas into action."
"Mulan didn't even think about letting doubt take her lead."
"She sticks to her beliefs in total disregard of traditions, barriers and gender stereotypes."
“… This is a good example. A woman runs with a crazy idea, but she doesn't worry about what other people think... "
"We both have to go beyond what is considered normal based on our upbringing to understand everything in the world in order to find out that what we are really explaining is why she is so inspired by what she says about the brave Princess Mulan..."
"I grew up in a very isolated town where most of the people came from a similar perspective."
"Mulan grows up in a place with certain traditions, and no one dares to deviate from them."
"She believes that having a great dream means," never belittle your ideas as crazy, but try to make them come true, because you believe with all your heart that your best adventure has not yet happened. "Danielle said there was a princess who had the most to do with her."
"Today, Danielle works for Hasbro, photographing lifestyle and product images, capturing the fun and excitement of play and making children imaginative."
"While working as a respiratory therapist in the intensive care unit and taking care of critically ill patients, Danielle is driven to live her own life and turn her passion for photography into a career."



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We miss her so much.””
“Thank you for your support!”
“One year after the singer’s shocking murder after one of her concerts in Orlando, her family has released a statement offering gratitude to her fans for their support over the time since the tragic incident.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“We want to take this moment to say thank you to Christina s legion of fans worldwide and all the partners who contributed and are still contributing to her legacy the Grimmie family wrote as shared in a Facebook post shared on Sunday alongside a beautiful photo of Christina who...”
“...was only 22 when she died...”
““Your prayers, love, encouragement and support have been felt by us as a family and we are humbled and deeply appreciative,” they continued.”
““We too, are still healing, but know that we love each and every one of you.”
“Image zoomImage zoomImage zoomRELATED VIDEO: Christina Grimmie to Posthumously Release Four New Music VideosOn June 10, 2016, Grimmie was shot after performing as the opening act for Before You Exit at The Plaza Live venue near downtown Orlando.”
““We will always remember her, her music and her legacy,” Elmstedt added to the Sentinel of Grimmie.”


"We miss her so much."
"Thank you for your support!"
"A year after she was murdered at a concert in Orlando, her family issued a statement thanking fans for their support in the period after the tragedy."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We would like to take this opportunity to thank Christina's global fan corps and all the partners who have contributed to her legacy and are still contributing," the grimies wrote in their Sunday Facebook post, "share a beautiful picture of Christina, a picture of Christina..."
“… She was 22 when she died... "
"Your prayers, love, encouragement and support have been felt in our family, and we feel humble and deeply grateful," they continued
"So are we, still recovering, but knowing that we love each and every one of you."
"Video on image zooming and zooming: Christina grimy will release four new music videos after her death. On June 10, 2016, grimy was filmed as an opening performance before the end of her live performance in the plaza near downtown Orlando."
"We will always remember her, her music and her legacy," elmstead added to sentinel grimy



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But, truthfully, it’s very pleasing that people talk about Lili and I in that way because it means that we’re resonating so strongly from our character perspective that people really want that to be true."”
“"We’re all still human lives that are interacting with the source material.”
“...it s based so much on rumor and hearsay needs to be taken with a grain of salt he said of dating rumors...”
“But in the back of our minds there s still this nagging quote from Entertainment Weekly in which Sprouse made all of the speculation about their relationship seem like acting magic So I think that kind of discussion especially because...”


"But to be honest, it's very happy that people talk about Lily and me in this way, because it means that we have a strong resonance from a personality point of view, and people really hope it's true."
"We are all human beings interacting with raw materials."
“… It's built on rumors and hearsay that need to be taken in the salt, he said, dating rumors... "
"But in our mind, there is still a nagging saying from entertainment weekly, in which spruce makes all the speculation about their relationship look like magic, so I think this kind of discussion is especially because..."



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#MeToo https://t.co/liD7irs0o0 — Ariane Bellamar (@ArianeBellamar) October 30, 2017”
“— Ariane Bellamar (@ArianeBellamar) October 30, 2017‘Member when I tried to leave; you grabbed me by the ass, looked at yourself in the mirror, & said what a ‘beautiful couple’ we made?”
“‘Member grabbing my boobies on the  without asking??”
“‘Member when you cornered me in your trailer on the #Entourage set?”
“Anyone experiencing an unsafe working environment has several avenues for making complaints that we take very seriously.”Here is the trio of tweets by Bellamar about Piven and his alleged unwelcomed interactions with her, that triggered the response:Hey @jeremypiven!”
“Everyone at HBO and our productions is aware that zero tolerance for sexual harassment is our policy.”
“Said HBO today: “Today, via the press reports, is the first we are hearing about Ariane Bellamar’s allegations concerning Jeremy Piven.”
“Related Story IFC Films Acquires Feature Comedy 'Last Call' Starring Bruce Dern, Jeremy Piven & Taryn Manning“We are aware of the media reports and are looking into the matter,” a CBS spokesperson said Tuesday.”
“...media on Tuesday prompting CBS the network that airs Piven s Wisdom of the Crowd and HBO which carried Entourage to issue statements...”
“It takes a great deal of courage for victims to come forward with their histories and my hope is that the allegations about me that didn t happen do not detract from stories that should be heard Bellamar s October 30 claims on Twitter quickly were picked up by mainstream...”


"# maito https://t.co/liD7irs0o0- Ariana bellamar (@ Ariane bellamar) October 30, 2017
"- Ariane bellamar (@ Ariane bellamar) October 30, 2017 'when I try to leave, you grab my ass, look at yourself in the mirror and say how' beautiful a couple 'we are?"
"Members grab my chest when they come uninvited"
"Remember when you drove me to the corner in the trailer of the" entourage "set?"
"Anyone who has experienced unsafe work environment has many channels to complain, and we attach great importance to this." Here are bellama's three tweets about PI Wen, and his claimed unwelcome interaction with PI Wen, which triggered a response: Hey @ Jeremy Viven
"Everyone at HBO and our production company knows that zero tolerance for sexual harassment is our policy."
HBO said today: "today, through news reports, we heard for the first time the allegation of Aliana bellama against Jeremy Piven."
"It's reported that IFC has acquired the comedy" the last call "starring Bruce Dean, Jeremy Piven and Taryn Manning:" a CBS spokesman said on Tuesday. "We know the media reports and are investigating the matter."
“… The media on Tuesday urged CBS networks, people who broadcast the wisdom of Piven and HBO's entourage to make a statement... "
"It takes a lot of courage for the victims to show their own history. I hope that the accusations about me that have not happened will not affect the story that bellama said on twitter on October 30, which should be heard, and will soon be accepted by the mainstream society..."



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“All that accomplishes is multiplying the shame that…click here to continue reading...”
“That they should be locked away for their addictions.”
““For decades we have told addicts that their behavior deserves punishment.”
“It’s a health [crisis]not a criminal one Mr Sessions,” Embry wrote.”
““Opiate OD is the leading cause of preventable death in America at 50k last year alone.”
“Embry’s revelation came in response to Attorney General Jeff Sessions recently ordering federal prosecutors to seek the harshest possible criminal penalties for drug offenders.”
“The 38-year-old actor, best known for his role in the teen comedy Can’t Hardly Wait, revealed the details of his private battle with opiate addiction in a series of tweets.”
“Though he’s now sober—and he’s never relapsed—the memories are still fresh in his mind.”
“By Zach JohnsonOriginal Source: eonline.comEthan Embry revealed that he was once addicted to black tar heroin and prescription painkillers.”


"All achievements are double humiliation Click here to continue reading... "
"They should be locked up for addiction."
"For decades, we have been telling drug users that their actions should be punished."
"It's a health [crisis] not a crime," ambry wrote
"Last year alone, there were 50000 preventable deaths in the United States, and opioids are the leading cause of death."
"Ambry's disclosure is in response to attorney general Jeff sessions' recent order that federal prosecutors seek as severe a criminal punishment as possible for drug offenders."
"The 38 year old actor, known for his role in the teen comedy" can't wait any longer, "revealed details of his fight against opium addiction in a series of microblogs
"Although he is now awake and has never had a relapse, his memory is still fresh in his mind."
"Zach Johnson original source: eonline.comEthan Company Embry revealed that he had been addicted to black tar heroin and prescription painkillers



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The lady in red: Bella stood out in an elaborate ensemble in a shot taken earlier Monday...”
“Thankfully for both, a new law in the state of California, where Bella owns a home, made recreational marijuana legal.”
“The rapper, whose real name is Derek Smith, has been seen in similar circumstances on social media, and his apparent fondness has also made its way into his art, as his catalog includes tracks titled Ganja Farmer and Stoner Girl.”
“...enjoy a bit of marijuana himself from time to time...”
“Seeing red The actress kept warm in a fluffy red coat while making her way through the snowy town where she s promoting her movie Assassination Nation Focused The eccentric entertainer shared this shot to Twitter earlier this month The Perfect High beauty s boyfriend Mod Sun 30 appears to...”
“She wrote, 'Gimmie dat thing so I don’t have to clean my room...' in a caption to the image.”
“Earlier this month, she shared a shot on Twitter in which she was glassy-eyed and appeared to be reaching for a lit marijuana cigarette.”
“The social media-savvy stunner, who boasts more than 17 million Instagram followers, has past been seemingly open about her use of marijuana, which is illegal in the state of Utah.”
“The 5ft8 actress and her friends subsequently relocated to another local Marriott, ironically - Marriott's MountainSide in Park City - a source told the paper.”
“...duties toward the film as she called in sick for most of her press interviews on Monday and canceled everything in the morning amid the change of venue...”


"Lady in red: in a photo taken earlier on Monday, Bella's elaborate ensemble stands out..."
Thankfully, in California, where Bella has a home, a new law legalizes casual marijuana
"The rapper's real name is Derek Smith, and there has been a similar situation on social media. His obvious love has entered his art field, because his catalog includes a track called" ganja farmer and stone girl. "
“… I smoke marijuana from time to time... "
"Seeing red, the actress wears a fluffy red coat to keep warm as she walks through Syracuse, where she is promoting her film" assassinate the country. "The eccentric artist shared this picture with Twitter earlier this month, and the perfect high beauty's boyfriend mod sun 30 seems to be..."
"She wrote in a title of the picture," Gimmie dat thing, so I don't have to clean the room... "
Earlier this month, she shared a picture on twitter in which her eyes were glazed and she seemed to reach for a lit marijuana
"The social media savvy stuntman, who claims to have more than 17 million instagram fans, used to seem open to her use of marijuana, which is illegal in Utah."
"The 5-foot-8-inch actress and her friends later moved to another local Marriott Hotel, ironically on the hillside of Park City," a source told the paper
“… Responsibility for the film, because she took sick leave in most of Monday's press interviews and cancelled everything in the morning due to the change of location... "



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He told Letterman the label “wanted the association” but for that very reason, the deal couldn’t go through.”
“Jay-Z believes a trip to London spared him from jailJay-Z traveled to London in 1989 to visit EMI Records.”
““I want to have the emotional tools that it takes to keep my family together,” Jay-Z told Letterman on an episode of the Netflix show My Guest Needs No Introduction.”
“Jay-Z spoke with late-night talk show host David Letterman to clear up the rumors surrounding his alleged affair.”
“Jay-Z cheated on BeyonceThe singers both referenced a “Becky” on their albums — alluding to the woman Jay-Z allegedly had an affair with.”
“And if my children knew I don t even know what I would do Next What we know for sure about the family 3”
“Her song Hold Up gave the most obvious clues with the lyrics What a wicked way to treat the girl that loves you I smell your secrets and I m not too perfect to ever feel this worthless Jay Z nearly confirmed the adultery on his track 4 44 claiming...”
“In early 2017, Jay-Z released 4:44 and Beyoncé released Lemonade.”
“They lay everything out through their musicUntil his recent interview with David Letterman, the world only assumed Jay-Z cheated on Beyoncé by deciphering their music with a fine-toothed comb.”
“Next: How the couple does choose to share their story2.”


He told Letterman that the record company "wanted the association," but it was for that reason that the deal couldn't go through
"Jay-Z believed that a trip to London would save him from prison. Jay-Z went to London to visit EMI records in 1989."
"I want to have the emotional tools to keep my family together," Jay-Z told Letterman in a Netflix show, "my guests don't need an introduction."
"Jay-Z talked to late night talk show host David Letterman to clarify the rumors surrounding his alleged affair."
"Jay-Z cheated Beyonce, and these singers all mentioned a" Becky "in their albums - implying that Jay-Z is alleged to have an affair with a woman."
"If my kids know that I don't even know what I'm going to do next, it's family 3 that we've identified."
"Her song" hold up "gives the most obvious clue with the lyrics. How evil she is to treat the girl who loves you. I smell your secret. I'm not perfect. I never feel that this worthless jay z almost confirmed his adultery in Song 444..."
"In early 2017, Jay-Z released 4:44 and Beyonce released lemonade."
"They showed everything through their own music. Until he recently interviewed David Letterman, the whole world believed that jay z cheated Beyonce by deciphering their music with a fine comb."
"Next step: how the couple chose to share their story 2."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Story continues below advertisement—With a file from the Associated Press...”
“We can’t go back.”Watch the clip from The Tonight Show in the video above.”
“The late-night host, at times appearing to fight back tears, spoke about the events that took place on Saturday in Charlottesville, Virginia.”
“READ MORE Family publicly disowns white nationalist son after Charlottesville march Instead of a traditional joke filled monologue Fallon opened his show with an emotional condemnation of the attack that left a woman dead and U S President Donald Trump s failure to immediately denounce the white supremacist groups that...”
“...organized the rally...”
“Story continues below advertisementFallon said his Tonight Show isn’t political, but it’s his “responsibility to stand up against intolerance and extremism as a human being.”“What happened over the weekend in Charlottesville, Virginia, was just disgusting,” Fallon said.”
“I was watching the news like everyone else and you re seeing Nazi flags and torches and white supremacists and I was sick to my stomach READ MORE Critics say Charlottesville Police officers didn t do enough to stop the violence Fallon went on to say that his daughters who...”
“...are 2 and 4 were in the next room playing and he was thinking how can I explain to them that there s so much hatred in this world They don t know what hate is...”
“They go to the playground and they have friends of all races and backgrounds, and they just play, and they laugh, and they have fun,” he added.”
“Fallon said that “as kids grow up, they need people to look up to — to show them what’s right, and good.”


"The following story continues with the associated press file..."
"We can't go back." Take a look at the "Tonight Show" clip in the video above
The late night host, who sometimes seemed to hold back tears, talked about what happened in Charlottesville, Virginia, on Saturday
"After reading that more families openly denied the son of white nationalism, Charlottesville marched instead of a traditional joke full of monologues. Fallon opened his show to denounce the emotional attacks that led to the death of a woman, and US President Donald Trump did not immediately denounce the white supremacist groups..."
“… Organize a meeting... "
Fallon said his show tonight is not political, but as a person, he "has a responsibility to stand up against intolerance and extremism." "What happened over the weekend in Charlottesville, Virginia, was disgusting."
"I'm watching the news like everyone else. When you see Nazi flags, torches and white supremacists, I feel sick. I read more critics saying that the Charlottesville police didn't take enough measures to stop the violence. Fallon went on to say, who's his daughter..."
“…… No. 2 and No. 4 are playing in the next room. He is thinking about how I can explain to them that there are so many hatred in the world, and they don't know what hatred is... "
"They go to the playground, they have friends of all races and backgrounds, they just play, they laugh, they have a good time," he added
"As children grow up, they need people to respect them - to show them what's right and what's good," Fallon said



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementMeghan Markle will be in attendance as well.”
“However, it turns out that his little trip is set to end pretty soon as he also has to be there for Queen’s Young Leaders at Buckingham Palace reception on Tuesday.”
“...for...”
“Our programs of education and care provide the tools and knowledge that this vulnerable generation needs to live long happy healthy lives in the future According to Kensington Palace Harry will also be part of a board meeting of a conservation charity named Africa Parks that he is an advocate...”
“...young people affected by HIV in Lesotho and Botswana...”
“This was funded by the charity and is set to provide a space for kids to eat together and have indoor space to play Meanwhile on the charity s official webpage it can be read that Sentebale supports the mental health as well as the well being of kids and...”
“During this private working visit to Sentebale, the Duke visited one of its community-led partners for the opening of a brand new dining hall.”
“One spokesperson for the charity Sentebale (‘forget me not’) released the following statement: ‘The Duke was on a private visit to view the work of Sentebale at a camp for helpless children and youngsters, as well as other projects funded by the same charity.”
“Apparently, Harry is set to be in attendance at the opening of a brand new dining hall at the Phelisanong Children’s Centres on behalf of the charity he co-founded with close pal Prince Seeiso back in 2006.”
“We have learned that Prince Harry headed for a ‘private visit’ to Pitseng, Lesotho in South Africa without his new bride Meghan Markle.”


"Megan markel will be there, too."
"However, it turns out that his little trip is coming to an end soon, because he has to attend the reception of the Queen's young leaders at Buckingham Palace on Tuesday."
“… For... "
"Our education and care programs provide the tools and knowledge to enable this vulnerable generation to live a long and healthy life in the future. According to Kensington Palace, Prince Harry will also attend the board meeting of a conservation charity called Africa Park, which he is the advocate of..."
“…… Young people affected by HIV in Lesotho and Botswana... "
"This is funded by the charity, which aims to provide a space for children to eat together, and Sentebale can be seen on the charity's official website to support children's mental health and happiness..."
"During this private working visit to sendbell, the Duke met with a partner of a community leader to prepare for the opening of a brand new restaurant."
A spokesman for the charity Sentebale made the following statement: "the Duke made a private visit to see Sentebale's work in a camp for helpless children and teenagers, as well as other projects funded by the same charity."
"It's clear that Harry will represent the charity he co founded with his close friend Prince Seeiso in 2006 at the opening of a new restaurant at the phyllisaong children's centers."
"We learned that Prince Harry went to Peterson in Lesotho, South Africa for a" private visit "without his new bride, Megan markel



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And she grew up to be, like, really pretty, too.”
“Naturally, Crimi is also still a Mean Girls super-fan at heart.”
“Rather than getting into trouble or growing up too fast, Crimi focused on schooling, charity work, and seeing the world.”
“While we don't know the fate of her character, that's certainly not the case for Canadian Nicole Crimi who played the role.”
“There was a sense that Kylie was about to follow in Regina's footsteps in a big way, or that she may turn out even worse.”
“PG 13”
“These moments are emblematic of the movie s often very adult sense of humor the MPAA originally wanted to slap it with an R rating and several jokes had to be toned down in order to achieve that all important...”
“Gone Wild episode by lifting up her shirt...”
“The little sister to queen bee Regina is first shown emulating Kelis s dance moves in the music video for her hit song Milkshake when Cady enters the palatial George home and is later glimpsed playing along with a Girls...”
“What Regina George's Little Sister From Mean Girls Looks Like NowKylie George may have only had a couple short scenes in Mean Girls, but she made her mark.”


"She grew up to be very beautiful, too."
"Naturally, crimi is still a mean girl fan."
"Instead of getting into trouble or growing up too fast, Crimea focused on school education, philanthropy and seeing the world."
"Although we don't know the fate of her role, the Canadian Nicole crimi who plays it is definitely not like this."
"There's a sense that Kelly is going to follow Regina a lot, or that she may get worse."
"Page 13"
"These moments symbolize the film's usually very adult sense of humor. MPAA originally wanted to give it an R rating. In order to achieve this, several jokes had to be turned down..."
"It's crazy to lift up her shirt..."
"When Katie enters George's palace like home, Regina the queen bee's sister first imitates the dance steps of kylis in the music video, Katie's main song" milkshake ", and later sees her playing with a girl..."
"Regina George's sister looks like norkelly George in mean girl. She may have only played a few small plays in mean girl, but she is famous."



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Summer is coming and we are all getting super excited for a fun-filled season of growing, learning, and discovering!” she wrote in the caption.”
““Hey dear Campers!!”
“Chris Pratt and His Son Jack Enjoy a Boys' Night Out at Motorsport EventAction-packed father-son time!”
“Chris Pratt and his 5-year-old son Jack with ex Anna Faris were all smiles as they watched the action unfold at the Monster Jam celebrity event at Anaheim’s Angel Stadium in California on Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Sitting side-by-side, the Jurassic World: Fallen Kingdom star, 38, put his arm around his son as they gave the motorsport event two thumbs up.”
“Image zoom Credit: Ari Perilstein/Getty ImagesWant all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletterIn January, Pratt shared a sweet video of himself spending some quality time with his son at his farm on Instagram.”
““Livin’ that #farmlife ♥ Missing home, missing the farm, missing the boy, missing the island,” Pratt captioned the clip.”
“So I m sharing this video as a way to express my gratitude for all the blessings in my life and to entice any of you watching this who may feel unease or anxiety with the state of our world to just breathe slow down go outside find something not...”


"Summer is coming, and we are all very excited about this fun filled season of growth, learning and discovery! "She wrote in the title."
"Hi, dear campers!"
"Chris Pratt and his son Jack are enjoying a boy's night at a father and son time at a motor racing event!"
"Chris Pratt, his five-year-old son Jack and former Anna Faris watched the Monster Jam celebrity event at Angel stadium in Anaheim, California, on Saturday, and they were all smiles."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 38 year old star of "Jurassic world: Fallen kingdom" sat side by side, holding his son in his arms and giving a thumbs up to the car race
Photo zooming credit: Ali Perlstein / Getty imageswant all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blog? "
"Click here to share a sweet video of having a good time with her son on instagram farm in January's people's baby newsletter."
"Living a farm life" ♥  "Miss home, miss the farm, miss the boy, miss the island," Platt wrote in the clip
"Therefore, I share this video to express my gratitude for all the blessings in my life, and to tempt any of you who watch this video to feel uneasy or anxious about the state of our world, just slow down, go out and find something you don't need..."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Congrats again, you two.”
“I take out the trash.” SO sweet!”
“Over 7 years after the birth of their son, the stars have welcomed a precious little girl — we are SO thrilled!”
“Congrats to Hilarie Burton, 35, and her husband Jeffrey Dean Morgan, 51!”
“The duo have officially expanded their family, announcing the exciting news on March 1 via Twitter, after the One Tree Hill star gave birth.”
“The two are already the proud parents of 7-year-old son Augustus “Gus” Morgan, and now they have a second child — a baby GIRL — to shower with love!”
“We can only imagine how excited Hilarie, Jeffrey, and Gus must be!”
“Click here to see pics of some of the cutest celeb babies in Hollywood.”
““Hey y’all… baby gal morgan is spectacular,” Jeffrey tweeted to fans.”
““We just respecting her wishes for laying low a bit longer.”


"Congratulations again to both of you."
"I take out the garbage." Great
"In the seven years since my son was born, the stars have ushered in a precious little girl - we are so excited!"
"Congratulations to Hillary Burton, 35, and her husband Jeffrey Dean Morgan, 51!"
"The couple have officially expanded their family size and announced this exciting news through Twitter on March 1 after the birth of the star of" a tree mountain. "
"They are proud parents of their 7-year-old son Augustus" Gus "Morgan, and now they have a second child - a baby girl - bathed in love
"We can only imagine how excited Hillary, Jeffrey and GUS must be!"
"Click here to see pictures of some of Hollywood's cutest celebrity babies."
Jeffrey tweeted to his fans: "Hey, guys Little girl Morgan is wonderful
"We just respect her wishes and let her keep a low profile."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...his time and attention to his wife Ginni who is pregnant with their second...”
“Gigi Hadid has finally announced her baby daughter s name about four Kapil Sharma reveals why his show is going off air confirms second baby since Jan 2021 Ace comedian Kapil Sharma on Thursday confirmed that he will be away from television for some time as he wants to devote...”
“Gigi and Zayn Malik welcomed their daughter back in September.”
“RELATED: Ryan Reynolds, GigiGigi Hadid Just Announced Her Baby’s Name in Her Instagram Bio(since Jan, 2021) Gigi Hadid revealed the name of her baby in her Instagram bio!”
“The model and Zayn Malik welcomed a baby girl named Khai back in September.”
“...giving birth to her first child...”
“It was through her Instagram bio where the 25 year old supermodel simply wrote Khai Gigi Hadid Tells Vogue About Surrendering To The Pain Of Giving Birth Naturally Reveals What Taylor Swift Gifted Her on 04th of Feb 2021 Gigi Hadid is looking back on surrendering to the pain while...”
“PHOTO: Zayn Malik gets a tattoo on his hand of his and Gigi Hadid’s daughter Khai’s name written in Arabic(since Jan, 2021) 2021 started off on a bright note for ZiGi fans as Gigi Hadid slyly revealed her and Zayn Malik’s daughter’s name.”
“The first time mum, 25, gave aGigi Hadid Says Zayn Malik Helped Her Through Her 14on 04th of Feb 2021 Gigi Hadid opened up about giving birth to her daughter, Khai, at home in Pennsylvania with boyfriend Zayn Malik by her side.”
“Zayn Malik CAUGHT baby daughter Khai when girlfriend Gigi Hadid gave birth and had ‘terror in his eyes’, says modelon 04th of Feb 2021 GIGI Hadid revealed boyfriend Zayn Malik caught their baby daughter Khai when she gave birth – and said the singer had “terror in his eyes”.”


“… His time and attention are focused on his wife, Ginny, who is pregnant with a second child
"Gigi Hadid has finally released the name of her little daughter, revealing why his show has stopped, confirming the second child since January 2021. Ace comedian Kapil Sharma confirmed on Thursday that he will leave TV for some time because he wants to contribute for him..."
"Gigi and zayn Malik welcomed their daughter back in September."
"Related reports: Ryan Reynolds, Gigi Hadid just released her child's name in instagram's resume (since January 2021), and Gigi Hadid disclosed her child's name in instagram's resume!"
"In September, the model and Zane Malik ushered in a baby girl named Kay."
“… Giving birth to her first child... "
"The resume written by 25-year-old supermodel Kay Gigi Hadid on instagram tells vogue about the pain of giving in to childbirth, which naturally reveals the gift Taylor Swift gave her on February 4, 2021 - Gigi Hadid is reviewing the process of giving in to the pain, and..."
"Photo: Zaian Malik's hand is tattooed with the name of his daughter Kay and Jiji Hadid (since January 2021). Jiji Hadid cunningly reveals the name of her daughter and Zaian Malik, which has brought light to Qiji fans since 2021."
"The 25-year-old mother told Ajie Hadid for the first time that Zane Malik helped her through her 14-year-old difficulties on February 4, 2021. Ajie Hadid disclosed that she gave birth to her daughter Kay at her home in Pennsylvania, and her boyfriend Zane Malik was beside her."
"Zane Malik's eyes were filled with fear when his girlfriend Gigi Hadid gave birth to his youngest daughter Kay." On February 4, 2021, model Gigi Hadid revealed that her boyfriend Zane Malik caught their little daughter Kay while giving birth, saying the singer had "eyes full of fear."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think he was a little bit overcome."”
“During their visit, Kate helped out a little boy who felt sick, with a school mentor explaining: "Princess Kate came over and give him a sickbag, our little Craig.”
“...drug and alcohol addictions...”
“During their visit the couple toured the ruins of the original building before visiting the new cathedral where they met members of the choir and enjoyed a cup of tea with staff and volunteers at the Rising Café a social enterprise aimed at providing work and opportunity for those overcoming...”
“The new look was done very recently, as Prince William visited Coventry on Tuesday with Kate while sporting his usual hairstyle.”
“Prince William was all smiles as he debuted his new lookREAD: Prince William and Kate's royal tour details revealed – tea with Princess Victoria, dinner with Alicia Vikander and more!”
“Now in my case, I can see his," to which William responded: "You got there before Harry!"”
“In a speech, he said: "The thing about growing older is that your children get taller than you so they can see your bald spots.”
“His dad, Prince Charles, also joked about William's hair during William and Kate's wedding breakfast.”
“Prince William has previously poked fun at his receding hairline, telling hairstylist Taz Kabria: "I don't have much hair, I can't give you much business," during a visit to a café with a hairdresser's salon next door.”


"I don't think he can take it anymore."
During their visit, Kate helped a sick little boy. A school tutor explained, "Princess Kate, come and give him a sick bag, our little Craig."
“… Drug and alcohol addiction... "
"During the visit, the couple visited the ruins of the original building and then the new Cathedral, where they met with members of the choir and had a cup of tea with staff and volunteers at rising caf é, a social enterprise designed to provide jobs and opportunities for those who overcome difficulties..."
"The new look is a recent one, with Prince William showing Kate around Coventry on Tuesday and his usual haircut."
"Prince William shows off his new look with a smile: details of Prince William and Kate's royal tour are revealed - tea with Princess Victoria, dinner with Alicia wickander and so on!"
"Now in my case, I can see him," William replied, "you got there earlier than Harry!"
In a speech, he said, "the reason you get older is because your children are taller than you, so they can see your baldness."
"His father Prince Charles joked about William's hair at the wedding breakfast of William and Kate."
Prince William had previously joked about his fading hairline. While visiting a cafe with a hairdresser salon next door, he told hairstylist TAZ Cabria, "I don't have much hair. I can't give you too much business."



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pre-order my new sci-fi novel Herokiller, and read my first series, The Earthborn Trilogy, which is also on audiobook.”
“Brian Yorkey, Joy Gorman, Mandy Teefey, Kristel Laiblin, Tom McCarthy, Steve Golin and Selena Gomez are returning as EPs.”
“The original run of the Netflix original was one of the most talked-about series of the year, often by fans who loved it, sometimes by critics who lamented how it handled its tough issues like suicide and rape.”
“But season 2 has come and gone with…almost no buzz at all.”
“It was a very, very strange phenomenon.”
“I don’t think I’d ever seen a show go from all anyone could talk about to a complete void of coverage for its sophomore season, yet that’s exactly what happened with 13 Reasons Why.”
“The theory was that, perhaps, after a relatively conclusive ending to season 1 (13 episodes, 13 tapes, the end), that simply no one was watching the second season.”
“But that appears not to be the case as Netflix has announced today that yes, 13 Reasons Why is returning for season 3.”
“They also gave these details alongside the announcement:Production on the new season will resume later this year.”
“The new season will premiere in 2019.”


Pre order my new science fiction "hero killer", read my first series, also in the audio book "the birth of the Earth Trilogy"
"Bryan joki, Joey Gorman, Mandy Tiffany, crystal leiblin, Tom McCarthy, Steve Goering and Serena Gomez will return as earnings per share."
"The original version of Netflix is one of the most watched series this year. It's often sought after by fans who love it, and sometimes by critics who lament how it deals with thorny issues such as suicide and rape."
"But the second season has come and gone There is hardly any excitement. "
"It's a very, very strange phenomenon."
"I don't think I've ever seen a show change from a topic that anyone can talk about to a completely unreported sophomore, but that's the truth. There are 13 reasons."
"The theory is that maybe after the end of the first season (13 episodes, 13 tapes, the end), no one will watch the second season."
"But that doesn't seem to be the case, because Netflix announced today that, yes, there are 13 reasons for the third quarter return."
"They also provided these details with Ann cement: production of the new season will resume later this year."
"The new season will premiere in 2019."



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It just takes the masculinity out of you.””
““But have cooled things off a little because of busy schedules.”Dobrev, 28, and Powell, 29, had been rumored to be dating since January after ringing in the New Year with friends in Texas.”
“A source tells PEOPLE the two are taking some time apart.”
“According to the insider, the Vampire Diaries alum’s busy schedule played a part in the decision.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““She’s filming a lot,” the source says.”
“A rep for Dobrev couldn’t be reached for comment.”
“E!”
“News, who first reported the news, reports that there “hasn’t been an official ‘split’ ” or any major fights between the two.”
“According to the outlet, Powell — whose acting credits include Hidden Figures, Ride Along 2, and The Expendables 3 — is a “very easy-going dude” who avoids drama if he can.”


"It will only make you lose your masculinity."
Dobrev, 28, and Powell, 29, are reported to have been dating since January after calling friends in Texas to celebrate the new year
"A source told people that the two were separated for a while."
"The busy schedule of Vampire Diaries alumni is part of the decision, according to people familiar with the matter."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She made a lot of films," the source said
"A representative of Dobrev could not be reached for comment."
“E！”
"The news agency that first reported the news said that there was" no official "split" between the two sides, and there was no major dispute. "
According to media reports, Powell's performance credits include "hidden people", "cycling 2" and "expendables 3". He is a "very easygoing guy" and will avoid dramatization if he can



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(SVU: "Undercover Mother")Noah was again seen in Benson's arms as she let Barba in so Benson could discuss Noah's situation.”
“Soon after, Benson received a visit from Melinda Warner, who informed her that the sex trafficker they arrested that day was Noah's biological father, Johnny Drake.”
“Noah became a Ward of the State again, but Ellie's attorney Trevor Langan appeared to represent Noah's interests in Ellie's memory.”
“As she was scoring, she was gang-raped and burned to death.”
“Unfortunately, Ellie snuck out of the group home she was staying at to get high.”
“After the truth was revealed to Ellie, she prepared to testify against her pimp and get herself clean so she could regain custody of Noah.”
“After it was discovered that Baby Boy Doe's mother was named Ellie Porter, they finally learned that his name is Noah.”
“He was removed from their custody and put back into the system.”
“(SVU: "Downloaded Child")He later went through three different foster homes, and at his fourth, the mother filed for a separation and the father had suffered from some sort of relapse.”
“That, coupled with the fact that the foster parents already had two other babies in their care, resulted in him being removed from their custody immediately.”


(SVU: "undercover mother") Noah appears in Benson's arms again because she lets balba in so that Benson can discuss Noah's situation
Soon after, Benson received a visit from Melinda Warner, who told her that the trafficker they arrested that day was Noah's biological father, Johnny Drake
"Noah became the guardian of the country again, but Elle's lawyer Trevor Langan seemed to represent Noah's interests in Elle's memory."
"When she scored, she was gang raped and burned to death."
"Unfortunately, Ellie snuck out of her collective home to take a sip."
"After the truth is revealed to Ellie, she is ready to testify against her pimp and clear herself so as to regain the custody of Noah."
When people found out that duy's mother's name was Ellie Potter, they finally knew that his name was Noah
"He was taken from their custody and put back into the system."
(SVU: "downloaded child") he later went through three different foster families. In his fourth foster family, his mother applied for separation and his father suffered from some kind of relapse
"In addition, the adoptive parents already have two other children under their care, resulting in him being taken away from their custody immediately."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What is clear is that its brand will continue to suffer if it does not start treating its animal passengers, as well as it human ones, better.”
“Yet some aviation analysts reckon that the death of Simon the bunny did much more damage to United’s reputation in Britain than the manhandling of Dr Dao did in America.”
“Spirit Airlines refused to allow a hamster on board as an emotional-support animal and it ended up being flushed down an airport toilet.”
“But sometimes it is more dangerous for an animal to be permitted to ascend to 35,000 feet.”
“Particularly, it seems, if it is flying on United Airlines.”
“On March 12th, on a flight from Houston to New York, a United Airlines flight attendant knowingly stowed a French bulldog in the overhead compartment, where it died, the family that owned the dog alleges.”
“United quickly apologised to the family for what it called a tragic accident that should never have occurred as pets should never be placed in the overhead bin The airline promised an investigation to prevent this from ever happening again...”
“But on United things like this seem to happen again and again...”
“Last year, a Cavalier King Charles Spaniel died in a United plane’s cargo hold when the flight was delayed on the tarmac—also in Houston—for two hours.”
“Most infamously, a giant rabbit called Simon travelling from London to the Iowa State Fair died on a United flight, possibly freezing to death because it was subjected to cold temperatures or placed next to dry ice.”


"It's clear that its brand will continue to be affected if it doesn't start to treat animal passengers and human passengers better."
"However, some aviation analysts believe that Simon rabbit's death will do more damage to Manchester United's reputation in the UK than Dr. Dow's rough treatment in the US."
"Courage Airlines refused to let a hamster board as an emotional support animal. As a result, the hamster was washed into the toilet at the airport."
"But sometimes it's more dangerous to allow animals to rise to 35000 feet."
"Especially if it's United Airlines."
"On March 12, on a flight from Houston to New York, a United Airlines stewardess deliberately put a French Bulldog in the overhead box. It died, the owner's family claimed."
"United Airlines quickly apologized to its family, saying that this was a tragic accident and should not happen because pets should never be put in the garbage can overhead. The airline promised to investigate to prevent this from happening again..."
"But in the United States, such things seem to happen again and again..."
"Last year, a knight King Charles hound died in the cargo hold of a united plane, which was delayed for two hours on the tarmac in Houston."
Most infamously, a big rabbit named Simon died on a United Airlines flight on the way from London to the Iowa exposition, possibly due to low temperature or exposure to dry ice



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“After filing for divorce from Charvet after six years of marriage last Friday, the TV host and Dancing With the Stars season seven champion shared a lengthy post about divorce on the Modern Mom blog.”
“"I have struggled with trying to find worthy words to speak to this life change my family is going through but I do want to share my personal thoughts," the 46-year-old actress wrote.”
“"You may have heard that David and I are divorcing.”
“We have tried to keep our separation private for some time out of respect for our children and family.”
“Although I believe this is a positive change, I am deeply saddened because I loved being married."”
“"It took me a long time to differentiate between giving up and letting go, and even longer to recognize when it was time to do so," she added.”
“"We are still a family full of love, simply redefining our dynamics.”
“I believe this is a necessary decision for my entire family unit."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Last Friday, the TV host and the seventh season champion of dance with the stars filed for divorce from chavett, who has been married for six years, and then published a long blog post on divorce on the modern mom blog."
"I've been trying to find valuable words to express the life changes my family is experiencing, but I do want to share my personal thoughts," the 46 year old actress wrote
"You may have heard that David and I are going to divorce."
"Out of respect for our children and family, we tried to keep the separation secret for a while."
"Although I believe it's a positive change, I'm very sad because I like to get married."
"It took me a long time to distinguish between giving up and letting go, and even longer to realize when to give up," she added
"We are still a loving family, just redefining our motivation."
"I believe it's a necessary decision for my whole family."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“—Photo: WENN.com...”
“You can give Falling a listen below.”
“Tom has yet to comment on the lost tape.”
“The effort was quietly uploaded to Bandcamp earlier this month but Pitchfork was savvy enough to spot it.”
“I’ve recorded loads of stuff but it’s never been released” he explained.”
“I worked out with (Grammy-winning producers) Warren Riker and Gordon Williams.”
““I used to be with the guy who managed Leela James and Lauren Hill, Pras, the Fugees and all that.”
“According to an interview BBC conducted with Hardy in 2011, The Revenant actor picked up the microphone around 14 or 15 and has influential music executives backing him.”
“Crafted with DJ / producer Eddie Too Tall AKA Ed Tracy (award winning television writer), Falling On Your Arse In 1999 was 18 tracks deep and featured a wide range of topics from the mind of Hardy.”
“1 and actually had a record deal in place.”


"- photo: Wenwang..."
"You can listen down there."
"Tom hasn't commented on the missing tape yet."
"It was quietly uploaded to bandcamp earlier this month, but pitchfork was smart enough to find it."
"I recorded a lot of things, but never released them," he explained
"I work with [Grammy winning producers] Warren Rick and Gordon Williams."
"I used to be with someone who was in charge of Lyra James and Lauren hill, Plath, the fudges and the like."
"According to a BBC interview with Hardy in 2011, the vengeful actor picked up the phone around the age of 14 or 15 and was supported by influential music executives."
"Produced by DJ / producer Eddie Taigao, also known as ed Tracy (award-winning TV dramatist), fall on your ass in 1999 has 18 tracks, which are extensive and written by Hardy."
"1 and there's actually a record deal."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“So fierce!”
“Meanwhile, Bella, 21, took an edgier route, donning a $13,600 black double face embroidered lambskin coat from the same collection, a $1,475 belt and Chanel black fingerless gloves, purse and pointed toe heels.”
“On Oct. 25, Styles was spotted looking casually cool in a Solar System-Intarsia cashmere sweater by The Elder Statesmen, knitted with a colorful solar system and retailing for $2,348.55.”
“Harry StylesBackgridThe "Sign of the Times" singer is a natural when it comes to fashion.”
“Getty ImagesRELATED: Cate Blanchett Goes Bold, Cindy Crawford Sparkles And More Looks From InStyle Awards: Pics!”
“Gomez showed off her unique pair of sandals with a $465 sexy spaghetti strap LBD from the same designer's Spring 2006 runway collection.”
“Retailing for $655, one shoe featured a yellow circle as a heel, while the other had two wooden blocks and a ball in a darker shade.”
“Selena GomezGetty ImagesA special shout-out also goes to the "Fetish" singer, who jumped on the mismatched shoe trend with her Jacquemus heels at the InStyle Awards.”
“RELATED: Selena Gomez and Demi Lovato Reunite at the ‘InStyle’ Awards: See the Sweet Moment!”
“The 34-year-old actress had her hair slicked back and wore a bold red lip, accessorizing her stunning look with Louboutin black strappy heels, a $315,000 13.28 carat Norman Silverman diamond ring set and 8.86 carat diamond Norman Silverman earrings, which cost $36,000.”


"That's great!"
"Meanwhile, 21-year-old Bella took a more avant-garde route, wearing a $13600 black double-sided embroidered sheepskin coat of the same series, a $1475 belt and Chanel Black Mittens, wallet and pointed heels."
"On October 25, it was found that the old politicians looked cool in a solar system damask cashmere sweater, which was woven from the colorful solar system and retailed for $2348.55."
"Harry stiles buckgled," the "icon of the times" singer, was born in fashion
Getty Imag esRELATED:Cate Blanchett Be bold, Cindy Crawford glitters, more of InStyle Awards: pictures
"Gomez shows off her unique pair of sandals with the same designer's spring 2006 runway Series $465 sexy spaghetti strap LBD."
One shoe with a yellow circle on the heel and the other with two blocks and a dark ball retails for $655
"Serena gomergetti's special clamour also belongs to the" fetishist "singer, who jumped into the wrong shoe trend in jacquemus high heels at the InStyle awards ceremony."
"Related: Serena Gomez and Demi Lovato reunite at the InStyle Awards: watch the sweet moment!"
"The 34 year old actress's hair is well combed back, her lips are ruddy and bold, and her stunning look is complemented by Louboutin black lace up heels, a $315000 13.28-carat Norman Silverman diamond ring set and $36000 8.86-carat Norman Silverman diamond earrings."



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Photo Credit: Instagram]”
“Yes, apparently Tom was soooooooo in love he cheated, right?!”
“Too bad the Real Housewives Of New York reunion filmed before Lu confirmed the split.”
“Oh, the drama we could’ve had.”
“Andy Cohen should request a do-over.”
“So many rumors, so few days of marriage!”
“Although Luann only announced last week that her marriage was officially over, Luann and Tom seemed to be over since they began.”
“Following news of their divorce, rumors swirled that Luann caught Tom being unfaithful, and that she was even rekindling things with ex-boyfriend Jacques.”
“Reportedly, Luann and Tom even had a very public fight where she slapped him.”
“Luann has already denied that infidelity played a role in their split and explained that they simply grew apart.”


"[image source: instagram]"
"Yes, it's obvious that Tom is in love with the man he cheated, isn't he?"
"It's a pity that Annette Lu confirmed that she shot" the real housewife of New York reunion "before the breakup."
"Oh, a play we could have played."
"Andy Cohen should have asked to do it again."
"So many rumors, so many days of marriage!"
Although Luan announced the formal end of her marriage only last week, Luan and Tom seem to have ended from the beginning
"After the news of their divorce came out, there were rumors that Luan found Tom unfaithful, and that she even had a relapse with her ex boyfriend Jacques."
According to reports, Luan and Tom even fought in public and were slapped by her
"Luan has denied that infidelity was the cause of their breakup and explained that they were just separated."



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The reality star took to Instagram on Christmas Day to unveil her red hot shoot for Love magazine and the images were taken by none other than her sister, Kendall Jenner.”
“Looking festive in a snuggly red sweater and bright red matte lips, the 20-year-old cosmetics queen was also interviewed by her mom, Kris Jenner, for the magazine’s latest issue.”
““Merry Christmas!”
“Thank you @thelovemagazine @kegrand for this special cover shot by @kendalljenner & interview by @krisjenner #love19 ?,” wrote Kylie, who is expecting her first child with boyfriend Travis Scott.”
“The magazine also shared a snippet from the interview, in which Kylie gets candid about the challenges of running her own business.”
““I was just trying to keep up with myself,” she tells the outlet.”
““All businesses, every company, makes little mistakes here and there.”
“Growing it in front of so many people all of a sudden was kind of hard.”Kris couldn’t be prouder of her daughters’ collaboration, taking a break from Christmas festivities to share the cover in a gushing post on her Instagram account.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The reality star appeared on instagram on Christmas day to unveil a hot picture of her sister Kendall Jenner for love magazine."
"The 20-year-old cosmetics Queen looks festive in a red sweater and bright red matte lips, and has been interviewed by her mother, Kris Jenner, in the latest issue of the magazine."
"Merry Christmas!"
"Thank you@ thelovemagazine@kegrand Special cover for @ kendalljenner and interview with @ krisjenner#love19? "Kelly wrote that she was looking forward to her first child with her boyfriend Travis Scott."
The magazine also shared a segment of the interview in which Kelly spoke frankly about the challenges of running her own business
"I just want to keep up with myself," she told the media
"All businesses, every company, make small mistakes everywhere."
"All of a sudden, it's difficult to grow up in front of so many people." Chris is so proud of her daughters' cooperation that she took time out of the Christmas celebrations to share the cover in a gushing post on her instagram account



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In an appearance on the Howard Stern talkshow, a 24-year-old Ivanka sat laughing between her father and her brother Don as the elder Trump sheepishly nodded agreement to a suggestion by a co-host that he was a sexual predator.”
“In 2006, when the family sales pitch was centered on the reality show The Apprentice, she gamely entertained much pricklier questions about her father.”
“Ivanka Trump s boundaries of what is appropriate have shifted over time...”
“Show Jessica Leeds Ivana Trump Jill Harth Kristen Anderson Lisa Boyne Cathy Heller Temple Taggart Mariah Billado Karena Virginia Bridget Sullivan Tasha Dixon Melinda McGillivray Jennifer Murphy Rachel Crooks Natasha Stoynoff Ninni Laaksonen Jessica Drake Samantha Holvey Summer Zervos Cassandra Searles Read the full details of the 20 accusations here...”
“Q&A Who are the 20 women accusing Donald Trump of assault and harassment?”
“The president and his official spokespeople have challenged the veracity of the women’s claims.”
“So I think I have that right as a daughter to believe my father.”At least 20 women have come forward to accuse Trump of sexual misconduct.”
““I know my father.”
““I believe my father,” she said.”
“...as she concluded her envoy duties at the 2018 Winter Olympics in South Korea...”


"On the Howard Stern talk show, a 24-year-old Ivanka sits between his father and brother Don and smiles. Old trump nods sheepishly to agree with a co host's suggestion that he is a sex offender."
"In 2006, when family marketing focused on the reality show apprentice, she skillfully answered many sharp questions about her father."
"Ivanka Trump's line on what is appropriate changes over time..."
Show Jessica Liz Ivana trump gill Haas Kristen Anderson Lisa Boyne Kathy Heller monastery Taggart Maria bilado Carlina Virginia Bridget Sullivan Tasha Dixon Melinda McGill Livre Jennifer Murphy Rijk crux natashas toynov Nini lakzon Jessica Drake Samantha horvi shajizevos Cassandra Searle read the full details of the 20 charges, and here it is... "
"Who are the 20 women who accused Donald Trump of assaulting and harassing?"
"The president and his official spokesman questioned the authenticity of these women's statements."
"So I think as a daughter I have the right to believe in my father." At least 20 women have come forward to accuse trump of sexual misconduct. "
"I know my father."
"I believe in my father," she said
“…… When she ended her duties as a special envoy at the 2018 Winter Olympics in South Korea.... "



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kylie’s BFF Jordyn Woods filmed the reality star walking to the newsstand while carrying her daughter.”
“27 on the list, with an estimated $900 million fortune.”
“She ranks No.”
“...which features her on the cover of its Richest Self Made Women issue...”
“The 20 year old Keeping Up With the Kardashians star and Kylie Cosmetics founder stopped at a newsstand in Los Angele to get multiple copies of the latest GQ which features her and her beau and Stormi s dad Travis Scott on its cover as well as the latest Forbes...”
“But not just any magazines.”
“On Friday, Kylie Jenner brought her baby girl Stormi Webster with her to pick up a few magazines.”


"Kelly's boyfriend, Jordan woods, filmed the reality TV star carrying her daughter to the newsstand."
"27 people are on the list, with an estimated $900 million in wealth."
"She's number one."
“… She's on the cover of the richest self-made women's magazine
"The 20-year-old, who keeps in touch with Kardashian and the founder of Kelly cosmetics, stopped in front of a Los Angeles newsstand and bought several copies of the latest GQ, with her and her boyfriend and Tommy's father Travis Scott on the cover, as well as the latest Forbes..."
"But not just any magazine."
On Friday, Kelly Jenner took her baby girl, Tommy Webster, to buy some magazines



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Choice Music Album Won NSYNC Choice Music Pop Group Nominated This I Promise You Choice Music Love Song Nominated 2002 Girlfriend Choice Music Single Won Choice Music Hook Up Won Girlfriend Choice Music R B Hip Hop Track Nominated Gone Choice Music Love Song Nominated...”
“NSYNC has received 8 nominations, including Record of the Year.”
“The group has won three American Music Awards, five Billboard Music Awards, seven MTV Video Music Awards and has received eight Grammy Award nominations.”
“Additionally, they have received two RIAA Diamond certifications.”
“NSYNC received a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame in April 2018.”
“[1]American Music Awards [ edit ]The American Music Awards is an annual American music awards show, created by Dick Clark in 1973.”
“2 3 4 5 Year Nominee work Award Result 1999 NSYNC Favorite Pop Rock New Artist Won 2000 Favorite Pop Rock Band Duo or Group Nominated 2001 Internet Fans Artist of the Year Won No Strings Attached Favorite Pop Rock Album Nominated NSYNC Favorite Pop Rock Band Duo or Group...”
“Nominated 2002 Favorite Pop Rock Band Duo or Group Won Celebrity Favorite Pop Rock Album Nominated Billboard Music Awards edit The Billboard Music Awards is an honor given by Billboard a publication and music popularity chart covering the music business...”
“6 7 Year Nominee work Award Result 2000 No Strings Attached Album of the Year Won Special Award for biggest one week sales ever of an album Won NSYNC Top 40 Artist of the Year Won Albums Artist Duo Group of the Year Won 2001 NSYNC Albums Artist of the...”
“Year Nominated Albums Artist Duo Group of the Year Nominated Celebrity Special Award for biggest one week sales for an album in 2001 Won Blockbuster Entertainment Awards edit The Blockbuster Entertainment Awards was a film awards ceremony founded by Blockbuster Inc that ran from 1995 until 2001”


"Choice music album was nominated by nsync choice music pop group. I promise you that choice music love song was nominated 2002 girlfriend Choice Music single was nominated by choice music group was nominated by girlfriend Choice Music R B hip hop track was nominated by gone choice music love song..."
"Nsync has received eight nominations, including the best record of the year."
"The band won three American Music Awards, five Billboard Music Awards, seven MTV Video Music Awards, and eight Grammy nominations."
In addition, they have obtained two RIAA diamond certifications
"Nsync won a star on the Hollywood Walk of fame in April 2018."
"[1] American Music Awards [editor] the American Music Awards is the annual presentation ceremony of the American Music Awards, founded by Dick Clark in 1973."
"2345 nominated works award results: in 1999, nsync's most popular new pop rock artist was nominated by the most popular pop rock band duet or group in 2000, and Internet fan's best artist of the year in 2001 was nominated by the most popular pop rock album without additional conditions and named nsync's most popular pop rock band duet or group..."
"Nominating 2002's most popular pop rock band or group to win celebrity's most popular pop rock album nomination Billboard Music Award editor's Billboard Music Award is an honor presented by billboard, a publication and music popularity chart covering the music industry..."
"67 year nominated works award results: 2000 album of the year without additional conditions won the biggest weekly sales volume ever, special award won nsync top 40 artists of the year won nsync album of the year, artist group of the year won nsync album of the year 2001"
"Album of the year artist group of the year nominating celebrity special award" the best-selling album of the week in 2001 won the Blockbuster Entertainment Award editor Blockbuster Entertainment Award is a film award ceremony founded by blockbuster, which lasted from 1995 to 2001. "



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kloss and Kushner have yet to reveal a wedding date, but recently got back from a romantic vacation to Italy where they celebrated their future nuptials.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Karlie Kloss showed off her massive engagement ring from her venture capitalist fiancé Josh Kushner hours after the news broke that he “proposed a few weeks ago during a romantic weekend together in upstate New York.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In a video posted to her Instagram Story Tuesday, the 25-year-old model flashed the gorgeous ring while getting her hair and makeup done for a photo shoot in Beijing.”
““My phone is blowing up with the sweetest messages from loved ones.”
“This poor make up artist is gonna kill me,” Kloss wrote over the clip.”
“The model’s ring appeared to be a high-carat cushion cut diamond in a platinum solitaire setting with a diamond pavé band.”
“Image zoom Karlie Kloss | Credit: Karlie Kloss/InstagramLooking for more style content?”
“Kloss confirmed the news on Instagram by sharing a selfie of her and Josh captioned, “I love you more than I have words to express.”
“I’m not trying to hide that from the world; I just really like having a more private private life… I’ve got nothing to hide, though!” Kloss previously explained during an interview with Porter.”


Klose and Kushner have yet to disclose the date of their wedding, but they recently returned from a romantic holiday in Italy, where they celebrate their future wedding
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
Carly Krauss showed off the engagement ring of her venture capitalist fiance, Josh Kushner, hours after news that he "proposed a few weeks ago on a romantic weekend in upstate New York." Get news, feature, etc
"In a video released on instagram on Tuesday, the 25-year-old model showed off the gorgeous ring while doing her hair and make-up for a photo in Beijing."
"My mobile phone is full of the sweetest information of my family."
"The poor makeup artist will kill me," Klaus wrote in the clip
"The model's ring seems to be a high carat cushion cut diamond set on a platinum card with a diamond edge."
"Image zooming Karlie kloss | source: Karlie kloss / instagram looking, learn more about fashion?"
Cross confirmed the news by sharing her selfie on instagram, with Josh's Title: "I love you more than I can say."
"I don't mean to keep it from the world, I just really like my private life But I have nothing to hide! "Klaus previously explained in an interview with Porter," he said



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“THR will be live-blogging the event, so share your thoughts below and on Twitter with the #THRose hastag.”
“Stay tuned for the big moment to see who JoJo picks when The Bachelorette and After the Final Rose kickoff at 8 p.m. ET/PT on ABC.”
“In a matter of hours, Bachelor nation will watch Joelle "JoJo" Fletcher pick between her final two contestants, Jordan Rodgers and Robby Hayes.”
“Each gentleman comes with his own set of controversy; Jordan, the younger brother of Green Bay Packers quarterback Aaron Rodgers, has been accused of cheating on his former girlfriend and of going on The Bachelorette for the fame he never found through pro football.”
“Meanwhile, JoJo and Robby have fought over whether the former Olympic swimmer broke up with his long-term girlfriend just to sign up for the dating series.”
“That’s quite a lot of baggage, but nothing the Texan can’t handle.”
“Ahead of the season 12 finale, The Hollywood Reporter spoke with JoJo about why she feels so strongly about her two athletes.”
““My favorite quality about Robby is how open he is with his emotions," JoJo tells THR.”
“"How he’s able to really put himself out there and be completely vulnerable."”
“She continues, “He was the first guy to tell me that he loved me and he stayed that way consistently.”Robby told the bachelorette he loved her during their first one-on-one date in Uruguay.”


"Thr will broadcast the event live on its blog, so please share your thoughts with" throse hastag "below and on twitter."
"Please pay attention to this important moment and see who JOJO chooses on singles day and after the last rose kicks off at 8 p.m. EDT on ABC TV."
In a few hours, bachelor's country will watch Joel Fletcher's draft between the last two contestants, Jordan Rogers and Robbie Hayes
"Every gentleman has his own set of controversies; Jordan, the brother of Green Bay Packers quarterback Aaron Rodgers, is accused of cheating on his ex girlfriend and has become a bachelor because of his reputation never gained in professional football."
"At the same time, Joe and Robbie have been debating whether the former Olympic swimmer broke up with his longtime girlfriend just for this series of dates."
"That's quite a lot of luggage, but there's nothing Texans can't handle."
"Before the season 12 finale, the Hollywood reporter interviewed JOJO and asked why she had such strong feelings for her two athletes."
"My favorite quality about Robbie is how open he is to his emotions," JOJO told the times
"How can he really put himself out there, completely vulnerable."
"She went on," he was the first to tell me that he loved me, and he always was. " Robbie told the bachelor he loved her on his first one-on-one date in Uruguay



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s a really sad situation, all over.”After that interview, Thompson blocked Kim on social media, she revealed last week on Live with Kelly and Ryan.”
““She has help so she can leave for shorter workouts, but otherwise she spends most of her time with the baby,” the source says.”
“...to a source the new mom has made up her mind...”
“While her mother, grandmother and sisters celebrated Mother’s Day in their hometown of Calabasas this weekend, Khloé, 33, remained in Cleveland with her 1-month-old daughter True.”
“Thompson, 27, is in Boston with the Cavaliers for the NBA playoffs but seemingly arranged for some extravagant flower arrangements, which Khloé showed off on social media.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Khloé is determined to show that she is happy in Cleveland,” a source tells PEOPLE.”
““She’s very stubborn when it comes to her life.”
“Her family still disagrees with her decision to stay with Tristan, but they are trying to be supportive.”
“They wanted Khloé back in L.A. for Mother’s Day, but she’s doing her own thing.”According to the source, Khloé “wants to show everyone that she is making the right decision.”“She doesn’t care what anyone thinks,” says the insider.”


Last week, Thompson revealed on live with Kelly and Ryan that after that interview, she blocked Kim on social media
"She got help, so she could leave for a shorter exercise, but apart from that, she spent most of her time with her children," the source said
“… According to the source, the new mother has made up her mind... "
"While her mother, grandmother and sisters celebrate Mother's day in her hometown of Calabasas this weekend, heloe, 33, and her one month old daughter, truel, stay in Cleveland."
"Thompson, 27, is playing in the NBA playoffs with the Cavaliers in Boston, but seems to have arranged some extravagant flower arrangements, which heloe showed on social media."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Heloe is determined to show that she is happy in Cleveland," a source told people
"When it comes to life, she's stubborn."
"Her family still disagree with her decision to stay in Tristan, but they are trying to support her."
"They want khlo é to go back to Los Angeles for mother's day, but she's doing her own thing." According to the source, khlo é "wanted to show everyone that she made the right decision." "She doesn't care what anyone thinks," the person familiar with the matter said



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jessica Alba was signed for a movie named An Invisible Sign of My Own in 2008 and that movie finished filming in November 2008 and premiered at Hamptons International Film Festival but released in 2011.”
“Later that year Jessica Alba got featured in The Love Guru along with Justin Timberlake and Mike Meyers and that movie was a total flop.”
“When Jessica Alba was 11 years old she made her mother agree to take her to an acting competition in Beverly Hills in which the grand prize was the free acting classes.”
“Jessica Alba Career Specific | Acting Carrer | First Appearance | Golden Globe NominationJessica Alba once said that she had an interest in acting since she was just 5 years old.”
“Jessica Alba graduated from Claremont High School when Jessica Alba was 16 years old and after that, she joined a theater group.”
“Jessica Alba also had asthma in her childhood and suffered from the obsessive compulsive disorder.”
“When Jessica Alba a little girl she suffered from partially collapsed lungs twice and from pneumonia four to five times a year, a ruptured appendix and a tonsillar cyst as well.”
“As a child, she faced too many medical disorders.”
“Jessica Alba was a feminist.”
“Once Jessica Alba stated that "her family is very conservative family – a traditional, Catholic, Latin American family" and Jessica Alba was just opposite and liberal.”


"Jessica Alba signed up for a film called" my own invisible sign "in 2008, which was completed in November 2008 and premiered at the Hampton International Film Festival, but released in 2011."
"Later that year, Jessica Alba joined Justin Timberlake and Mike Meyers in the lead role of master of love, which was a complete failure."
"When Jessica Alba was 11 years old, she asked her mother to agree to take her to Beverly Hills for a performance competition, and the prize was a free performance class."
"Jessica Alba's career show, Kale's debut, Golden Globe nomination, Jessica Alba once said that she was interested in acting because she was only five years old."
Jessica Alba graduated from Claremont high school at the age of 16 and joined a theater company
"Jessica Alba also had asthma and obsessive-compulsive disorder as a child."
When Jessica Alba was a little girl, she had two partial lung failures a year, four to five pneumonia, ruptured appendix, and tonsillar cysts
"As a child, she faced too many diseases."
"Jessica Alba is a feminist."
Once, Jessica Alba said, "her family is a very conservative family - a traditional, Catholic, Latin American family." Jessica Alba, on the contrary, is a free family. "



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contributing: The Associated Press...”
“Anderson previously faced assault allegations in 2004, when a woman claimed Anderson and assistant director Wayne Witherspoon raped her in a trailer on set of “Hustle & Flow.”The charges against both men were dismissed after a judge ruled there was no probable cause.”
“The accusations come less than two weeks after Anderson received his fourth Emmy nomination for outstanding lead actor in a comedy series for "Black-ish."”
“The alleged victim filed a police report with LAPD's Hollywood Division earlier this year after finding comfort with the #MeToo movement, The Blast reports.”
““At this point, all we can confirm is that there is an active investigation,” public information director Josh Rubenstein told USA TODAY.”
“The LAPD confirms that Anderson is under investigation.”
“The incident, she says, happened the second time they met to discuss future business opportunities.”
“An unidentified woman claimed he assaulted her more than a year ago after meeting Anderson at an event he hosted, according to the site.”
“The allegations against Anderson, 47, were first reported by The Blast.”
“Anthony unequivocally disputes the claim."”


"From the Associated Press..."
Anderson had previously faced assault charges in 2004, when a woman claimed that Anderson and assistant director Wayne Witherspoon raped her in a trailer on the set of "the sound and the flow.". The charges against the two were dismissed after the judge ruled that there was no possible reason
The charge came two weeks after Anderson was nominated for his fourth Emmy for "black."
According to the explosion report, the victim submitted a police report to the Hollywood division of the Los Angeles Police Department earlier this year, after he was satisfied with the "meto movement"
"What we can confirm at this point is that there is a positive investigation," public information director Josh Rubinstein told USA today
"LAPD confirmed Anderson was under investigation."
"It happened, she said, when they met for the second time to discuss future business opportunities."
According to the website, an unidentified woman said that more than a year ago, he met Anderson at an event hosted by Anderson and attacked her
"The charges against Anderson, 47, were first reported in the bombing."
"Anthony refuted this statement unequivocally."



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““You look amazing and you are a true role model,” enthused one fan on Instagram.”
“...the INDY LIFE newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with...”
“Fronting the title’s June issue, the Pitch Perfect star insisted that the images hadn’t been “slimmed down” via photoshop, crediting her figure to a healthy diet and exercise regime.”
“However, criticisms were also made with regards to the magazine’s styling choices, with some people arguing that Wilson’s plus-size figure had been intentionally covered-up in baggy clothing for the cover.”
“Clad in a full-length brown overcoat and a black gown, fans expressed disappointment at the magazine’s sartorial decisions, with some suggesting that the loose-fitting aesthetic was not at all flattering.”
““Shame about that massive jacket,” wrote one person, “I bet that stunning dress would of shown off your gorgeousness without the need for cover-up.”“Rebel, is that you?”
“I can’t see you under all those layers!” added another.”
“Couture or not it looks like a tent and doesn t do you justice INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to...”
“...the latest lifestyle trends every week The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Further critics argued that the title s styling team had...”
“While criticisms were rife, the majority of comments regarding Wilson’s cover were hugely complimentary, with fans lauding the Australian actress for her beauty and talent.”


One instagram fan enthusiastically said, "you look great. You're a real role model."
“… Indy life press release verifyerrors information verifyerrors information verifyerrors information verifyerrors independent newspaper would like to inform you of the offer and update information by email. Please check the box if you want to contact us. Please read our complete mailing list agreement terms here. Inspiration for Indy life press release comes from... "
On the cover of the June issue, the perfect figure star insisted that the photo had not been "slimmed down" through Photoshop and attributed her figure to a healthy diet and exercise regime
"However, there are also criticisms of the magazine's styling choices. Some people think Wilson's plus figure is deliberately covered by loose clothes."
"Fans in brown coats and black gowns are disappointed with the magazine's decision to dress. Some people think the loose aesthetic is not at all likable."
"Shame on that thick jacket," one wrote. "I'll bet that beautiful dress will show you how gorgeous you are without covering it up." "Treason, is that you?"
"I can't see you under those layers! "One more."
"Whether it's fashion or not, it looks like a tent. You're not fair. Indy life newsletters are inspired by the latest lifestyle trends every week. Please enter your email address. Please enter a valid email address. Please enter a valid email address to register. Thank you for registering..."
“… Weekly latest lifestyle trends the independent would like to inform you of the offers and updates by email. Please check the box. If you want to contact us, please read our complete mailing list and agree to the terms. Here is a further criticism that the modeling team of the title has... "
"Despite the criticism, most of the comments on Wilson's cover were highly praised, and fans praised the Australian actress for her beauty and talent."



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Fair play, Chrissy.”
“She tweeted Chrissy to tell her she could have them if she wanted.”
“...chrissy teigen chrissyteigen September 21 2017 She was not playing...”
“...please send me a photo of u holding the bananas giving the peace sign chrissy teigen chrissyteigen September 21 2017 Advertisement if u have 6 BROWN bananas in the LA area I will send my assistant to your home with a signed cookbook John s underwear and a Becca palette...”
“SERIOUS INQUIRIES ONLY.”
“The model also said that, in return, she'd provide a signed cookbook, a pair of husband John Legend's underwear, and a BECCA makeup palette.”
“So she took it upon herself to weed out the liars and asked that anyone who had six browning bananas in LA should take a picture with the fruit while doing the peace sign.”
“...just...if u have 6 BROWN bananas in the LA area lmk — chrissy teigen (@chrissyteigen) September 21, 2017AdvertisementChrissy got a lot of replies for her request, but not all of them were serious.”
“...don't tell me your banana browning hacks.”
“...ok this banana thing is getting ridiculous.”


"Fair play, Chris."
"She tweeted to Chris that she could have them if she wanted to."
“… Christegan christegan September 21, 2017 she didn't play... "
“… If you have six Brown bananas in Los Angeles, I'll send my assistant to your home with a signed cookbook, John's underwear and Becca's palette... "
"It's just a serious inquiry."
In return, the model said, she would provide a signed cookbook, a pair of underwear from her husband, John Legan, and a Becca cosmetics palette
"So she decided to get rid of the liars and asked six banana browning people in Los Angeles to take pictures with the fruits while making peace gestures."
“…… It's just If you have six Brown bananas in the Los Angeles area, Chris tigen's advertisement on September 21, 2017 has received a lot of replies, but not all of them are serious. "
“… Don't tell me about your banana browning hacker. "
"Well, this banana thing is getting ridiculous."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See Malina’s picture of the “West Wing” reunion below.”
“He took my phone and tweeted that last tweet.”
“On Wednesday the NBC political drama s stars Bradley Whitford Josh Janel Moloney Donna and Joshua Malina Will had dinner with creator Aaron Sorkin and Malina now unemployed thanks to the recent end of ABC s Scandal stoked the flames of a reunion by tweeting a photo of the evening...”
“...with the caption Talking reboot Make of that what you will as Malina is known for being a jokester with Whitford tweeting this that same night after posting a since deleted tweet that said I m horny I m having dinner with JoshMalina...”
“It was not me.”
“I swear to God.”
“Forgive him.”
“@kumailn”I’m having dinner with @JoshMalina.”


"See marina's West Wing reunion photo below."
"He took my cell phone and sent the last tweet."
"On Wednesday, NBC's political drama stars Bradley Whitford, Josh Janel Moloney Donna and Joshua Malina will meet with creator Aaron After a recent scandal over ABC, Malina tweeted the night's news
“… The title says, "what would you do, because Marina is a well-known joke. After tweeting with Whitford on the same night, a deletion was posted, and twitter said," I'm sexual, I'm having dinner with Josh Marina... "
"Not me."
"I swear to God."
"Forgive him."
"@ kumailn" I'm going to have dinner with @ joshmalina



**Something goes wrong**
“So we said, ‘Oh, well, maybe we should have a family,’ ” said Stamos, who proposed to the model and actress on Oct. 22 at Disneyland (one of her favorite places) after two years of dating.”
““We have the same morals and the same values, that all clicked nicely.”
“On Saturday, John Stamos’ fiancée Caitlin McHugh showed off her baby bump on social media for the first time since the couple announced they are expecting their first child together.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Good morning baby of mine,” McHugh, 31, wrote alongside a picture of herself caressing her baby bump while wearing a sports bra.”
““Enjoying our #babymoon at @miraval_arizona #babybump debut,” she added, revealing that she and Stamos, 54, were taking a romantic vacation together at the Miraval Arizona resort and spa ahead of their baby’s arrival.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“RELATED VIDEO: John Stamos on Why He’s Finally Ready to Be a Dad at 54The reveal came just days after McHugh showed off her growing baby bump when the pair were spotted together at Los Angeles International Airport.”
“The happy couple walked arm-in-arm and grinned for photographers as McHugh’s growing baby bump peaked out in an oversized green turtleneck sweater.”


"So we said, 'Oh well, maybe we should have a family,'" said Stamos, who proposed to a model and actress on October 22 at Disneyland, one of her favorite places, two years after dating
"We have the same morality and values, and everything goes well."
"On Saturday, Caitlin McHugh, John Stamos' fiancee, showed off her lump on social media for the first time since the couple announced they would have their first child together."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Good morning, my baby," McHugh, 31, wrote next to a photo of her caressing her little lump in a sports bra
"Enjoy our babymon debut at @ miraval ψ u Arizona ψ babybump," she added, adding that she and 54 year old Stamos were spending a romantic holiday with spa at miraval resort in Arizona before their baby was born
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Related video: John Stamos talks about why he's finally ready to be a 54 year old father. Just a few days ago, McHugh showed her growing lump when she found them together at Los Angeles International Airport
"The happy couple walked hand in hand and grinned at the photographer as McHugh grew fatter and fatter in a big green turtleneck."



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Records show that Earhart’s Lockheed Electra measured 38.7 feet long.”
“Behind the ship on a barge is an object resembling an airplane that Gibson calculated to be 38 feet long.”
““It was misfiled,” he tells Henry in the documentary, referring to the photo which depicts two blurry images on a dock believed to be Noonan and Earhart – who stares out at a nearby ship with her back turned to the camera.”
“‘Top Secret’ FileA longtime Earhart buff who has spent thousands of hours combing through government records, Kinney discovered the photo in a “formerly top secret” file in the National Archives.”
“But it’s the discovery of a black-and-white photograph – unearthed by retired U.S. Treasury Agent Les Kinney in 2012 and revealed for the first time in the documentary – that suddenly makes the theory more plausible, adds the former FBI boss.”
“...the disappearance of the two aviators who they may have believed were American spies says Henry has been floating around for decades...”
“I think we proved beyond a reasonable doubt that she survived her flight and was held prisoner by the Japanese on the island of Saipan where she eventually died Image zoom Credit Les Kinney National Archives HISTORY Graphic Nok Acharee The theory that the Japanese military could be responsible for...”
““This absolutely changes history,” says Henry, who led a team of investigators examining a range of evidence, including plane parts found on a remote Pacific island consistent with the aircraft Earhart was flying.”
“...that she died after her plane ran out of fuel and crashed into the ocean...”
“Image zoom Credit Les Kinney National Archives HISTORY Image zoom Armed with a recently discovered photograph purportedly taken of Earhart days after she crash landed on a remote South Pacific atoll Henry offers up a startling theory of a government cover up that runs counter to the widely accepted idea...”


"The record shows that the Lockheed Electra of Earhart company is 38.7 feet long."
"There's an object behind the boat on the barge, similar to the 38 foot long plane that Gibson calculated."
"It's wrong," he told Henry in the documentary, referring to a photograph depicting two blurred images of a dock believed to be Noonan and Earhart - she was staring at a nearby ship with her back to the camera
"Top secret archives a longtime elhart enthusiast spent thousands of hours combing through government archives, and Ginny found this picture in a" former top secret "Archives in the national archives."
The former head of the FBI added: "but it was the discovery of a black-and-white photograph, which was discovered by retired Treasury agent Les Kinney in 2012 and first revealed in a documentary, that suddenly made this theory more credible."
“…… The news that the two pilots they might think were American spies disappeared said that Henry had been floating for decades... "
"I think we have no doubt proved that she survived the flight and was imprisoned by the Japanese on Saipan, where she eventually died. This photo is from the historical image of NOK acharee in Les Kinney national archives. The Japanese military may be against Responsible theory. "
"It absolutely changed history," said Henry, who led a team of investigators to examine a range of evidence, including parts of an aircraft found on a remote Pacific island that matched the plane that Earhart was flying
“… She died when the plane ran out of fuel and fell into the sea. "
"Photo zooming credit leskine National Archives historical photo zooming armed recently discovered photos purportedly a few days after Earhart crashed on a distant south Pacific atoll, Henry offered a startling theory that the government covered up, contrary to widely accepted ideas..."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...option.”
“(he received his Bachelors of Science in Civil Engineering) and you had to go Navy and then Marine Corps.”
“...place and ask for a job but I walked in asked for a job and they said we can t hire you because you ve never been to our establishment I sat down at the bar and all the regulars began talking to me asking my story where I was...”
“I ve always been told I should work at the Abbey so I drove down there and was really nervous because I had never been inside it s like the number one gay bar in the world and I was like oh man I m about to walk ito this...”
“Where should I go?”
“I want to go more often, but I don’t want to drink, so I considered this bartending job, I am out and not drinking but I am making money and I am having fun.”
“When I was going on auditions I felt super awkward around people.”
“So I wasn’t really interacting with people too much, and I was kind of losing my people skills.”
“After a couple of years, I work for a supplement company and I’m with them on salary, but I am basically paid to develop products, do their marketing, and stay in shape to do all of the photo shoots.”
“Kyle Clarke: I moved to LA about 6 years ago, right when I got here and because I did so much work in the fitness industry, people were like, ‘Oh, you should work at the Abbey’ and I had never been there before.”


“… Options. "
"You have to go to the Navy first, and then to the Marine Corps."
“…… Looking for a job, but I came in looking for a job and they said we couldn't hire you because you've never been to our company. When I sat down in the bar, all the regular customers began to talk to me and ask my story where I am... "
"I've always been told I should work in a monastery, so I'm driving there, really nervous, because I've never been in it. It's like the first gay bar in the world, and I'm like, oh my God, I'm going to walk here..."
"Where should I go?"
"I want to go often, but I don't want to drink, so I thought about this bartender's job. I went out and didn't drink, but I made money. I had a good time."
"When I was auditioning, I felt very embarrassed in front of others."
"So I didn't communicate too much with people. I lost my communication skills a bit."
"A few years later, I worked in a supplement company and stayed with them on my salary, but I basically took all the photos by developing products, doing their marketing and keeping fit."
"Kyle Clark: I moved to Los Angeles about six years ago, and when I came here, because I did a lot of work in the fitness industry, people said, 'Oh, you should work in a monastery,' and I've never been there before."



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We just kept on changing her up.””
““We had to darken it so it was a deeper red.”
“Photo: Patrick Harbron/AMC/AMC Film Holdings LLC.”
“All Rights Reserved.”
“If you are a reasonable human person, your first reaction upon seeing Julianna Margulies in Dietland was to shout “wig!” and so, after doing just that, we decided to investigate just what was going on with her hair.”
“On the AMC series, based on Sarai Walker’s book, the naturally curly- and raven-haired Margulies plays Kitty Montgomery, a fearsome magazine editor with a distinctive flame-red do.”
“The hair makes Margulies even more intimidating than usual, especially when playing against Joy Nash’s Plum Kettle.”
“Ahead of the show’s Monday premiere, Vulture got on the phone with Dietland’s head of hair Sarah Hindsgaul to learn everything we could about Margulies’s new look.”
“It (almost) matches Kitty’s hair in the bookKitty was always going to be a redhead.”
“At a Vulture Festival panel, Margulies said that Walker chose the hair color because the character was based on a woman who did not have red hair and she wanted to hide her identity.”


"We've been changing her clothes."
"We had to darken it to make it a deeper red."
"Photo: Patrick harbron / AMC / AMC film holdings LLC."
"All rights reserved."
"If you are a reasonable person, your first reaction when you see Juliana Margulis in ditran is to shout" wig! "So, after that, we decided to investigate what happened to her hair."
In the AMC series, based on Sarai Walker's book, Margulies, with naturally curly crow hair, plays Kitty Montgomery, a terrifying magazine editor with unique flaming red hair
"Hair makes Margolis more frightening than usual, especially in the plum blossom pot game against Joey Nash."
"Before Monday's premiere, vulture and Dylan's head of hair, Sarah Hindes, called to learn as much as we can about Margulis's new look."
"It (almost) matches Kitty's hair in the book. Kitty always has red hair."
"On a display board at vulture day, Margulis said Walker chose this hair color because the archetype of the character is a woman without red hair who wants to hide her identity."



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““And some people will go, ‘Huh?’ — my mum, probably.”The final six Game of Thrones episodes premiere in 2019.”
““People will scream, and people will say, ‘That’s exactly what I wanted,'” Clarke said.”
“'”And in an interview with The Herald Sun via Digital Spy, Clarke said she said she expects the reaction to the final season to be mixed.”
“They’re like ‘Emilia…it’s okay,’ and I’m like, ‘But it’s the last time!”
““I’ve become an emotional wreck on set.”
“She told GMA: “It really is the most heartbreaking thing to be filming the last of anything,” she said.”
“The actress has been out promoting Solo: A Star Wars Story and saying other things about GoT season 8 as well.”
“The actress told Vanity Fair in a new cover story that Daenerys Targaryen’s last scene “f—ed me up … knowing that is going to be a lasting flavor in someone’s mouth of what Daenerys is…”And then she didn’t reveal anything else!”
“Emilia Clarke: My final Game of Thrones scene 'f—ed me up'Game of Thrones Close Streaming OptionsEmilia Clarke is teasing that her last minutes on screen in HBO’s Game of Thrones are pretty emotional.”


"Some people will go, eh? The last six episodes of power will premiere in 2019
"People will scream, people will say, 'this is exactly what I want,'" Clark said
In an interview with digital spies in the Herald Sun, Clark said she expected a mixed reaction in the final season
"They're like 'Emilia It doesn't matter, 'I'm like,' but this is the last time
"I became a victim of my feelings on the set."
"It's really the most heartbreaking thing to shoot the last one," she told GMA
"The actress has been promoting the story of" solo: Star Wars "and talking about the eighth season of got."
"The actress told Vanity Fair in a new cover story that the last act of Denise tangorian" drove me crazy Knowing that this will become a lasting taste of what Denise is in other people's mouths.... " And then she didn't reveal anything else! "
"Emilia Clarke: my last power game scene 'f-ed me up' turned off streaming options. Emilia Clarke joked that her last few minutes on HBO's power game screen were quite emotional."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“CNN has not gotten responses to its requests from comment from The Walt Disney Company, Miramax and The Weinstein Company.”
“The lawsuit accuses Weinstein of rape and alleges that his former employers are liable for his actions during his employment.”
“The Zurich Film Festival 2016 will take place from September 22 until October 2.”
“(Photo by Andreas Rentz/Getty Images)Film producer Harvey Weinstein and actress Gwyneth Paltrow arrive for the 50th anniversary gala of the NFT at the National Film Theatre on the South Bank in London.”
“(Photo by Yui Mok - PA Images/PA Images via Getty Images)Harvey Weinstein is escorted into court, Friday, May 25, 2018, in New York.”
“The movie mogul turned himself in at a police precinct earlier Friday.”
“AP Photo Mark Lennihan McGowan to Weinstein We got you LOS ANGELES CA JANUARY 14 L R Chris Backus Mira Sorvino and Harvey Weinstein attend HBO s Annual Pre Golden Globes Party hosted by Colin Callender Chris Albrecht and Carolyn Strauss at Chateau Marmont on January 14 2006 in Los...”
“Angeles CA”
“(Photo by Billy Farrell/Patrick McMullan via Getty Images)TOPSHOT - Harvey Weinstein (C) arrives at Manhattan Criminal Court for a hearing on October 11, 2018 in New York City.”
“(Photo by TIMOTHY A. CLARY / AFP) (Photo credit should read TIMOTHY A. CLARY/AFP/Getty Images)Harvey Weinstein arrives to court in New York, Tuesday, June 5, 2018.”


"CNN has not received a response from Disney, Miramax and Weinstein."
"The lawsuit charged Weinstein with rape and charged his former employer with responsibility for his actions during his employment."
"Zurich Film Festival 2016 will be held from September 22 to October 2."
(Andreas Lenz / Getty pictures) filmmaker Harvey Weinstein and actress Gwyneth Paltrow arrived at the south bank National Film Theatre in London for the 50th anniversary of NFT
"(YUI Mok PA images / PA images photographed by Getty pictures) Harvey Weinstein was escorted into the courtroom on Friday, May 25, 2018, New York."
"The film mogul turned himself in to the police earlier Friday."
"Associated Press Photo mark rennehan McGovern to Weinstein, we invite you to L.R. Chris Bacchus Mila sovino and Harvey Weinstein in Los Angeles on January 14 to attend HBO's annual Golden Globe pre award party, hosted by Colin Karen Chris Albrecht and Caroline Strauss in Marmont castle, Los Angeles on January 14, 2006..."
Los Angeles, California
(Billy Farrell / Patrick McMullen photographed by Getty pictures) topshort Harvey Weinstein (c) arrived at the Manhattan Criminal Court in New York on October 11, 2018 for a hearing
"(Photo by Timothy a.clay / AFP) (photo source should be Timothy a.clay / AFP / Getty Images) Harvey Weinstein arrived in New York Court on Tuesday, June 5, 2018."



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you know from the book... please no spoilers!”
“The murderer is on the train — who do you think it is?”
“Dench Princess Natalia Dragomiroff and Daisy Ridley Mary Debenham into one trailer...”
“And, we weren't wrong.”
“The first trailer, narrated by Poirot, introduces us to "a tangle of strangers, pressed together for days with nothing in common, but the need to go from one place to the other."”
“We get a fleeting glimpse of some of the key characters aboard the train.”
“When it comes to a screeching halt, we discover there's been a murder...We briefly saw Johnny Depp in that trailer, lollygagging in the train hallway, but we didn't learn his role, nor did we hear him speak.”
“But, that's all about to change with the new trailer.”
“Depp's character introduces himself to Poirot, saying, "You're the world-famous detective.”
“Avenger of the innocent, is that what they call you in the papers?"”


"If you know from the book... Please don't make trouble
"The killer is on the train - who do you think it is?"
"Put Princess Natalia dragomirov and Daisy Ridley Mary Debenham in a trailer..."
"And we're not wrong."
The first trailer, narrated by Poirot, introduces us to "a group of strangers, huddled together for several days, have nothing in common, but need to go from one place to another."
"We were fleeting about some of the key people on the train."
"When the train stopped suddenly, we found a murder We briefly saw Johnny Depp in the trailer, lazily in the train corridor, but we didn't understand his role, we didn't hear him
"But that's going to change with the new trailer."
Depp's character introduces himself to Poirot and says, "you're a world-famous detective."
"Avenger of the innocent, is that what the newspapers call you?"



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Former cast member Landon Clements, who announced in September would be leaving the show after three seasons.”
“Missing from the action?”
“Southern Charm star Thomas Ravenel has a new girlfriend and it doesn t look like she ll be BFFs with ex Kathryn Dennis the mother of his children anytime soon...”
“The two women go at it in the season 5 trailer for the hit reality show, which returns to Bravo in April.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I want you to know, you’ve crossed the line.”
“And as a mother, f— you,” Dennis tells Ravenel’s girlfriend Ashley, who met Ravenel — and their daughter Kensie, 4, and son Saint, 2½ — last May and relocated to Charleston a week later to be with him.”
“They won’t be the only two in heated battle.”
“Image zoom Kathryn Dennis | Credit: BravoCraig Conover and ex-girlfriend Naomie Olindo are trying to maintain a friendship after their breakup, which doesn’t always go as planned.”
““You will never, ever, ever, ever, ever be accountable for anything,” she tells him.”


"Former actor randen clemenz announced in September that he would leave the show at the end of three seasons."
"Missing in action?"
"Southern glamour movie star Thomas ravennell has a new girlfriend. It seems that she won't soon become good friends with former Catherine Dennis, who is his child's mother..."
"These two women have a big fight in the trailer for the fifth season of the hit reality show, which will return to Bravo in April."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I want you to know that you've crossed the line."
"As a mother, f-you," Dennis told ravennell's girlfriend Ashley. Ashley met ravennell last May, and their 4-year-old daughter, kency, and 2.5-year-old son, saint, moved to Charleston with him a week later
"They won't be the only two in the fight."
Image zooming Kathryn Dennis | credit: Bravo Craig Conover and his ex girlfriend Naomie olindo tried to maintain friendship after breaking up, but it didn't always go as planned
"You are always, always, always, always, always, always, always responsible for everything," she told him



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Material Girl sported a retro-inspired black velour blazer with massive satin lapels to match a silky bustier top.”
“Madonna looked delighted to be sharing space with the social media celebrity who boasts more than 108 million followers on Instagram alone.”
“Smell this: She then talked about that move in February where she sent gifts to her haters.”
“'When I had my KKW Fragrance KIMOJI Hearts launch, I sent some of my haters the new perfumes.”
“The list included Taylor Swift and Chloe Grace Moretz, both of whom have spoken out about the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star.”
“She then talked about that move in February where she sent gifts to her haters.”
“And usually the answer is no, but if it's something that really bothers me, I'll respond.'”
“In a year?”
“In a month?”
“'I used to be really sensitive—I’d have Google Alerts and look on websites and get so upset, but now I don't really care,' said the wife of Kanye West'I always ask the questions: Will this affect me in a week?”


"The material girl wears a retro style black velvet jacket with heavy Satin lapels to complement her silk corset."
"Madonna seems happy to share space with this social media celebrity, who claims to have 108 million fans on instagram alone."
"Smell it: then in February she talked about her gift giving to her enemies."
"When I introduced my KKW perfume KIMOJI Hearts, I gave my new perfume to some of my enemies."
"The list includes Taylor swift and Chloe grace Moretz, both of whom have publicly said they want to keep up with Kardashian."
"Then, in February, she talked about giving gifts to enemies."
"Usually the answer is no, but if there's something bothering me, I'll answer it."
"Within a year?"
"In a month?"
"I used to be very sensitive, I would post reminders on Google, browse websites, and feel very upset, but now I really don't care," Kanye West's wife said. "I always ask the question: will this affect me in a week?"



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““How can he dare to talk about us?””
“...even know us she added...”
“He should maybe spend some time thinking about why we don t want to see him and maybe realize that if he ever does want a relationship with us talking about us on TV is not the way to make that happen Image zoom Credit Larsen Talbert He doesn t...”
““He makes it seem like we’re being kept from him, which is insane,” Mady said.”
“In August 2016, Mady and Cara told PEOPLE that they weren’t speaking to their father, who had given interviews to some media outlets about their strained relationship.”
“Though he wished them a happy birthday via Instagram in October, Jon remains estranged from the twins.”
“”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The father of eight posted a festive Instagram of the two on Wednesday, writing “Happy 4th of July!!!”
“Father of eight Jon Gosselin continues to spend time with his daughter HannahReality personality Jon Gosselin continues to spend time with his daughter Hannah.”


"How dare he say we?"
“… She even knew us, she added
"Maybe he should take a moment to think about why we don't want to see him, maybe he will realize that if he really wants to fall in love with us, talking about us on TV is not the way to achieve this, Larson Talbot, he won't..."
"He makes us look like we're being turned away from him, which is crazy," Maddy said
"In August 2016, Maddy and Kara told people that they didn't speak to their father, who was interviewed by some media about their tense relationship."
"Although he wished them a happy birthday on instagram in October, Jon was still alienated from the twins."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The father of eight posted a photo of the couple on instagram on Wednesday, saying "happy July 4!"
"The father of eight, Jon Gosselin, continues to be with his daughter, Hannah, while real personality, Jon Gosselin, continues to be with her daughter, Hannah."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I know Quinn is mine, but she’s also hers, and I just feel like whatever she wants for her is what I will come to terms with.”“Scandal” airs on Thursdays at 9 p.m. on ABC.”
““I’ve been such a cog in this huge wheel for seven years, and I’m just very used to Shonda making the best decisions for the characters,” Lowes says.”
“I felt very safe.”Shortly after the fake shooting, Quinn went into labor and had the baby with a little help from Rowan, his salesman friend who was previously a war medic, as well assome hallucinations of her friends.”
““We had our stunt coordinator — I had a stunt double — and we took things really slow.”
“...instructing me on how to do everything really safely which was incredible Lowes says...”
“Getting so physical while pregnant was horrifying at first for Lowes but when it came to the day of shooting the actual scene she shares she felt very well taken care of We had a medic on set at all times and we had an OB on set who was...”
“She was able to surprise Rowan when he came down to the bunker, and she attacked him — and this time when she begged him not to kill her until after her baby was born, it turned out that “mother and children first” reminder sunk in.”
““The stakes couldn’t be higher,” Lowes says of “Good People.”When Olivia showed up at Rowan’s and the father-daughter duo engaged in a standoff over the fact that he should shoot her but couldn’t, Quinn used a hairpin to unshackle her handcuffs.”
“...trade and that doomed both her and her unborn daughter...”
“People revealed Rowan kept Quinn in a bunker where she pleaded for her life clutching her pregnant stomach and saying that in B613 it was supposed to be mothers and children first that s the rule but then railed against Rowan for his inability to see that Olivia would never...”


"I know Quinn is mine, but she's also hers. I just think I'll take whatever she wants." "Scandal" was broadcast on ABC at 9 p.m. Thursday
"I've been on this huge wheel for seven years, and I'm used to shoda making the best decisions for the character," Ross said
"I feel safe." Shortly after the fake shooting, Quinn gave birth and gave birth with the help of Rowan, a friend of Quinn's salesman, a former battlefield medic, and some hallucinations of her friends
"We have stunt coordinators - I have stunt doubles - and we're very slow."
“… It's incredible how to teach me how to really do everything safely, "says Lois
"At the beginning, Lois felt terrible about her physical condition during her pregnancy, but when she filmed the real scene she shared, she felt that she was taken good care of. We always had a medical staff on the set, and we had an obstetrician on the set. He was..."
"When Rowan came to the bunker, she was able to give him a surprise. She attacked Rowan. This time, she begged Rowan not to kill her before the baby was born. As a result, the reminder of" mother and child first "gradually became popular
"The stakes couldn't have been higher," Lowes said of "good people." when Olivia showed up at Rowan's, the father and daughter were in a stalemate because he should have shot her, but he couldn't, and Quinn released her handcuffs with a hairpin. "
“… It's a deal. It's a deal for her and her unborn daughter. "
"It is revealed that Rowan keeps Quinn in a bunker. She pleads in the bunker and holds fast to her pregnant stomach. In b613, it should be mother and child first. This is the rule. But later, because Rowan can't see Olivia, she will never..."



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mike Fleiss, Elan Gale, Bennett Graebner and Nicole Woods are the executive producers.”
“Hosted by Chris Harrison, "The Bachelorette" is a production of Next Entertainment in association with Warner Horizon Unscripted & Alternative Television.”
“...it's Becca Kufrin!”
“The most dramatic conclusion ever to "The Bachelor" abruptly ended Becca Kufrin's happily ever after with Arie Luyendyk Jr., but that's just the start for America's sweetheart as she is named the next Bachelorette for season 14 - premiering on MONDAY, MAY 28 on ABC!”
“The highly anticipated announcement was made on the live "The Bachelor: After the Final Rose" Special.”
“RELATED: Watch The Bachelor Finale now on ABC.com>>The gut-wrenching finish to Becca Kufrin's romance with Arie Luyendyk Jr. left Bachelor Nation speechless.”
“In a change of heart, Arie broke up with America's sweetheart just weeks after proposing to her – stealing her fairytale ending and her future.”
“Now, the humble fan favorite and girl next door from Minnesota returns for a second shot at love, starring on "The Bachelorette," when it premieres for its 14th season on MONDAY, MAY 28 (8:00-10:01 p.m. EDT), on The ABC Television Network, streaming and on demand.”
“The announcement was made on the live "The Bachelor: After the Final Rose" special.”
“SEE BECCA IN A DELETED SCENE FROM THE BACHELORWith the help of her family and friends, Becca was able to pick up the pieces and put the focus back on herself, moving forward with her life.”


"Mike fries, Elan Gail, Bennett grabner and Nicole woods are executive producers."
"Bachelor" by Chris Harrison is the next entertainment to work with Warner horizon screenless
“… I'm Becca Coughlin
The most dramatic ending in the history of bachelor abruptly ends the happy lives of Becca kufrin and Arie luyendyk Jr., but this is only the beginning of American sweetheart, because she is nominated as the next Bachelor in Season 14, which will premiere on ABC on Monday, May 28
The much anticipated news was announced in the live broadcast of the "Bachelor: after the last rose" special
Related report: let's see the ending of bachelor now ABC website > > the heartbreaking ending of the romantic story between Becca kuflynn and Ariel luyandik Jr. silences the bachelor country. "
"In order to change her mind, Ellie broke up with her a few weeks after proposing to American sweetheart - stealing her fairy tale ending and future."
"Now, the favorite girl next door from Minnesota is back, starring in bachelor, and will premiere Season 14 on ABC's streaming and on-demand programs on Monday, May 28 (8:00-10:01 p.m. EST)
"The news was announced in the live special" Bachelor: after the last rose. "
"In a deleted bachelor scene, with the help of family and friends, Becca picks up the pieces again, focuses on herself and continues her life."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Debra Messing admits the Dirty Dancing remake reveals what happened to Baby and Johnny after that summerMORE : Nicole Scherzinger beams in make-up free selfie with Dirty Dancing co-stars Sarah Hyland and Debra Messing...”
“It was really overwhelming.’ People have, however, been quick to compare the lift of Breslin and the actress who portrayed the original Baby, Jennifer Grey.”
“Estranged husband ‘killed hospital worker and her daughter’ before dying in car crashThe first rule of TV remakes is this: Don’t make TV remakes.”
“Classics should stay just that.”
“But does anyone ever listen?”
“No, no they don’t.”
“There are a few rare occasions where taking a film to television has worked – take last year’s live televised version of Grease starring Vanessa Hudgens and Julianne Hough, for example.”
“But last night’s take on the Patrick Swayze favourite Dirty Dancing, went down like a lead balloon – or should we say, a very heavy watermelon.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementIt had all the trappings of a new classic in the making: an all-star cast including Nicole Scherzinger, Debra Messing and Abigail Breslin, all the old hits, and even the iconic lift between Baby and Johnny.”
“The story follows Breslin as Baby and newcomer Colt Prattes as Johnny as they fall in love at a Catskills resort where she is vacationing with her family.”


"More: Debra messing admits that the remake of dirty dance reveals what happened to baby and Johnny after that summer: Nicole shersinger co stars with dirty dance, Sarah Helan and Debra messing shine in makeup free selfies..."
But bryslin's charm was quickly compared to the actress who played the original baby, Jennifer gray
"The separated husband 'killed the hospital staff and her daughter' and died in a car accident. The first rule of TV remake is: don't remake."
"The classics should be like this."
"But has anyone heard of it?"
"No, no, they don't."
"It's rare to get a movie on TV, such as the live TV version of grease starring Vanessa Huggins and Julian Hoff last year."
"But Patrick Swayze's favorite dirty dance performance last night was like a lead balloon - or, we should say, a heavy watermelon."
"The ad has a new classic production of all the decorations: all star actors including Nicole scherzenegger, Debra messing and Abigail Breslin, all the old favorites, even the iconic elevator between baby and Johnny."
"The story tells of Breslin as a baby and the new little marplatt as Johnny as they fall in love with the Catskill resort where she is on holiday with her family."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He claimed to have only treated her with “kindness and respect” during their relationship and never physically harmed her.”
“...could The lawsuit alleged the actor abused drugs like cocaine ecstasy psychedelic mushrooms and steroids Ryan Phillippe denied all allegations of assault and accused his ex girlfriend of trying to extort him with false allegations...”
“Once she arrived she claimed Phillippe was extremely agitated grabbed her upper arm so tightly that his grip left heavy bruises on her arm and then braced his body and violently threw her down his staircase as hard as he...”
“She claimed after an argument with the actor, she went to his house to get her belongings.”
“As The Blast first reported, Hewitt sued the actor for $1 million accusing him of assaulting her at his Los Angeles home.”
“Hewitt wants the court to sanction Ryan Phillippe for not turning over the text messages to the tune of $12,640 and for the court to order the actor to turn over all documents she has requested.”
“She claims he has yet to hand over any documents to back up his claim she "fabricated the incident in an attempt to extort money from Phillippe."”
“Hewitt's attorneys say they have given Phillippe and his legal team multiple extensions to hand over the documents they requested.”
“Phillippe and his team had told Hewitt and her lawyer that he would produce all texts with Reese but they keep missing their own deadlines.”
“...to her but then failing to do so...”


He claimed to be "friendly and respectful" to her in their relationship and never physically hurt her
“…… Can the lawsuit accuse the actor of abusing cocaine, ecstasy, psychedelic mushrooms, steroids and other drugs? Ryan Phillips denies all the assault charges and accuses his ex girlfriend of trying to blackmail him with false charges... "
"As soon as she arrived, he said that Philip was very excited. He grasped her upper arm tightly. His hand left a serious bruise on her arm. Then he supported his body and threw her down the stairs as hard as he did..."
"She claimed that after arguing with the actor, she went to his house to get her things."
"As initially reported in the bombing, Hewitt sued the actor for $1 million in damages, accusing him of assaulting her at his home in Los Angeles."
"Hewitt wants the court to punish Ryan Phillips because he didn't turn in the text message for $12640 and ask the court to order the actor to hand in all the documents she asked for."
She claimed that he had not handed over any documents to support his claim and that she "fabricated this incident to extort money from Philip."
"Hewitt's lawyers said they had given Philip and his legal team several delays to hand over the required documents."
"Philip and his team told Hewitt and her lawyers that he would work with Reese to produce all the texts, but they always missed their deadlines."
“… Give it to her, but if you don't... "



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In 17 March, 2012 the British Royal, who wed Prince William in 2011, wore a long, dark green coat and she also wore green to attend the St Patrick's Day Parade at Mons Barracks on March 17, 2014 in Aldershot.”
“This has notably been the case for St Patrick’s day each year, when Kate wears a variation on green in homage to the Emerald Isle.”
“The mother-of-two is also one for following a colour scheme.”
“Kate Middleton, 35, is known for dressing fabulously for special state occasions.”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“We will use your email address only for sending you newsletters.”


"On March 17, 2012, a member of the British royal family who married Prince William in 2011 wore a dark green long coat, and she also wore green to attend the St. Patrick's Day March March March March 17, 2014 at aldeshott Mons barracks."
"Every year on St. Patrick's day, Kate wears a green dress to pay homage to emerald island."
"The mother of two is also a person who follows the color scheme."
"Kate Middleton, 35, is known for her gorgeous dress on special state occasions."
"Sign up now and don't miss the top Royal stories any more."
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."
"We will only use your email address to send you a press release."



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mark Ruffalo — showed up, too.”
“Speaking to PEOPLE on set, Guthrie said the costumes had been in the works for a little over a month — and the prosthetics and wigs were borrowed from Saturday Night Live.”
“Without fail, the hosts of the Today show and Good Morning America churn out epic Halloween costumes year after year — and 2017 is no exception.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Tuesday, Today‘s NBC stars pulled out all the stops, hitting the plaza dressed as country’s finest artists, with Reba McEntire introducing “legend’s night.”“It was fun, it’s always surreal,” Gifford, 64, told PEOPLE at the show.”
“We all dread Halloween because it s a lot of work and then we all have the best time right It ends up being fun at the end and looking at Blake looking at me because I couldn t tell if he was horrified or excited it was creepy a...”
“...little I think to see someone dressed up as you joked Kotb 53”
“Image zoom Credit: NBC/TwitterImage zoom Credit: NBC/TwitterImage zoom Credit: NBC/TwitterImage zoom Credit: NBC/Twitter“Every shred of my dignity is gone,” quipped Kelly, before being surprised by the real Shania Twain on stage.”
“But perhaps the cream of the crop was Savannah Guthrie as Kenny Rogers and Matt Lauer as Dolly Parton, who performed a duet of “Islands in the Stream.”“Somehow they convinced me to dress as a woman one more time,” said Lauer as his colleagues roared with laughter.”
““I think we’ve always wanted to do a duet, and Matt does enjoy dressing as a woman,” she joked.”


"Mark rufaro - there it is."
Guthrie told the audience that the costumes had been made for more than a month and that the prosthetics and wigs were borrowed from "Saturday night live."
"There's no doubt that the hosts of today show and Good Morning America have launched epic costumes year after year - and 2017 is no exception."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On Tuesday, today's NBC stars came to the square dressed up as the best artists in the country, and Reba mcvisser introduced legend night." "It's fun, it's always surreal," Gifford, 64, told people on the show
"We're all afraid of Halloween, because it's a lot of work, and then we all have the best time, and it's fun at the end. Looking at Blake and looking at me, because I can't tell whether he's scared or excited, it's creepy..."
“… I want to see someone dressed like you're joking. "
"Image zooming credit: NBC / twitter image zooming credit: NBC / twitter image zooming credit: NBC / twitter image zooming credit: NBC / twitter image zooming credit: NBC / twitter" every bit of my dignity has disappeared, "Kelly joked, and then he was stunned by the real Shania Twain on stage
"But perhaps the best is Savannah Guthrie as Kenny Rogers, and Matt Raul as Dolly Parton. They performed a duet" islands in the stream. " "Somehow, they convinced me to wear women's clothes again," laughs Raul's colleagues
"I think we've always wanted to play duets," she joked. "Matt really likes to dress up as a woman."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Depending on the tumor type, depending on the sensitivity of the tumor – it just depends the type but I feel more than yes, she will undergo chemotherapy or radiation,” Dr. Melamed said at the time.”
“Miller also shared, “I’m on a tight schedule; shooting two projects and I need to get out of here and on with my life!!”
“Abby Lee Miller announced on Instagram TuesdayAbby Lee Miller is recovering after undergoing emergency surgery.”
“The former Dance Moms star, who was preliminarily diagnosed with non-Hodgkin’s lymphoma, revealed on Instagram Tuesday evening that she underwent a procedure and is now on the mend.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““After another 2 hour MRI this morning, the pros thought I needed one more quick little emergency surgery!”
“Ugh!” she began.”
““I’m in recovery now and texting so everything must be ok, just hiccups in my plans!” continued Miller, who recently began her third round of chemotherapy.”
“!” and asked that fans “Please keep me in your prayers.”“I’m grateful for all the well wishes!” she concluded.”
““We’re getting an oncologist involved and we have to figure out what the next steps are as far as chemotherapy or radiation or more spine surgery.”


"It depends on the type of tumor, it depends on the sensitivity of the tumor - it just depends on the type of tumor, but I think she will receive chemotherapy or radiotherapy," Dr. Melamed said at the time
Miller also said: "I have a tight schedule. I've filmed two projects. I need to get out of here and continue my life!"
"Abby Lee Miller announced on instagram on Tuesday that Abby Lee Miller is recovering from emergency surgery."
"The former dancer star, initially diagnosed with non Hodgkin's lymphoma, revealed on instagram on Tuesday night that she had surgery and is now recovering."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I had another two hours of MRI this morning, and experts thought I needed a quick little emergency operation!"
"Ah! "She began to say
"I'm recovering and texting now, so everything will be OK, just a little problem with the plan!"! Miller went on to say that she recently started her third round of chemotherapy
"! and ask fans" please pray for me. " "I appreciate all the blessings! "She concluded
"We're looking for an oncologist to participate, and we have to figure out what we're going to do next, like chemotherapy, radiotherapy or more spinal surgery," he said



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RuPaul was equally enthusiastic about stepping into the Queen Of Hearts' shoes.”
“She became so excited when he walked her through his concept she felt like she was having a 'mini heart attack'.”
“But girls, little girls like me wait to see someone who looks like me in a calendar.”
“'I know that.”
“'When you think of the Pirelli calendar, I'm not the face that comes up,' Whoopi said.”
“And Whoopi Goldberg and albino model-lawyer Thando Hopa stand in as the Royal Duchess and Princess of Hearts, respectively.”
“'People of color all over the world need to know that they're kings and queens, and I think that story of Alice in Wonderland puts that in that proper perspective.'”
“'That bold statement by Pirelli, I think, really goes against any ignorance,' Diddy said.”
“Naomi Campbell and Sean 'Diddy' Combs take on the roles of the Royal Beheaders, looking nearly indistinguishable from a pair of stars in a late-90s rap video save for the axes in their hands.”
“In another shot, RuPaul presides over a royal court, clearly not one to be messed with.”


"Rupert is also keen to step into the position of Queen of hearts."
"When he explained his concept to her, she became very excited. She felt like she had a little heart attack."
"But girls, little girls like me are waiting to see people like me on the calendar."
"I know."
"When you think about the Pirelli calendar, I'm not the face that appears," UBI said
"UBI Goldberg and Sandor Hooper, an albino model lawyer, play the Royal Duchess and the red heart princess, respectively."
"People of color all over the world need to know that they are kings and queens. I think the story of Alice in Wonderland starts from this angle."
"I think Pirelli's bold statement really goes against any ignorance," didi said
"Naomi Campbell and Sean DeeDee cooms played the role of the Royal decapitators. Apart from the axe in their hands, they were almost the same as a pair of stars in a rap video in the late 1990s."
"In another shot, rupaul presides over a royal court, obviously not a troublemaker."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: Charles Sykes/Bravo, Tommy Garcia/Bravo...”
“Vanderpump Rules season seven premieres Monday, December 3 at 9 p.m. on Bravo TV.”
“Ahead of next week’s season seven premiere, a source claims Scheana Marie has found herself on the outs with the other ladies of the show, including Stassi Schroeder, Katie Maloney, and Brittany Cartwright, as Billie Lee and James Kennedy reportedly remain outsiders as well.”
“The cast “is really divided and not getting along,” a source revealed to Hollywood Life on November 27.”
““Stassi and Katie have been talking behind Scheana’s back, as they feel she’s extremely desperate for attention.”
“It’s really Stassi, Brittany, and Katie versus Scheana, and Scheana really feels left out of everything.”According to the report, Scheana is upset about her current status with the other women but understands why they are against her.”
““It’s hurting her, however, Scheana really was spending so much time with Rob that she was acting like it was the Scheana and Rob show, and now they’re not even together anymore,” the insider explained.”
“As Vanderpump Rules fans will recall, Scheana’s life revolved around her relationship with Rob Valletta for the entirety of season six and throughout their time together on the show, her co-stars expressed doubt in the longevity of the romance.”
“In addition to Scheana’s reported feud with her co-stars, the insider said Billie is also on the outs with the cast and was recently involved in a dispute with her boss at SUR Restaurant, Lisa Vanderpump.”
““Billie and Lisa also get into it, and it gets so bad that Billie is forced to go to Lisa’s house to apologize,” the source revealed.”


Photo sources: Charles Sikes / Bravo, Tommy Garcia / Bravo
"The premiere of season 7 of the van der Pol rules will be on Bravo at 9 p.m. on Monday, December 3."
"Before the premiere of season 7 next week, it's reported that Shanna Mary has found herself with other women in the play, including Stacy Schroeder, Katie Maloney and Brittany Cartwright, and Billy Lee and James kennidy are still reported to be outsiders."
On November 27, a source told Hollywood Life: "the cast is really split and can't get along well."
"Stacy and Katie have been talking behind Shanna's back because they think she's very eager to get attention."
"It's really a duel between Stacy, Brittany and Katie and Shanna, who really feels excluded from everything." She is reported to be upset about her current relationship with other women, but she understands why they are against her
"It hurt her, however, that Shanna really spent so much time with rob, and she acted as if it was Shanna and Rob's show, and now they're not even together," the source explained
"Fans of the Vanderbilt rule will remember that she spent the entire sixth season of her life around her relationship with Rob Valletta, and throughout the time they performed together, her partners were skeptical about the durability of the relationship."
"It is reported that in addition to the feud between Shanna and her partner, the insider also said that Billy also had a feud with the crew and recently had a dispute with Lisa vanderpump, the owner of her restaurant in sur."
Sources said: "Billy and Lisa are also involved, the situation has become very bad, Billy was forced to go to Lisa's home to apologize."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It wasn't like this 'ah ha' moment.”
“I'd say [I found my personal style] in the last couple years.”
“Since "Very Cavallari" is largely set in a retail and fashion environment, we took the opportunity of its launch to ask the reality show star, designer and entrepreneur about her shopping habits, from her teen years to today.”
“"It's a great representation of my style because everything is effortless and dainty and simple."”
“"I design everything that I love and want to wear," she tells Fashionista over the phone from Nashville.”
“...and, of course, launching Uncommon James.”
“Cavallari has been stacking her fashion resumé since "The Hills" by curating a NFL-themed runway show at New York Fashion Week, designing her eponymous shoe line in collaboration with Chinese Laundry, commenting on red carpet fashion for E!”
“...recently launched jewelry and lifestyle line opening its flagship store and overseeing a team of TV ready staffers at the company HQ”
“This time around Cavallari moves into another life via reality TV fishbowl set not in Southern California but her new home of Nashville Tenn Very Cavallari showcases the titular star s home life with NFL quarterback husband Jay Cutler and her three kids and professional responsibilities running Uncommon James her...”
“'s thunder on spin-off "The Hills" by surprise-sauntering into Speidi's wedding in 2009?)”


"It's not such an aha moment."
"I would say (I found my personal style) in the past few years."
"Since" very cavalari "is mainly set in the retail and fashion environment, we took advantage of its launch to ask the reality TV star, designer and entrepreneur about her shopping habits from her teens to today."
"It's a good reflection of my style, because everything is easy, refined and simple."
"I've designed all the clothes I like and want to wear," she told vogue on the phone in Nashville
"And James, of course."
"Cavallari has been sorting out her fashion resume since" mountain ". She planned a runway show with NFL as the theme at New York Fashion Week, and cooperated with Chinese laundries to design her own shoe series with the same name for e!"
“… Recently launched a jewelry and lifestyle line, opened a flagship store and supervised a team of TV ready employees at the company's headquarters
"This time, Cavallari entered a different life through the reality show fishbowl, not in Southern California, but in her new home in Nashville, Tennessee - very Cavallari, showing the nameless star and NFL QUARTERBACK husband Jay Cutler Cutler's family life with her three children and her professional responsibilities... "
In 2009, at specty's wedding, thunder unexpectedly walked into another film of mountains



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[7]References [ edit ]”
“2000), Amirah (b.”
“She was formerly a film marketer and wife of former NBA player Shaquille O’Neal.”
“[3][4]Career [ edit ]O'Neal is one of the executive producers of Basketball Wives, a reality series that follows the wives, ex-wives, and girlfriends of professional basketball players.”
“Another reality television show, Basketball Wives LA, follows the Los Angeles wives, ex-wives, and girlfriends of professional basketball players.”
“O'Neal is the center of a third reality television series, Shaunie's Home Court, a reality series that follows the lives of her five children and family.”
“Personal life [ edit ]On December 26, 2002, she married basketball player Shaquille O'Neal at the Beverly Hills Hotel.”
“Before and during[5] their marriage, the couple had four children: Shareef (b.”
“2001), Shaqir (b.”
“[6] Their oldest son, Shareef, is a standout basketball player, who committed to UCLA in 2018, and later transferred to LSU in 2020.”


[7] reference [Edit]
"2000), Amira (B.)
"She used to be a film marketer and the wife of former NBA player Shaquille O'Neal."
"[3] [4] professional [editor] O'Neill is one of the executive producers of basketball wife, a reality show series focusing on the wives, ex wives and girlfriends of professional basketball players."
Another reality TV show, basketball wife Los Angeles, focuses on professional basketball players' Los Angeles wives, ex wives and girlfriends
"O'Neill is at the center of Shawnee's home, the third reality TV series about the lives of her five children and her family."
On December 26, 2002, she married basketball player Shaquille O'Neill at Beverly Hills Hotel
Before and during their marriage, the couple had four children: Sharef (b)
"2001), shagil (B.)
"Their eldest son, sharev, is an outstanding basketball player who joined UCLA in 2018 and then moved to Louisiana State University in 2020."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bridges, who looked somewhat embarrassed, posed with Mirren, the jet ski and the life jacket on stage as the show concluded.”
“At the end of the ceremony Kimmel revealed that Phantom Thread costume designer Mark Bridges won the prize, with his speech clocking in at around 30 seconds long.”
““Obviously I’m not going to win the ski,” joked Gary Oldman during his speech for Darkest Hour.”
“The running gag ran throughout the evening, and was referenced by several winners.”
“I have a stopwatch,” he added.”
““I will be timing you.”
“Not saying you shouldn’t give a long speech, but whoever gives the shortest speech tonight will go home with — Johnny, tell them what they’ll win.”Cue the curtain opening to reveal the jet ski, presented by Helen Mirren.”
“So here’s what we’re going to do.”
“He said: “This is a really long show.”
“He was referencing an age old Oscars complaint, that the show – especially the speeches – were too long.”


"Bridges looked a little embarrassed, and at the end of the show, he took a picture on stage with Mirren, the motorboat and the life jacket."
At the end of the ceremony, Kimmel revealed that phantom line fashion designer mark bridges won the prize and his speech lasted about 30 seconds
"Obviously I won't win the skiing race," Gary Oldman joked in his speech at the darkest hour
"The running stunt ran through the night, and several winners quoted it."
"I have a stopwatch," he added
"I'll time you."
"It's not that you shouldn't make a long speech, but the people who have the shortest speech tonight will take - Johnny home and tell them what they're going to win." Unveiling Helen Mirren's motorboat
"That's what we're going to do."
"It's a long show," he said
"He's referring to a long-standing Oscar complaint that shows - especially speeches - are too long."



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Slowly, but surely."”
“"I'm doing better each day," he added.”
“At that moment, security guard Jesus Campos was on the floor to check a blocked fire escape door, and he heard that strange sound.”
“Unbeknownst to him, it wasn't drilling, but the rattle of a gun.”
“"As I was walking down, I heard rapid fire.”
“And at first I took cover, I felt a burning sensation.”
“I went to go lift my pant leg up and I saw the blood," Campos said on "The Ellen DeGeneres Show" in an episode airing Wednesday.”
“He said he radioed in that shots were fired, but didn't immediately say he was hit.”
“Instead, he pulled out his cellphone, he said, "just to clear that radio traffic" because he knew something serious was happening.”
“Campos' harrowing account is the first time he has shared his story publicly since getting struck by gunman Stephen Paddock amid the Oct. 1 massacre on the Las Vegas Strip.”


"Slowly, but surely."
"I'm improving every day," he added
"At that moment, security guard Jesus Campos was checking a blocked fire escape door on the floor, and he heard the strange sound."
"He didn't know. It wasn't drilling, it was gunfire."
"As I went down, I heard a quick shot."
"At first I hid and felt a burning sensation."
"I went to lift my trouser legs and saw blood," Campos said on Wednesday's Ellen DeGeneres Show
"He said he radioed that someone had fired, but did not immediately say that he had been shot."
"Instead, he took out his cell phone," he said, "just to clear the radio communication," because he knew something serious had happened. "
"Campos's heartbreaking narrative is his first public sharing of his story since he was attacked by the shooter Stephen paddock on Las Vegas Avenue on October 1."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I stepped back and thought, "Wow, the universe works in interesting ways."'”
“And that’s something, yes, I had to face and discuss.”
“Though she was initially uncomfortable with the scar the surgery left, that is no longer the case and Selena says her body image has even improved.”
“Life-changing: Selena received a kidney transplant earlier this year from her friend, Francia RaisaSelena also received a kidney transplant earlier this year from her friend, Francia Raisa.”
“We ended it as best friends, and it was genuinely about encouraging and caring [for each other], and that was pretty remarkable for me.'”
“'I truly have never experienced anything like that in my life.”
“'Something that I'm really proud of is that there's such a true friendship [between me and The Weeknd].”
“The Weeknd even deleted every post he had that featured Selena off his Instagram account Selena says they ended their relationship as best friends...”
“Though the pair have recently started unfollowing each other on social media and The Weeknd even deleted every post he had that featured Selena off his Instagram account Selena says they ended their relationship as best friends Though the pair have recently started unfollowing each other on social media and...”
“Back together: Selena and Justin have decided to give their relationship another shot following an on-off romance that started in 2010Amicable?”


I stepped back and thought, "Wow, the way the universe works is interesting."
"Yes, I have to face it and discuss it."
"Although she was initially uncomfortable with the scar from the operation, it's not the case now, and Selena said her body image has even improved."
"Life changing: Serena received a kidney transplant from her friend Francia Riza earlier this year and a kidney transplant from her friend Francia Riza earlier this year."
"We ended the game with our best friend, and the game really encouraged and cared for each other, which was great for me."
"I've never experienced anything like this in my life."
"What I'm really proud of is that we have such a sincere friendship."
"This week, he even deleted every post about Serena from his instagram account. Serena said they ended their best friend relationship..."
"Although the two recently started working together on social media, and this week even deleted every post he posted on his instagram account about Serena, Serena said they ended their best friend relationship, even though they recently started working together on social media, and..."
"Get back together: Serena and Justin have decided to give their relationship another chance after their off and on relationship that began in 2010. Is it friendly?"



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Abigail Spencer’s Instagram story | Credit: Abigail Spencer/Instagram...”
“...touchdownatheathrow Another Suits star Abigail Spencer shared a photo of herself appearing to head to the airport on Thursday...”
“Rick Hoffman who plays lawyer Louis Litt on Suits told his fans that he was heading east for some special event in an Instagram video adding that he was very excited about that He then shared a photo of his landing in London with the caption Sun up Shade down...”
“Later in the week, the family was was spotted in London, snapping a photo outside Buckingham Palace.”
“She first visited Paris with her family, including her daughter Iris, of whom she shared a picture at the Louvre Museum.”
“Another costar, Sarah Rafferty, who plays Donna on the show, is also in Europe.”
“Though Macht himself hasn’t posted about his U.K. arrival, his wife, Jacinda Barrett, shared a photo of her giving the couple’s son, Luca, a kiss, just outside Buckingham Palace.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The first to land in London — or at least, the first to post about it publicly — is Gabriel Macht, who plays Harvey Specter on the USA legal drama.”
“Meghan Markle‘s former Suits costars have started to arrive in London ahead of her wedding to Prince Harry on Saturday.”


"Picture zoom Abigail Spencer's instagram story | source: Abigail Spencer / instagram..."
“… On another suit star's touchdown, Abigail Spencer, she shared a picture of herself heading to the airport on Thursday. "
"In an instagram video, Rick Hoffman, who plays lawyer Louis LITT, tells his fans that he is going to the East for a special event, adding that he is very excited, and then shares a photo of him landing in London with the title" the sun rises, the shadows fall... "
Later this week, the family was photographed outside Buckingham Palace in London
She went to Paris for the first time with her family, including her daughter iris, who shared a picture with her at the Louvre Museum
"Another partner, Sarah Rafferty, is also in Europe. She plays Donna in the play."
"Although Macht himself has not announced his arrival in the UK, his wife Jessica Barrett shared a photo outside Buckingham Palace in which she gave the couple's son Luca a kiss."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The first person to land in London - or at least the first to make it public - was Gabriel Macht, who played Harvey specter in the American law drama Harvey specter."
"Megan markel's former suit actor has begun arriving in London ahead of her wedding to Prince Harry on Saturday."



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Via Sundance Institute & AP)”
“The festival begins on January 24.”
“Leonard Cohen, Harvey Weinstein, Toni Morrison, and Mils Davis biopics are also in the mix, along with a film about Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez’s rise to Congress.”
“The full Sundance lineup gets a more thorough detailing here but will also include Mindy Kaling’s writing and starring turn in Late Night, about a late-night talk show host (a woman played by Emma Thompson) who employs her very first female writer.”
“Earlier this year, Efron Instagrammed a few unofficial images from the set of the film, including a from-behind shot of Ted and Liz’s first meeting and a picture of Ted in his car, presumably during a late-night hunt.”
“Here’s a first official look:The film will aim to tell the Bundy story from the perspective of his longtime girlfriend, Elizabeth Kloepfer (played by Lily Collins), who suspected for over a year that he may have been a killer.”
“To that effect, the Sundance Institute has unveiled its upcoming festival lineup, which shall include the Joe Berlinger-directed Extremely Wicked, Shockingly Evil And Vile with Efron in the Bundy role.”
“So, it turns out that there’s room for Efron in the lineup, especially given that Ted Bundy, who killed dozens of victims, was widely regarded as a charismatic fellow with magnetic good looks and a winning personality, who could have been mistaken for a Kennedy prior to his arrest.”
“However, Phoenix is a busy guy, and more importantly, serial killers don’t always arrive in the same homogeneous package.”
“Instead, Joaquin Phoenix has been throwing some serious John Wayne Gacy vibes during some of Joker origin story director Todd Phillips’ reveals for that film.”


(via Sundance college and Associated Press)
"The festival starts on January 24."
"Biographies of Leonard Cohen, Harvey Weinstein, Toni Morrison and mills Davis are among them, as well as a film about Alexandria ocasio Cortez coming to power in Congress."
"The full Sundance lineup gets more thorough details here, but will also include Mindy Carlin's writing and starring late at night, about a late night talk show host (the woman played by Emma Thompson) who hired her first female writer."
"Earlier this year, Efron installed several unofficial photos on the set, including a picture of Ted and Liz meeting for the first time, and a picture of ted in the car, probably during a late night hunt."
"This is the first official to see the film: he will tell the story of Bondi from the perspective of his girlfriend Elizabeth clopffer (played by lily Collins), who has suspected Bondi may be the murderer for more than a year
To this end, Sundance college announced the upcoming Film Festival lineup, including "extreme evil, shocking evil and meanness" directed by Joe Bolinger, and evron will play the role of Bondi
"So, it turns out that evron has a place in the squad, especially considering that Ted Bundy, who killed dozens of victims, is widely regarded as a charismatic guy with charming beauty and successful personality, and he may be mistaken for Kenny before he is arrested."
"However, Phoenix is a busy man, and more importantly, serial killers don't always arrive in the same package."
"Instead, when Todd Phillips, the director of the origin of the clown, opened the film, Joaquin Phoenix had been creating some serious John Wayne Gacy atmosphere."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They'll be waiting for you till tomorrow only so jazz up your denim third-pieces now.”
“Elisse JosonADVERTISEMENT - CONTINUE READING BELOWDenim-on-denim may have been a fashion faux pas during Britney and Justin's time, but it's totally on-trend now!”
“Heck, even It girl Kendall Jenner swears by the denim jacket.”
“"I love pieces that you can always count on.”
“I have a few denim jackets I constantly rotate, but it's amazing that there are so many new spins on the classic," she spilled in her blog.”
“As if you needed more reasons to fall in love with this '90s must-have, these celebs show us how they rock the denim jacket for your style inspo.”
“Scroll down and get inspired!”
“Lili ReinhartADVERTISEMENT - CONTINUE READING BELOWCONTINUE READING BELOW Recommended VideosAdd a touch of girly to an otherwise masculine denim jacket by choosing one with floral embroideries like Lili's.”
“Nadine LustreSwitch up how you usually wear your denim third-piece and let one sleeve fall on your shoulder a la Naddie.”
“This style trick usually works well with oversized jackets so don't be afraid to get one in a bigger size or shop in the boy's department.”


"They'll be waiting for you till tomorrow, so decorate your third jeans now."
"Elisse josonan advertisement - continue to read the following denim on denim. It may have been a fashion faux pas of Britney Spears and Justin's time, but now it's totally trendy!"
"Hell, even Kendall Jenner, the it girl, swore to the cowboy jacket."
"I love what you can always rely on."
"I have some denim jackets that I rotate a lot, but it's amazing that there are so many new spinning classics," she said on her blog
"As if you need more reasons to fall in love with this' 90s must-have, these celebrities show us how they design denim jackets for your style."
"Scroll down for inspiration!"
"Lili Reinhart advertisement - continue to read the following content, continue to read the following recommended video, choose a denim jacket with flower embroidery like Lili, add a hint of girlishness to the original masculine denim jacket."
"Nadine lustreswitch up how you much wear your denim third piece and let one sleep fall on your shoulder a la naddie."
"This style technique usually works well with oversized jackets, so don't be afraid to buy a large one or one in the men's department."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In both movies Hepburn not only plays a strong and well-rounded female protagonist, she embodies a wonderfully, glamorously, mature woman.”
“...leads...”
“If you’re a woman in her 40s and 50s however, you’ll exclusively play grandmothers and witches, and if you’re unfortunate enough to be a woman in her 30s, you’re basically shit out of luck.”
“The age breakdown in Hollywood today goes something like this: If you’re a woman in her 20s, you’re good for pretty much any role (again, especially if you’re white and blonde).”
“And what does this gaping representational void in the media mean for how we, as women, come to terms with the process of aging?”
“So, when did becoming a grown woman stop being aspirational?”
“Back then it wasn’t about being sexy as much as it was about being sophisticated, and it’s harder to put an expiration date on sophistication.”
“There was a certain powerful comfort and elegance in their age that no amount of youthful charm could emulate.”
“During Hollywood’s Golden Age, starlets were revered for their woman-ness.”
“But it wasn’t always this way.”


"In these two films, Hepburn not only plays a strong and comprehensive heroine, but also embodies a wonderful, charming and mature woman."
“… Clues... "
"However, if you are a woman of 40 or 50 years old, you will only play the role of grandmother and witch. If you unfortunately become a woman of 30 years old, you are basically lucky."
"The age breakdown in Hollywood today is like this: if you're a woman in her 20s, you can play almost any role (again, especially if you're white and blonde)
"What does this huge representational gap in the media mean for us as women to adapt to the aging process?"
"So when is it that becoming a mature woman is no longer ambitious?"
"At that time, it was more sophisticated than sexy. It was more difficult to set a shelf life for sophistication."
"They have a strong sense of comfort and elegance at their age, and the charm of their youth can't be imitated."
"In Hollywood's golden age, actresses are respected for their femininity."
"But not always."



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Glory be to God, I claim the victory in the name of the lord, let’s go!”At the end of May, Chance shared a touching tribute to Corley on Instagram for her birthday.”
“...who they welcomed in September 2015”
“...this Fourth of July...”
“The rapper, 25, proposed to longtime girlfriend Kirsten Corley during a backyard party in front of several of their friends and family on Wednesday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“His brother, Taylor Bennett, shared a photo of the newly engaged couple on Instagram, writing, “Proposed In The Hunninds!”
“@chancetherapper You A Real One!”
“7 4 18 BlockBoys In a video that circulated on social media Chance born Chancelor Jonathan Bennett can be seen getting down on one knee while asking Corley Kirsten Katrina Corley will you make me a man and be my wife The couple share 2½ year old daughter Kensli Bennett...”
“The little girl ran up to her parents as her mom said yes The hitmaker confirmed his engagement on Twitter writing She said yes Image zoom The engaged pair began dating in 2013 but they separated in May 2016 when Corley filed court documents to declare the rapper Kensli s...”
““Independence means freedom — I do it with these folks right here,” added Chance the Rapper, 23.”


"Glory to God, I declare victory in the name of the Lord, let's go! "At the end of May, chance shared on instagram the heartfelt memory of Colley's birthday."
“… Who do they welcome in September 2015
“… July 4... "
The 25-year-old rapper proposed to his girlfriend Kirsten Corley at a backyard party in front of several friends and family on Wednesday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
His brother, Taylor Bennett, shared a picture of the newlyweds on instagram and wrote, "propose in Hungary!"
"What a chance you have!"
"In a video circulating on social media, Jonathan Bennett, a priest of 7, 4, 18 block boys who were born accidentally, kneels down on one knee and asks Corley Kirsten Katrina Corley," will you make me a man and be my wife? The couple have a two-and-a-half-year-old daughter, kensley Bennet.... "
"When her mother said yes, the little girl ran up to her parents and the killer confirmed his engagement on twitter. She said yes. The engaged couple started dating in 2013, but they broke up in May 2016 when Colley filed court documents declaring rapper kensley to be... "
Chance, a 23-year-old rapper, added: "independence means freedom - that's what I do with these people."



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It does feel appropriate.”
“But we’re also ending the way we’ve always ended everything, which is just like without a massive and clean conclusion.”
“Why Grover?”
“I imagine there’s a certain amount of pressure in naming Hannah’s baby.”
“Jenni and Lena, in unison: We diiiiid!”
“You named the baby Grover.”
“...the show...”
“So with the finale finally having aired here s our conversation with Dunham and Konner about the choices made why last week s penultimate episode purposefully felt like more of a series finale whether they ever considered Hannah having an abortion and how think piece culture affected the end of...”
““Jenni was like, ‘I wonder if anyone’s guess is ‘Fast Car’ lightly mumbled,’” Dunham laughs.”
“...after which she starts singing Tracy Chapman to herself...”


"It really feels right."
"But we're also ending it in our usual way, which is like not having a big, clean conclusion."
"Why Grover?"
"There's a certain amount of pressure on me to name Hannah's children."
"Jennie and Lina, say together: we're dead!"
"You name the child Grover."
“… Show... "
"The last episode finally aired, and this is our conversation with Dunham and Konner, discussing why last week's penultimate episode deliberately made people feel more like the last episode of a series, whether they thought about Hannah's abortion or not, and how the film culture influenced The end of the story. "
"Jennie said," I don't know if anyone guessed if the express was muttering. "
“… Then she started singing Tracy Chapman herself



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From her facial features to her adorably stylish outfits — here are 16 times Princess Charlotte looked just like her royal relatives.”
“The similarities don't end with the Queen, as Charlotte also bears a resemblance to other members of the royal family, such as her mother Kate Middleton and late grandmother Princess Diana.”
“She also recently stole the show by greeting her adoring crowd with a regal wave when her new baby brother was born.”
“Not just about whether Kate Middleton's blue dress and was a sneaky hint about the gender of her third child — but also about Princess Charlotte's uncanny resemblance to her great-grandmother, Queen Elizabeth II.”
“The royal family's most recent Christmas card immediately sparked discussion when it was released last year.”


"From her facial features to her lovely fashionable clothes, Princess Charlotte looked like her royal relatives 16 times."
"These similarities don't end with the queen, because Charlotte has similarities with other members of the royal family, such as her mother Kate Middleton and her late grandmother Princess Diana."
"She's also in the limelight recently, and when her new brother was born, she waved to her admirers."
"It's not just whether Kate Middleton's blue dress and skirt suggest the gender of her third child, but also the striking resemblance between Princess Charlotte and her great grandmother, Queen Elizabeth II."
"The royal family's latest Christmas card immediately sparked discussion when it was released last year."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She has also starred in The Vampire Diaries alongside fellow Australian actress Phoebe Tonkin.”
“Claire joined The Originals cast in 2013, portraying the role of Rebekah Mikaelson.”
“...s something really sacred about keeping that moment to yourselves Speaking to TV Week about why they were reluctant to publicise the nuptials Claire said I think there s something really sacred about keeping that moment to yourselves...”
“Flashback The couple announced their engagement in July 2015 with Claire sharing a snap of herself cosying up with her beau whilst sporting a sparkly ring pictured in LA in July 2015 Secret wedding The Brisbane born actress previously said she kept the pair s nuptials under wraps as there...”
“Meanwhile, the pair kept their wedding ceremony under wraps when they tied the knot last year.”
“The cute couple snap attracted a flood of congratulatory comments from fans of the actress, who first shot to fame starring in Australian children's television show H20: Just Add Water.”
“...captioned Yes...”
“Court documents show Matthew filed for divorce citing irreconcilable differences on April 27 just one day ahead of the couple s first wedding anniversary Taking to Instagram at the time the blonde beauty shared a photo of herself sporting a sparkling ring on her engagement finger with the snap simply...”
“Bad timing?”
“Known for her role in The Vampire Diaries's spin-off show, The Originals, Claire first announced her engagement to Matthew in July 2015.”


"She also starred in the vampire diaries with Australian actress Phoebe tomkin."
"Claire joined the original in 2013 as Rebecca mikelson."
"It's a very sacred thing to leave that moment to yourself. When we talked about why they didn't want to have a public wedding on TV Week, Claire said," I think it's a very sacred thing to leave that moment to yourself... "
"Flashback in July 2015, when the couple announced their engagement, Claire shared a photo in which she was wearing a glittering ring photographed in Los Angeles in July 2015, making out with her boyfriend and having a secret wedding. The Brisbane born actress previously said that she kept their wedding secret because there..."
"At the same time, they kept their wedding secret when they got married last year."
"The picture of the lovely couple drew warm congratulations from the actress's fans, who starred in the Australian children's TV show H20: just add water for the first time."
“… The title is
"Court documents show that Matthew filed for divorce on April 27 on the grounds of irreconcilable differences. Just one day before the couple's first wedding anniversary, the blonde shared a photo of herself wearing a sparkling ring on her engagement finger on instagram. The button on the photo is very simple..."
"The wrong time?"
"Claire is known for her role in the original, a derivative of the vampire diaries, and she first announced her engagement to Matthew in July 2015."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE: Oprah’s Puppy Dies from Parvo...”
“Her cocker spaniel, Sophie, died last year of kidney failure at the age of 13.”
“Winfrey has lost several dogs the past few years; Gracie, her golden retriever, died in 2007 after choking on a ball.”
“Sadie is currently being treated as a precaution because she was exposed to Ivan, according to peoplepets.com, which broke the story.”
“Winfrey adopted Ivan and his sister, Sadie, and actually introduced Sadie on the March 6 “Oprah” episode.”
“Ivan died last Wednesday after coming down with Parvovirus, a virus common to dogs which is fatal roughly 80 percent of the time, according to Wikipedia.”
“Oprah Winfrey is mourning the loss of Ivan, one of two cocker spaniel puppies she adopted recently from the PAWS Shelter in Chicago.”


"More: Oprah's dog died of parvovirus..."
Sophie, her Cocker dog, died of kidney failure last year at the age of 13
"Winfrey has lost several dogs in the past few years; her golden retriever, Gracie, died of choking on a ball in 2007."
According to reports, Sadie is currently receiving preventive treatment because she has been in contact with Ivan peoplepets.com "It broke the story."
Winfrey adopted Ivan and his sister Sadie and introduced her to Oprah on March 6
Ivan died last Wednesday of parvovirus, a virus common in dogs that is deadly about 80 percent of the time, Wikipedia reported
"Oprah Winfrey is mourning the death of Ivan, one of two Cocker dogs she recently adopted from claw shelter in Chicago."



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for Ryan, he looked handsome in a navy blue suit and bow-tie that matched the bottom of his wife's dress perfectly.”
“Blake rocked a stunning gold gown with blue feathers as the train.”
“This love may just be our favorite look of the night.”
“As the red carpet came to a close and the party inside the Metropolitan Museum of Art, Costume Institute began, Humans of New York decided to spotlight one famous couple.”
“In a surprise post Monday night, followers were able to read a special message from Ryan Reynolds to his wife Blake Lively.”
“"She always responds with empathy.”
“She meets anger with empathy.”
“She meets hate with empathy.”
“She'll take the time to imagine what happened to a person when they were five or six years old.”
“And she's made me a more empathetic person," Ryan shared.”


"As for Ryan, he looks handsome in a navy suit, a bow and a perfect match with the bottom of his wife's skirt."
"Black was rocking a golden dress with blue feathers on the train."
"This love may be our favorite expression tonight."
"As the red carpet draws to a close and parties at the Metropolitan Museum of art and the fashion academy begin, New Yorkers decide to focus on a famous couple."
"In a surprise post on Monday night, fans read a special message from Ryan Reynolds to his wife, Blake Lively."
"She always felt the same way."
"She faced anger with empathy."
"She faced hatred with compassion."
"She would spend time imagining what happened to a person when she was five or six years old."
"She made me a more compassionate person," Ryan said



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(The family opted to not release a card in 2016.)”
“It’s the toddler’s first holiday card, as he was only a few weeks old when sister North and cousins Penelope, Mason and Reign Disick starred in the 2015 photo wearing coordinating chic black outfits.”
“On Dec. 1, Kim posted the first image: a photo of son Saint, 2, in denim jeans as he posed by neatly wrapped brown presents with white ribbon.”
“Linnetz wrote on Instagram that the series is titled, The 25 Days of Xmas.”
“Since the start of the month, Kim Kardashian West and the photographer behind the card — Eli Linnetz — have been sharing images from the shoot on social media, much like an advent calendar.”
“The Kardashian-Jenner crew is expanding their annual, cheer-spreading Christmas card to cover an entire month — and keeping fans guessing with daily sneak peeks.”


"(the family chose not to issue cards in 2016)"
"This is the first holiday greeting card for this toddler, because when he was only a few weeks old, sister north and cousins Penelope, Mason and Regent disc starred in a 2015 photo in coordinated fashion black."
On December 1, Kim Jong Il released his first photo: his two-year-old son, saint, posed in jeans with a white ribbon and a brown gift wrapped neatly
The title of the series is "25 days of Christmas," linnetz wrote on instagram
"Since the beginning of this month, Kim Kardashian West and Eli linnetz, the photographer behind the card, have been sharing photos on social media, much like a calendar."
"Kardashian Jenner's staff are expanding their annual celebrations, extending Christmas cards throughout the month, and making fans guess through daily peeping."



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more: Pippa Middleton Weds In Giles Deacon...”
“At nearly £11,000 per night, the suite is a hotspot for celebrities staying in the city and features a private terrace with panoramic views of the top tourists spots in the bay: the harbour, Opera House and bridge.”
“From exotic escapes to city breaks, the newlyweds have been holidaying since their nuptials on May 22 in Berkshire, causing much speculation as to where the pair will land next.”
“Read more: Pippa Middleton's Wedding DayThe new husband and wife most recently made their way to the western coast of Australia.”
“The events planner wore a pale-blue Maje shirt dress accessorised with the holiday staples she hasn’t been without since landing in Australia - a Sensi Studio woven bag and Castaner espadrilles - as the pair prepared to leave the city of Perth on Monday.”
“© BackgridWhilst the the Western Australia capital is known for its beautiful beaches, the port area of Fremantle is famous for its architectural heritage and historic harbour.”
“Beyond the city, the picturesque island of Rottnest, just 11 miles west of Perth, offers plenty of outdoor activities for the adventurous couple from surfing to snorkelling, whereas wine regions in the south of the state offer a sophisticated escape in the hills.”
“Read more: How To Plan The Ultimate English WeddingThe newlywed couple first kicked off their honeymoon with an exclusive stay on a private island in French Polynesia, following a short layover in LA.”
“It is believed that Middleton and Matthews stayed at the Brando, the most luxurious eco-friendly resort in the world, reportedly costing them around £3,000 a night.”
“© Rex FeaturesIt is thought that the happy couple then went on to New Zealand before landing in Australia on Tuesday.”


"Read more: Pippa Middleton's wedding in gilsdyken..."
"This suite, which costs nearly 11000 a night, is a hot spot for celebrities to stay in the city. It has a private terrace overlooking the Bay's top tourist attractions: the harbour, the opera house and the bridge."
"From an exotic getaway to a city holiday, the newlyweds have been on holiday since their wedding in Berkshire on May 22, raising speculation about where they will land next."
"Read more: Pippa Middleton's wedding day the newlyweds recently traveled to the west coast of Australia."
"The event's curator is wearing a light blue Marguerite shirt and skirt decorated with holiday staples she has never lost since landing in Australia - a sensi studio woven bag and castaner espadrilles - and they are leaving Perth on Monday."
Fremantle, the capital of Western Australia, is famous for its beautiful beaches, while the port area of Fremantle is famous for its architectural heritage and historical port
On the other side of the city, the picturesque Rottnest Island, 11 miles west of Perth, offers the adventurous couple plenty of outdoor activities, from surfing to snorkeling, while the wine producing area in the south of the state offers them a complex escape from the mountains
"Guide: how to plan the ultimate British Wedding: after a short stay in Los Angeles, the newlyweds started their honeymoon journey by staying on a private island in French Polynesia for the first time."
"Middleton and Matthews are believed to live in Brando, the world's most luxurious Eco Resort, and they are reported to spend about 3000 a night."
") Rex special it is said that the happy couple then went to New Zealand and arrived in Australia on Tuesday."



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Each member of the family deals with Robert's 'death' differently and Simon announces plans to disband the monarchy (presumably because Liam and Eleanor would not make good heirs to the throne).”
“The family is in disarray as the line of succession has changed and Liam (who is next in line to the British throne) is unprepared to rule.”
“He understood his duty much better than his younger siblings, who tend to prefer partying to ruling.”
“According to most of the accounts of Robert's character during the first two seasons, it is known that he was well-groomed by his parents to take over as king someday.”
“Boone was ordered by Ted Pryce to have him shot, but he failed, and Robert remained alive, as revealed at the end of Season 2.”
“He was 'killed' by Brandon Boone.”
“We found out his supposed 'death' wasn't an accident, as he was targeted.”
“It is well known that he is especially close with his younger sister Eleanor and she felt a tremendous amount of guilt for not calling him the day of his accident.”
“He was the favorite nephew of Prince Cyrus and he is his mother's favorite child as well.”
“He is also the older brother of fraternal twins Prince Liam Henstridge and Princess Eleanor Henstridge.”


"Every family member has a different way of dealing with Robert's death. Simon announced his plan to dissolve the monarchy (probably because Liam and Eleanor will not be good successors to the throne)
"Because the line of succession has changed, Liam (the next heir to the British throne) is not ready to rule, and the family is in chaos."
"He knows his duties better than his brothers and sisters. They prefer parties to domination."
"According to most of the descriptions of Robert's character in the first two seasons, we all know that he was carefully cultivated by his parents to one day take over the king."
"Boone was shot by Ted price, but he failed, and Robert is still alive, as revealed at the end of the second season."
"He was killed by Brandon Boone."
"We found that what he called 'death' was not an accident, because he was the target."
"As we all know, he has a very close relationship with his sister Elinor, and she feels very guilty for not calling him on the day of the accident."
"He is Prince Cyrus's favorite nephew and his mother's favorite child."
"He is also the brother of his brothers and sisters, Prince Liam henstridge and Princess Eleanor henstridge."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Good luck to him.”Still, she notes, he will be watched with an “eagle eye.””
““I do what I can to make the choice of accepting what I can’t change or control.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Tanya Brown knew the day would come when O.J.”
“Simpson — famously acquitted of murder in her sister Nicole Brown Simpson's death — would walk free againWhat Does Nicole Brown Simpson's Sister Really Think About O.J.’s Early Release from Prison?”
“Simpson — famously acquitted of murder in her sister Nicole Brown Simpson‘s death — would walk free again.”
“Now that a Nevada parole board has granted the 70-year-old Simpson an early release, allowing him to leave prison as early as Oct. 1, Brown, 46, says she feels she has no other choice but to accept it, for her own peace of mind.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It is what it is,” she tells PEOPLE.”


"Good luck to him." However, she said, people will use "eagle eyes" to observe him
"I choose as much as I can to accept what I can't change or control."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Tanya Brown knows that one day O.J
Simpson - her sister Nicole Brown Simpson acquitted of murder - will be free again - what does Nicole Brown Simpson's sister think of O.J.'s early release? "
"Simpson - acquitted of murder in the death of her sister Nicole Brown Simpson - will be free again."
"Now that the Nevada parole board has approved Simpson's early release, 70, to be released as early as October 1, the 46 year old Brown said that for her inner peace, she felt she had no choice but to accept it."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"That's it," she told people



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scott himself uploaded pictures of him and his three kids, including an adorable snap of daughter Penelope who laid out dozens of flowers to spell 'dad'.”
“One showed a US magazine cover that claimed Scott was 'in love' with Kim, while another showed the birthday boy playing third wheel as the reality star walked hand-in-hand with husband Kanye West.”
“...another luxury holiday to celebrate the reality star s 35th birthday...”
“The pair flew to St Barts this week along with Scott's kids, Mason, eight, Penelope, five, and Reign, three.”
“While Sofia holidaying with the kids is a sure enough sign that the loved-up pair are more serious than ever, Scott also proudly shared a candid snap of his 19-year-old girlfriend massaging his feet on Sunday.”
“The picture shows Lionel Richie's daughter, who has been dating Scott since last summer, sitting in front of him rubbing his feet as he lays down, with the ocean spread out in front of them.”
“(Image: "Could be worse," the 35-year-old captioned the picture.”
“Their pet pooch also makes a starring role in the snap.”
“The previous day Sofia publicly professed her love for her boyfriend while wishing him a happy birthday on Instagram.”
“While she usually keeps their romance on the down-low when it comes to social media, she proudly shared a snap of them cuddling up alongside the sweet message: "Happy Birthday babe!”


"Scott himself uploaded photos of him and his three children, including a lovely snapshot of his daughter Penelope, who put dozens of flowers together to spell" Dad. "
One is the cover of an American magazine, claiming that Scott "fell in love" with Kim. The other is a birthday boy playing with a tricycle. The reality TV star is walking hand in hand with her husband Kanye West
“… Another luxury festival to celebrate the 35th birthday of reality TV stars... "
"The two flew to St. Bart this week with Scott's children, Mason, 8, Penelope, 5 and raven, 3."
"While Sofia's holiday with the children is a sure sign that the couple are more serious than ever, Scott is proud to share a candid snapshot of his 19-year-old girlfriend massaging his feet on Sunday."
"The photo shows that Lionel Richie's daughter has been dating Scott since last summer. She sits in front of Scott and rubs his feet as he lies down, and the sea spreads out in front of her."
"(picture:" maybe worse, "the 35 year old man wrote in the title of the picture
"Their pet dog also plays the leading role in the film."
"The day before yesterday, Sofia publicly expressed her love for her boyfriend on instagram and wished him a happy birthday."
When it comes to social media, she usually deals with their relationships in a low-key way, but she is proud to share the moment when they hugged each other, accompanied by a sweet message: "happy birthday, baby!"



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Immediately after he posted his post, fans commented very positive messages to the celeb such as, “You inspire me.”Jonathan has become such a hit since the reboot of Queer Eye and the show was even renewed for a second season.”
“The hair expert on the Netflix reboot, Queer Eye, took to Instagram on Tuesday to open up about his weight loss journey and self-love explaining the story behind his post.”
“Jonathan Van Ness from Queer Eye opened up to his fans about his weight loss journey after his stepdad passed away and his reflection of self-love.”
“Queer Eye’s Jonathan Van Ness reflects on his weight loss journey in an Instagram post.”


"Immediately after he posted his post, fans made very positive comments about the celebrity, such as," you inspired me. "Jonathan has become a hot character since strange eye was released again, and the show has even continued its second season."
"On Tuesday, queer eye, a hair stylist who has restarted Netflix, revealed his weight loss journey and narcissism on instagram and explained the story behind the post."
Jonathan Van Ness in strange eye tells his fans about his weight loss after his stepfather's death and his reflection on self love
Strange eye's Jonathan Van Ness reviews his weight loss in an instagram post



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This isn’t just a disease of the architecture profession; it’s a phenotype of human culture and how we develop stereotypes and perceptions.””
“That photo has since been taken down.”
“The actor, 54, was spotted at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology back in November where he seemingly dropped by one of Oxman’s classes the week after Thanksgiving.”
“Several students posted pictures of the actor posing with the class, including one where he is standing next to Oxman.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““She’s genius and gorgeous,” an architect, who has seen Oxman lecture and knows her work, tells PEOPLE.”
“The actor kept it casual in an all-black outfit as he happily smiled along with the students for several pictures.”
“He also stood next to Oxman in another picture with his hands behind his back as the larger group beamed at the camera.”
“Page Six first reported last week that the two had struck up a friendship based on their shared love of architecture.”
“But it’s not only true for architecture; it’s true in musical composition, for females working in theater, for film directors.”


"It's not just a disease of the construction industry; it's a manifestation of human culture, and it's also a manifestation of how we form stereotypes and ideas."
"That picture was taken later."
The 54 year old actor, who was discovered at MIT last November, seems to have gone to a class in Oxman a week after Thanksgiving
Several students posted pictures of the actor with the class, including one of him standing next to Oxman
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She is talented and beautiful," an architect, who has seen Oxman lectures, knows her work and tells people
"The actor, dressed in all black clothes, laughed happily with the students at random and took some pictures."
"In another photo, he's standing next to Oxman, hands behind his back, as a larger group smiles at the camera."
"Page six reported for the first time last week that the two had built a friendship based on a shared love of architecture."
"But it's not just for architecture, it's for music, it's for women who work in theaters, it's for film directors."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"The couple will live in Nottingham Cottage at Kensington Palace."”
“"Prince Harry has also sought and received the blessing of Ms Markle's parents.”
“(Image: BBC)Harry added: "She didn't even let me finish, she said can I say yes, can I say yes and then were was hugs and I had the ring in my finger and I was like can I - can I give you the ring?”
“The actress admitted she "barely" let her husband-to-be finish proposing before she said: "Can I say yes now?"”
“He got on one knee."”
“Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto-play soon 8 Cancel Play nowMeghan continued: "Trying to roast a chicken and it just - just an amazing surprise, it was so sweet and natural and very romantic.”
“Speaking about the moment he got down on one knee, Meghan said: "Just a cosy night, it was - what we were doing just roasting chicken and having …"Interrupting his fiancee, Harry said: "Roasting a chicken, trying to roast a chicken."”
“Meghan admitted it was "sweet, natural and very romantic" and just a "standard typical night in" for the pair.”
“The happy couple, who joined BBC presenter Mishal Husain for their first TV interview, revealed he proposed "earlier this month" at their cottage.”
“The fifth in line to the British throne proposed to American actress Meghan last week while he was trying to roast a chicken - and she happily accepted.”


"The couple will live in Nottingham villa at Kensington Palace."
"Prince Harry also sought and received the blessing of Ms. markel's parents."
"(picture: BBC) Harry added:" she didn't even let me finish, she said I could say yes, I could say yes, then hugged, I put the ring in my finger, I thought I could - can I give you the ring? "
The actress admitted that she "forced" her husband to complete the proposal, and then she said, "can I promise now?"
"He's on one knee."
Now Meghan continued: "trying to roast a chicken, it's just - it's just an amazing surprise, it's so sweet, natural and very romantic."
Speaking of the moment he knelt down on one knee, Megan said, "it's just a comfortable night. It's - all we're doing is grilling chicken and eating..." Interrupting his fiancee, Harry said, "roast chicken, try to roast chicken."
Megan admitted that it was "sweet, natural and very romantic," just a "standard typical night" for the two
In their first television interview with BBC host Mishal Husain, the happy couple revealed that he proposed "early this month" in their cabin
"The fifth in line heir to the British throne proposed to American actress Megan last week while she was grilling chicken, and she readily accepted it."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Associated Press contributed to this report.”
“Guede was convicted of murder in a separate trial and is serving a 16-year sentence.”
“The letter to Meredith Kercher was published in WestsideSeattle.com on the tenth anniversary of her friend’s brutal death.”
“It recounted the experiences she had with Kercher while the two were living together in Perugia, Italy.”
““When I look back on my memories of Meredith, what I find are beautiful, banal moments we shared in the weeks we lived side-by-side,” Knox wrote.”
“Knox recounted the times she and Kercher would carry groceries back to their apartment, drink espressos and watch television.”
““And I remember the last time I saw her, ten years ago today, slinging her purse over her shoulder and waving goodbye to me on her way out to meet up with her British friends,” Knox wrote.”
“Knox’s letter then took a dark turn when she mentioned her friend’s brutal murder.”
“ITALY S HIGHEST COURT ACQUITS AMANDA KNOX OF KILLING ROOMMATE My memories of Meredith are buried beneath the horrific autopsy photos and crime scene footage I saw the slurs I was called the death threats I received and still receive the false accusations I fought the years of wrongful imprisonment...”
“I endured the multiple trials and slanderous headlines that juxtaposed our names and faces unfairly interlocking her death with my identity Knox wrote...”


"The associated press contributed to this report."
"GAD was convicted of murder in another trial and is serving 16 years in prison."
"The letter to Meredith Kircher was published in Seattle, West Germany, on the 10th anniversary of her friend's tragic death."
It tells the story of her life with Kercher in Perugia, Italy
"When I look back on my memory of Meredith, what I find is the beautiful and ordinary moments we shared in the weeks we lived together," Knox wrote
Knox tells the story of her and Kercher bringing groceries back to their apartment, drinking coffee and watching TV
"I remember ten years ago today, when I last saw her, she carried her purse on her shoulder and waved goodbye to me on the way to meet her British friends," Knox wrote
"When Knox mentioned that her friend had been brutally murdered, her letter suddenly turned dark."
"The Italian supreme court acquitted Amanda Knox of the murder of my roommate. My memory of Meredith is buried in terrible autopsy photos and crime scene videos. I saw the abuse called "death threat", I received it, but I still received the framed accusation that I suffered in my years of illegal imprisonment... "
"I have endured multiple trials and defamatory headlines that juxtapose our names and faces and unfairly associate her death with my identity," Knox wrote



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With reporting by Jen Peros...”
“...the knot in May 2012”
“Chris and Peyton Lambton welcomed their son, Hayes Jennings, on Sunday, December 16.”
“The newborn joins smitten big sister Lyla, 2.”
““Lyla James is in love with her baby brother,” the couple tells Us Weekly exclusively.”
““It’s adorable.”Peyton, 35, who vied for Andy Baldwin’s heart on season 10 of ABC’s The Bachelor, announced in a July blog post that she and Chris were expanding their family.”
“The pregnancy came as a total surprise to the reality star and the Bachelorette season 6 alum.”
““Lyla James was an IVF baby and we went through so much to bring her into this world,” Peyton wrote at the time.”
““I just assumed that was how we would create all of our babies .”
“.”


"Jan Perlos's report..."
“… The end of May 2012
On Sunday, December 16, Chris and Peyton Lampton welcomed their son Hayes Jennings
"The new baby joined the knocked down elder sister Lila, 2 years old."
"Lyra James fell in love with her little brother," the couple told us exclusively every week
Peyton, 35, who competes for Andy Baldwin in ABC's the bachelor season 10, announced in a July blog post that she and Chris are expanding their family
"The pregnancy surprised reality TV stars and alumni of season 6."
"Leila James is a test tube baby, and we've been through so much to bring her into the world," Peyton wrote at the time
"I'm just assuming that we're going to create all our children like this."
“.”



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““After our next Thursday meeting there will most probably be a statement on whether we will award a prize this year or reserve it for next year, in which case two prizes for literature will be announced in October 2019,” Per Wästberg, a committee spokesman, told The Guardian.”
““The Crown Princess turned in surprise.”
“According to reports, Jean-Claude Arnault allegedly grabbed the princess’s bottom at an event organized by the Swedish Academy at its Villa Bergsgården in Stockholm in an incident that is said to have occurred around 2006.”
“The Swedish Academy is the body that awards the Nobel Prize in Literature.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Mr Arnault’s lawyer, Björn Hurtig, told The Telegraph: “My client most strongly denies these allegations.”
“He claims that these malicious rumors serve a single purpose; to blacken his name and damage him.” Hurtig has yet to respond to PEOPLE’s request for further comment.”
“One of the princess’s aides forcibly removed Arnault’s hand from Victoria’s buttocks, according to reports in Svenska Dagbladet and other local media outlets, including Sweden’s national broadcaster STV, who cited multiple sources.”
“Image zoom Credit: Pascal Le Segretain/Getty“He was lurking behind (her) and I saw his hand land on her neck and go down.”
“All the way down,” Ebba Witt-Brattström, a 64-year-old scholar in comparative literature, said.”


"After our meeting next Thursday, there is likely to be a statement on whether we will award the prize this year or keep it next year, in which case two literary awards will be announced in October 2019," committee spokesman per worsberg told the guardian
"The princess turned in surprise."
"It is reported that Jean Claude Arnault is said to have grabbed the princess's buttock at an event held by the Swedish Academy of Sciences at bergsgerden villa in Stockholm, which is said to have happened around 2006."
"The Swedish Academy is the institution that awards the Nobel Prize for literature."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"My client strongly denies these charges," Bjorn hetig, Mr. Arnault's lawyer, told the Daily Telegraph
"He claims that these malicious rumors have only one purpose: to discredit and damage his reputation." Hurtig has yet to respond to requests for further comment
"According to local media such as Svenska dabladete and Swedish state TV station STV, an aide of the princess forcibly removed Arnold's hand from Victoria's buttocks, citing a number of sources."
"He hid behind (her), I saw his hand fall on her neck, and then went down."
"Go all the way," said ebba Witt brattstr ó m, a 64 year old scholar of comparative literature



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She also spent time getting treatment then as well.”
“She returned home on December 30.”
““Well they say third times a charm… I’m going back to treatment people for 6 weeks to work on my trauma and getting on different meds.”
“THANK YOU @TylerBaltierra I LOVE YOU SO MUCH!!!!!”
“You are my light!!”
“And nova you are my sunshine #KeepTalkingMH,” the MTV personality, 25, tweeted on Wednesday, January 17.”
“Well they say third times a charm… I’m going back to treatment people for 6 weeks to work on my trauma and getting on different meds.”
“And nova you are my sunshine #KeepTalkingMH — Catelynn Baltierra (@CatelynnLowell) January 17, 2018When a fan tweeted and asked Lowell about what “trauma” she was referring to, she responded with, “My childhood trauma!!”


"At that time, she also spent time in treatment."
"She went home on December 30."
"Well, they say the third time is a charm I'm going back to the therapist for six weeks to treat my trauma and take different drugs. "
"Thank you @ Tyler baltierra, I love you so much!!"
"You are my light!"
"Nova you are my sunshine keep talking MH," the 25-year-old MTV celebrity tweeted on Wednesday, January 17
"Well, they say the third time is a charm I'm going back to the therapist for six weeks to treat my trauma and take different drugs. "
"Nova you are my sunshine? Keeptalking MH catelynn baltierra (@ catelynn Lowell) on January 17, 2018, when a fan asked Lowell on twitter what" trauma "she was referring to, she replied:" my childhood trauma! "



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are the parents of a lovely daughter whom we will continue to coparent for many years and share her joys and sorrows as only a parent can.””
““I would implore her to withdraw her action promptly and to go back, as uncomfortable as it might be, to the negotiating table.”
““It is indeed unfortunate, especially for our daughter, that Scarlett filed in court and made our personal differences so public,” the statement read.”
““It will be an interesting process.”Dauriac also issued a statement to Us via Mayerson.”
““He would like to move to France with his daughter, and Ms. Johansson does a lot of traveling,” Mayerson said.”
“Thank you.”Dauriac’s attorney, Harold Mayerson, told Page Six that both parties would be fighting over custody of their daughter.”
““Out of respect for my desires as a parent and out of respect for all working moms, it is with kindness that I ask other parties involved and the media to do the same.”
“...statement at the time...”
“As a devoted mother and private person and with complete awareness that my daughter will one day be old enough to read the news about herself I would only like to say that I will never ever be commenting on the dissolution of my marriage Johansson told Us in a...”
“She filed for divorce on March 8.”


"We are the parents of a lovely daughter, and we will continue to live with her for many years, sharing her joys and sorrows, which only parents can do."
"I implore her to withdraw immediately and return to the negotiating table as uncomfortably as possible."
"It is indeed unfortunate that Scarlett has brought a lawsuit to the court to disclose our personal differences, especially for our daughter," the statement said
"It's going to be an interesting process." Dauriac also issued a statement to us through mayerson
"He wants to move to France with his daughter, and Ms. Johnson travels a lot," Melson said
"Thank you." Harold Melson, dauriac's lawyer, told page 6 that both sides would fight over custody of their daughter
"Out of respect for my wishes as a parent and for all working mothers, I am in a good mood. Please do the same for other relevant parties and the media."
“… The statement at that time... "
"As a loyal mother and individual, I am fully aware that my daughter will one day grow up and be able to read about herself. I just want to say that I will never comment on the dissolution of my marriage, Johnson told us in a statement..."
"She filed for divorce on March 8."



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The current sixth season, in which the Evil Queen had been facing her alter ego, has been building toward a big fight between light and darkness.”
“While down in the ratings, Once remains an important series for ABC with strong Disney DNA and solid DVR and digital play.”
“I hear that a potential new installment is looking to shake things up, focusing on four of the most popular characters on the show.”
“Primetime Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight to Series orders See All I hear ABC Studios which produces Once is in talks with original cast members Jennifer Morrison Emma Lana Parrilla Regina Robert Carlyle Mr Gold as well as Colin O Donoghue Hook who has been a staple...”
“...on the show for the past few seasons about a potential Season 7”
“The list does not include Ginnifer Goodwin (Mary), Josh Dallas (David) and Jared Gilmore (Henry), who had been on the show since the start.”
“The contracts for the original Once cast are up at the end of this season, and some stars, including Morrison, had said in interviews that they were not sure whether they would continue.”
“ABC would likely wait for the studio to lock in the actors to pave the way for a possible Season 7 renewal.”
“In an interview with Deadline in January, ABC Entertainment president Channing Dungey hinted about Season 7 being envisioned as a reboot, opening a new chapter in the franchise after closing the current one after six seasons.”
“Regardless of what we decide to do at the end of this season I think Horowitz and Kitsis think they would put a little bit of a bow here and then there is a next piece that comes after that she said There will be a little bit of closure...”


"Now in the sixth season, the evil queen has been facing her other self, moving towards a big battle between light and darkness."
"Despite the decline in ratings," once "is still an important ABC series with powerful Disney DNA and reliable DVR and digital playback capabilities."
"I've heard that a potential new series is trying to change the status quo, focusing on the four most popular characters in the play."
"The prime time panic for your pilot and direct to the complete guide to the series orders to see what I heard about ABC studio production once again is in talks with former actor Jennifer Morrison, emmana parry larijana, Robert Carlyle, Mr. gold and Colin o'donohoe hook, who has been a staple..."
“… In the past few seasons, about the possibility of season seven
"The list doesn't include Guinness Goodwin (Mary), Josh Dallas (David) and Jared Gilmore (Henry), who were on the show from the start."
"The contract of the original" once "crew expired at the end of this season, and some stars, including Morrison, said in an interview that they were not sure whether they would renew their contract."
"ABC may wait for the studio to lock in the actors and pave the way for a new contract for the seventh season."
"In an interview with deadline in January, ABC entertainment president Channing dungee hinted that the seventh quarter will restart, and after the seventh quarter, which ends six quarters, it will open a new chapter in franchise."
"No matter what we decide to do at the end of the season, I think Horowitz and kittis think they will bow here, and then the next piece, she said it will be a little over..."



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If it doesn’t, it doesn’t.””
“If it happens, it happens.”
“The Bachelorette’s Robby Hayes and Are You The One?’s Kathryn Palmer sparked dating rumors earlier this month after the MTV star posted an April 7 Instagram shot of them with their arms around each other.”
“Nearly a week later, she shared another picture of at Florida’s Jacksonville Zoo, writing, “Should we talk about the elephant in the room…?”Should we talk about the elephant in the room…?”
“A post shared by Kathryn Palmer (@kathrynpalmerr) on Apr 14, 2017 at 4:06pm PDTYes, we should.”
““We enjoy getting to know each other and have fun hanging out,” Hayes, 28, exclusively tells Us Weekly.”
““She’s a super sweet girl, but there’s nothing too serious going on.”
“We’re definitely not dating.”After all, Hayes, originally from Jacksonville, Florida, is still in contention for ABC’s Bachelor in Paradise this summer.”
““She knows that’s in the cards for me,” explains the model, who considers himself single.”
““If that happens, we don’t want any drama between us.”The Florida State alums — he graduated in 2011; she started in 2012 — were introduced by her mom and a mutual friend who knows Hayes’ sister.”


"If not, then not."
"If it happens, it will."
"The bachelor is Robbie Hayes. Are you the one? Earlier this month, the MTV star posted a picture on instagram of the couple embracing their arms on April 7, sparking rumors of a date
Nearly a week later, she shared another photo at the Jacksonville zoo in Florida, which said, "should we talk about the elephants in the room? "Should we talk about the elephant in the room
"The post that Kathryn Palmer (@ kathrynpalmer) shared on pdtyes at 4:06 p.m. on April 14, 2017, we should do that."
"We like to get to know each other and have a good time together," Hayes, 28, told weekly
"She's a super cute girl, but nothing serious."
"We're definitely not dating." After all, Hayes, from Jacksonville, Florida, is still fighting for ABC's "Bachelor of paradise" this summer
"She knew it was impossible for me," explained the model, who thought she was single
"If that's the case, we don't want any more drama." The Florida alumni, who graduated in 2011 and started work in 2012, was introduced by her mother and a mutual friend who knew Hayes's sister



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Perhaps, it’s both?”
“A source revealed today “the entire family was very disappointed in Rob’s actions yesterday.”
“As CI readers know, on Wednesday, Rob went on a rant attacking his ex, Blac Chyna, where he accused her of cheating on him.”
“The Keeping Up With The Kardashian’s star continued to release “revenge porn” type photos and videos to embarrass the woman.”
“If that wasn’t enough, Rob went on to accuse her of being a “crazy person,” “disrespectful,” and claimed she spent tens of thousands of dollars on cosmetic alterations.”
“According to the reality star, he spent over $100,000 on plastic surgery for his baby momma.”
“The Kardashian brother threatened Chyna, saying that she won’t be able to see their daughter ever again unless she stops drinking alcohol and consuming narcotics like “cocaine, X, and E.”And what did Chyna have to say about all of this?”
“She responded with some drama of her own, alleging that Kardashian beat her.”
“However, she has since deleted the Snap where she made the initial accusation.”
“All of the sisters are trying not to react publicly, and are working to brush it under the rug.”The insider added that Kris Jenner is the one who is the most upset.”


"Maybe both?"
A source revealed today, "the whole family is very disappointed with Rob's behavior yesterday."
"As Ci readers know, on Wednesday, rob launched a fierce attack on his ex girlfriend Blake chener, accusing her of cheating him."
"Keep up with Kardashian" continues to embarrass the woman by releasing "revenge porn" type photos and videos
"If that's not enough, rob goes on to accuse her of being" Crazy "and" rude "and claims that she spent tens of thousands of dollars on plastic surgery."
"According to the reality show star, he spent more than $100000 on plastic surgery for his mother."
The Kardashian brothers threatened Gina that she would never see their daughter again unless she stopped drinking and taking "cocaine, X and E" and other drugs. What's Zina's comment on that? "
"She responded with her own drama, claiming that Kardashian hit her."
"However, she later deleted the snapshot of her original accusation."
"All the sisters try not to react in public and try to cover up the facts." Chris Jenner is the most upset one, the person familiar with the matter added



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tamara Yajia and executive producer Kate Lilly created the PSA”
“We are thankful for the support of Evan Kelly Da Vine Tatiana and the Funny or Die team to build the Rise movement across the country with the goal of passing the Sexual Assault Survivors Bill of Rights in every state An all female crew featuring director Veronica Rodriguez writer...”
““As the national conversation continues around the #MeToo movement, we want to give survivors and allies a way to take action to protect the rights of rape survivors everywhere, regardless of geography, race, or economics,” Nguyen said.”
““If you are fired up, angry, or feel helpless, join the Rise movement to help protect the rights of sexual assault survivors across the country.”In 2016, Rise worked toward passing legislation that led to the creation of the Sexual Assault Survivors’ Bill of Rights.”
““I wanted to participate in Rise’s PSA to help harness the power of the #MeToo movement into concrete action,” Wood said.”
“Wood, Rise CEO and founder Amanda Nguyen, and Rise chief of staff Lauren Libby will attend the hearing to testify on behalf of sexual assault survivors nationwide.”
“The PSA was released in tandem with a hearing held on Capitol Hill for the implementation of the Survivors’ Bill of Rights Act.”
“The video ends with a public service announcement encouraging support for Rise, a nonprofit organization that aims to defend the civil rights of sexual assault survivors.”
““There are so many cases of sexual harassment, that they update a new deck every 10 hours,” Randolph says, joining the game.”
“Wood then proceeds to rule out Spacey.”


"Tamara Yajia and executive producer Kate Lilly built PSA"
"We thank Evan Kelly Da Wayne Tatiana and the funny or dead team for their support in launching the rise campaign across the country with the goal of passing the sexual assault survivors' Rights Act in each state, an all female crew starring director Veronica Rodriguez..."
"As the national dialogue around the" meto movement "continues, we want to give survivors and allies a way to take action to protect the rights of rape survivors everywhere, regardless of geography, race or economic status," Nguyen said
"If you are irritated, angry or helpless, join the Reese movement to help protect the rights of survivors of nationwide violations." In 2016, Reese was committed to enacting the sexual assault survivors' Rights Act
"I want to participate in Reese's PSA to help translate the power of the meto movement into concrete action," Wood said
"Wood, Amanda Nguyen, Reese's CEO and founder, and Lauren Libby, Reese's chief of staff, will attend the hearing to testify on behalf of survivors of sexual assault across the country."
"The PSA was released at the same time as the hearing on the implementation of the survivors' bill of rights on Capitol Hill."
"The video ends with a public service advertisement encouraging support for rise, a nonprofit organization that aims to defend the civil rights of survivors of sexual abuse."
"There are so many cases of sexual harassment that they update a new deck every 10 hours," Randolph said as he joined the game
"Wood then ruled out the possibility of Spacey."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Late Show with Stephen Colbert airs weeknights at 11 35 p m ET PT on Global...”
“What do you need me for READ MORE Alec Baldwin singles out Stephen Colbert John Oliver for turning talk shows onto grand juries Then Clarice has a special request to join the notorious serial killer inside his cell because it seems safer in there than it does out here The...”
“...messages between Donald Trump Jr and WikiLeaks Trump calling on Russia to find Clinton s missing emails Story continues below advertisement Lecter responds Seriously you have that already...”
“...his high security cell Clarice outlines the evidence that s been assembled so far The 12 indictments against Manafort and Gates Flynn pleading guilty of Kremlin intermediaries reaching out to the Trump campaign unreported meetings with the Russian ambassador the meeting between Donald Trump Jr and the Russian lawyer the...”
“WATCH Stephen Colbert says firing Omarosa is the only job Trump is qualified for 2 22 Stephen Colbert calls Omarosa s firing the only job Trump is qualified to do Stephen Colbert calls Omarosa s firing the only job Trump is qualified to do Dec 14 2017 Visiting Lecter in...”
“Donning a dark wig and sensible FBI-style outfit, Foster reprised her role as Clarice Starling from Silence of the Lambs in a sketch that found her seeking help from Hannibal Lecter as she investigates the alleged ties between Donald Trump’s electoral campaign and Russia.”
“Send this page to someone via emailJodie Foster stepped back into one of her most memorable screen personas during Friday’s appearance on The Late Show with Stephen Colbert.”


"Stephen Colbert aired the weekend Knight evening program at 11:35 p.m. est..."
"You need me to read more about Alec Baldwin alone Steven Colbert John Oliver turning the talk show into a grand jury, and then Clarice has a special request to join the notorious serial killer in his cell, because it seems safer there than here..."
“…… The message between Donald Trump Jr. and WikiLeaks - Trump's appeal to Russia to find Clinton's missing email - continues the story below - and Lecter seriously responds that you have
“…… His high security cell, Clarice, outlines the evidence gathered so far - 12 indictments against manafort and gates Flynn, recognition of Kremlin intermediaries' contact with Trump's campaign team - unreported meetings with the Russian ambassador - meetings between Donald Trump Jr. and Russian lawyers... "
"Stephen Colbert said dismissing Omarosa is the only job trump is qualified to do." 22 Stephen Colbert said dismissing Omarosa is the only job trump is qualified to do. Stephen Colbert said dismissing Omarosa is the only job trump is qualified to do. Interview with Lecter on December 14, 2017
"Foster, wearing a dark wig and FBI style clothing, plays Clarice Starling in" the silent lamb "in a skit while investigating the so-called relationship between Donald Trump's campaign and Russia, and finds out in the skit that she is seeking Hannibal Lecker)
"Email this page to someone. On Friday's evening show with Stephen Colbert, Jodie Foster re played one of her most memorable screen roles."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The “Scary Movie” heroine has been spotted with cinematographer Michael Barrett.”
““Our son has two parents who love him very much, and for his sake we want to keep this situation as private as possible moving forward.”Faris and Pratt, who share 5-year-old son Jack, have since gone their separate ways.”
““We tried hard for a long time, and we’re really disappointed,” the former pair posted on Facebook.”
““This has been blindsiding to us.”Despite their united front, Faris and Pratt announced in August they were legally separating.”
““We have an incredible relationship, it has been weirdly stinging,” Faris told Us Weekly at the time.”
“You still feel, and look, like a fool.”Following a Star magazine report from 2015, Faris said she felt “blindsided” by rumors of Pratt’s infidelity.”
““She’s awesome, but of course it’s hurtful and also embarrassing when people are saying your husband is cheating on you, even if it’s patently untrue.”
“...false rumors made her feel insecure Jennifer and I are really friendly and she was apologetic even though she didn t need to be because she hadn t done anything wrong Faris described...”
“There are going to be stories circulating and you have to brace yourself for this Though Faris 40 didn t think it would bother her as Pratt 38 had worked with Aubrey Plaza on Parks and Recreation and Bryce Dallas Howard in Jurassic World the Mom actress noted how the...”
“...the set...”


"Horror movie" heroine was found with photographer Michael Barrett
"Our son has two parents. They love him very much. For his sake, we hope to keep this situation as private as possible in the future." Faris and Pratt, who have a five-year-old son, Jack, have parted ways ever since
"We worked hard for a long time and we were really disappointed," the first two said on Facebook
"It blinds us." Despite the united front of Faris and Pratt, they declared a legal separation in August
"We had an incredible relationship, which was strangely painful," Faris told weekly at the time
"You still feel like, you look like a fool." After a 2015 star report, Faris said she was "dumbfounded" by rumors of Pratt's infidelity
"She's great, but when people say your husband's cheating on you, it's certainly hurtful and embarrassing, even if it's obviously untrue."
“… The false rumors made her feel insecure. Jennifer and I were really friendly. She was very sorry, although she didn't need to apologize, because she didn't do anything wrong. Faris described... "
"There's going to be stories going around, and you have to be prepared for that, although Faris 40 doesn't think it's going to bother her because Pratt 38 worked with Aubrey Plaza for parks and entertainment, while Bryce Dallas Howard, the mother actress in Jurassic world, points out
“… Set... "



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It feels like the beautiful closure we all needed, myself included, and I couldn’t have been happier to come home to be with my ‘TVD’ set family and friends.””
““This is my true final goodbye, as today I shot my last scene of the ‘Vampire Diaries’ forever,” she wrote on Instagram on Monday, “Coming back for the series finale has been a whirlwind of emotion, nostalgia, love, tears of joy and bittersweet endings.”
“...finale...”
“They look happy and I am happy and so I don t see why there should be a problem with that Dobrev said at the time The drama is in the media it s not with us Dobrev was back on set in Georgia to film the Vampire Diaries series...”
“The couple wed in April 2015.”
“Let’s turn this page together, as we all walk into the next chapter peacefully.”Somerhalder and Reed began dating in 2014 and were engaged after just six months.”
“That is the harmful unintended consequence of their bulls–t stories and we have a moral responsibility to fix that.”
“And that’s what these magazines, websites and blogs don’t understand.”
“Because at the end of the day, that’s what this is about: teaching girls that you have to hate other girls only breeds a generation of women who believe you have to hate other women.”
““For the last few years we thought addressing any baseless rumors with silence was the best way,” Reed wrote on Instagram, “So here’s to putting an end to all those fake stories of on set jealousy, betrayal, made-up-friendships lost & women hating women.”


"It's like a beautiful ending that all of us need, including myself. I can't be happier to be home with my family and friends from TVD."
She wrote on instagram on Monday: "this is my real last farewell, because today I filmed the last scene of" the Vampire Diaries "forever. The ending of this series is a whirlwind of emotion, nostalgia, love, tears of joy and bittersweet ending."
“… The end
"They look happy and I'm happy, so I don't understand why Dobrev has a problem when he talks about the play in the media. It's not our problem. When Dobrev returned to Georgia to shoot the Vampire Diaries series.... "
"The couple got married in April 2015."
"Let's turn this page together and go to the next chapter peacefully." Summerhard and Reid have been dating since 2014 and are engaged in just six months
"It's a harmful unintended consequence of their bull market story, and we have a moral responsibility to solve it."
"And that's what magazines, websites and blogs don't understand."
"Because at the end of the day, that's the problem: teaching girls you have to hate other girls will only produce a generation of women who believe you have to hate other women."
"In the past few years, we think silence is the best way to solve any groundless rumors, so we want to end all the false stories about jealousy, betrayal, the loss of fictional friendship and women's hatred of women," Reid wrote on instagram



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I am forever grateful,” the mom of two wrote at the end of her goodbye post.”
“Here’s to all the incredible friends of Paco who’ve been so kind to him over the years.”
“All I can ask is that you consider adopting a pup, and loving them with all you’ve got.”
““My heart feels broken right now.”
“The shaggy, white dog made frequent appearances on Wilde’s social media accounts, often posing with Elvis, the rescue dog Wilde and husband Jason Sudeikis adopted in July 2017.”
“Paco was a kind, wise, gentle, loving soul,” Wilde captioned a series of black-and-white photos of herself and Paco.”
““Lost my best friend last night.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Sunday, the actress, 34, posted on Instagram that her beloved dog and ‘best friend’ Paco died on Saturday, which was also the star’s birthday.”
“Wilde wrote in her goodbye to Paco on Instagram that she hopes others make the choice to adopt their next petOlivia Wilde's Dog and 'Best Friend' Paco Dies on Her BirthdayLike Chrissy Teigen, Olivia Wilde is going through a pet owner’s most difficult days.”


"I am forever grateful to you," the mother of two wrote at the end of her farewell letter
"To all the incredible friends who have been so friendly to Paco all these years."
"All I can ask is that you consider adopting a puppy and love them as much as you can."
"My heart is broken now."
"This furry white puppy frequently appears on Wilde's social media account, and often takes pictures with Elvis Presley, Wilde's rescue dog and her husband Jason sudaikis, who was adopted in July 2017."
"Paco is a kind, wise, gentle and loving soul," Wilde wrote for a series of black and white photos of himself and Paco
"I lost my best friend last night."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On Sunday, the 34 year old actress posted on instagram that her beloved dog and 'best friend' Paco died on Saturday, which is also the star's birthday."
"In her farewell letter to Paco on instagram, Wilde said that she hoped others would choose to adopt Olivia Wilde's dog, the next pet. Paco's" best friend "died on her birthday. Just like Chris tegan, Olivia Wilde was going through the most difficult days for her pet owner."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Carter was released after posting bail for $4,610.”
“Carter continues, "To me music has always been my temple.”
“The 29-year-old brother of Backstreet Boys alum Nick Carter tweeted on Saturday night a long open letter in which he acknowledges his attraction to both men and women since he was 13.”
“"There’s something I’d like to say that I feel is important for myself and my identity that has been weighing on my chest for nearly half of my life," he wrote.”
“"This doesn’t bring me shame, just a weight and burden I have held onto for a long time that I would like lifted off me."”
“He explains, "I grew up in this entertainment industry at a very young age and when I was around 13 years old I started to find boys and girls attractive."”
“He then reveals There were years that went by that I thought about but it wasn t until I was 17 years old after a few relationships with girls I had an experience with a male that I had an...”
“...attraction to who I also worked with and grew up with...”
“Music will ALWAYS be what transcends us and myself.”
“His girlfriend, Madison Parker, was in the passenger seat of the car and was also taken into police custody.”


"Carter was released on $4610 bail."
Carter went on, "music has always been my temple to me."
"The 29 year old brother of backstreet boy alumni Nick Carter tweeted a long open letter on Saturday night, in which he admitted that he has been attractive to both men and women since he was 13."
"One thing I want to say is that I feel important to myself and my identity, which has been pressing on my chest for nearly half of my life," he wrote
"It doesn't bring me shame, it's just a burden I've been carrying for a long time, and I want to take it off me."
"I grew up in the entertainment industry when I was very young, and when I was about 13 years old, I began to find boys and girls attractive," he explained
"He later revealed that I had thought about it for many years, but it was not until I was 17 years old that I had a few relationships with girls that I had the experience of associating with men, and I had..."
“… The attraction to people I work with and grow up with... "
"Music is always beyond us and myself."
"His girlfriend, Madison Parker, was in the co driver's seat and was also detained by the police."



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.25888324873096447
Correct number is  51
Total number is  197
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
